The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Honorable Miss, by L. T. Meade

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net


Title: The Honorable Miss
       A Story of an Old-Fashioned Town

Author: L. T. Meade

Illustrator: F. Earl Christy

Release Date: May 7, 2005 [EBook #15778]

Language: English


*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE HONORABLE MISS ***




Produced by David Garcia and the Online Distributed Proofreader Team.




[Illustration: Cover]





THE HONORABLE MISS

A Story of an Old-Fashioned Town

BY

L.T. MEADE


  AUTHOR OF "THE YOUNG MUTINEER," "WORLD OF GIRLS,"
  "A VERY NAUGHTY GIRL," "SWEET GIRL GRADUATE," ETC.


  NEW YORK
  HURST & COMPANY
  PUBLISHERS


  =======================================================================

  L.T. MEADE SERIES

  UNIFORM WITH THIS VOLUME

  By MRS. L.T. MEADE


  Bunch of Cherries, A.                 Merry Girls of England.
  Daddy's Girl.                         Miss Nonentity.
  Dr. Rumsey's Patient.                 Palace Beautiful.
  Francis Kane's Fortune.               Polly, a New-Fashioned Girl.
  Gay Charmer, A.                       Rebels of the School.
  Girl in Ten Thousand, A.              Sweet Girl Graduate, A.
  Girls of St. Wodes, The.              Their Little Mother.
  Girl of the People, A.                Time of Roses, The.
  Girls of the True Blue.               Very Naughty Girl, A.
  Heart of Gold, The.                   Wild Kitty.
  Honorable Miss, The.                  World of Girls.
  How It All Came About.                Young Mutineers, The.
  Little Princess of Tower Hill.

  _Price, postpaid, 50¢ each, or any three books for $1.25_

  HURST & COMPANY
  PUBLISHERS, NEW YORK

  =======================================================================






THE HONORABLE MISS.

       *       *       *       *       *




CHAPTER I.

BEATRICE WILL FIT.


"So," continued Mrs. Meadowsweet, settling herself in a lazy, fat sort
of a way in her easy chair, and looking full at her visitor with a
complacent smile, "so I called her Beatrice. I thought under the
circumstances it was the best name I could give--it seemed to fit all
round, you know, and as _he_ had no objection, being very
easy-going, poor man, I gave her the name."

"Yes?" interrogated Mrs. Bertram, in a softly surprised, and but
slightly interested voice; "you called your daughter Beatrice? I don't
quite understand your remark about the name fitting all round."

Mrs. Meadowsweet raised one dimpled hand slowly and laid it on top of
the other. Her smile grew broader.

"A name is a solemn thing, Mrs. Bertram," she continued. "A name is, so
to speak, to fit the person to whom it is given, for life. Will you tell
me how any mother, even the shrewdest, is to prophecy how an infant of a
few weeks old is to turn out? I thought over that point a good deal when
I gave the name, and said I to myself however matters turn 'Beatrice'
will fit. If she grows up cozy and soft and petting and small, why she's
Bee, and if she's sharp and saucy, and a bit too independent, as many
lasses are in these days, what can suit her better than Trixie? And
again if she's inclined to be stately, and to hold herself erect, and to
think a little more of herself than her mother ever did--only not more
than she deserves--bless her--why then she's Beatrice in full. Oh! and
there you are, Beatrice! Mrs. Bertram has been good enough to call to
see me. Mrs. Bertram, this is my daughter Beatrice."

A very tall girl came quietly into the room, bowed an acknowledgment of
her mother's introduction, and sat down on the edge of the sofa. She was
a dignified girl from the crown of her head to her finger-tips, and Mrs.
Bertram, who had been listening languidly to the mother, favored the
newcomer with a bright, quick, inquisitive stare, then rose to her
feet.

"I am afraid I must say good-bye, Mrs. Meadowsweet. I am glad to have
made your daughter's acquaintance, and another day I hope I shall see
more of her. I have of course heard of you from Catherine, my dear," she
added, holding out her hand frankly to the young girl.

"Yes. Is Catherine well?" asked Beatrice, in a sweet high-bred voice.

"She is well, my dear. Good-bye, Mrs. Meadowsweet. I quite understand
the all-roundness and suitability of your choice in the matter of
names."

Then the great lady sailed out of the room, and Beatrice flew to the
window, placed herself behind the curtain and watched her down the
street.

"What were you saying about me, mother?" she asked, when Mrs. Bertram
had turned the corner.

"I was only telling about your name, my dearie girl. _He_ always
gave me my way, poor man, so I fixed on Beatrice. I said it would fit
all round, and it did. Shut that window, will you, Bee?--the wind is
very sharp for the time of year. You don't mind my calling you Bee now
and then--even if it doesn't seem quite to fit?" continued Mrs.
Meadowsweet.

"No, mother, of course not. Call me anything in the world you fancy.
What's in a name?"

"Don't say that, Trixie, there's a great deal in a name."

"Well, I get confused with mine now and then. Mother, I just came in to
kiss you and run away again. Alice Bell and I are going to the lecture
at the Town Hall. It begins at five, and it's half-past four now.
Good-bye, I shall be home to supper."

"One moment, Bee, I am really pleased that your fine friend's mother has
chosen to call at last."

Beatrice frowned.

"Catherine is not my fine friend," she said.

"Well, your _friend_, then, dearie. I am glad your friend's mother
has called."

"I am not--that is, I am absolutely indifferent. Now, I really must run
away. Good-bye until you see me again."

She tripped out of the room as lightly and carelessly as she had entered
it, and Mrs. Meadowsweet sat on by the window which looked into the
garden.

Mrs. Meadowsweet had the smoothest and most tranquil of faces. She had
taken as her favorite motto in life, that somehow, if you only allowed
them, things did fit all round. Each event in her own career, to use her
special phraseology "fitted." As her husband had to die, he passed away
from this life at the most fitting moment. As Providence had blessed her
with only one child, a daughter was surely the most fitting companion
for a widowed mother. The house Mrs. Meadowsweet lived in fitted her
requirements to perfection. In short, she was fat and comfortable, both
in mind and body; she never fretted, she never worried; she was not
rasping and disagreeable; she was not fault-finding. If her nature
lacked depth, it certainly did not lack affection, generosity, and a
true spirit of kindliness. If she were a little too well pleased with
herself, she was also well pleased with her neighbors. She was not
especially appreciated, for she was considered prosy and commonplace.
Prosy she undoubtedly was, but not commonplace, for invariable
contentment and unbounded good-nature are more and more difficult to
find in this censorious world.

Mrs. Meadowsweet now smiled gently to herself.

"However Beatrice may take it, I _am_ glad Mrs. Bertram called,"
she murmured. "_He'd_ have liked it, poor man! he never put himself
out, and he never interfered with me, no, never, poor dear. But he liked
people to show due respect--it's a respect to Beatrice for Mrs. Bertram
to call. It shows that she appreciates Beatrice as her daughter's
friend. Mrs. Bertram, notwithstanding her pride, is likely to be very
much respected in Northbury, and no wonder. She's a little above most of
us, but we like her all the better for that. We are going to be proud of
her. It's nice to have some one to be proud of. And she has no airs when
you come to know her, no, she hasn't airs; she's as pleasant as
possible, and seems interested too, that is, as interested as people
like us can expect from people like her. She didn't even condescend to
Beatrice. I wonder how my little girl would have taken it, if she had
condescended to her. Yes, Jane, do you want me?"

An elderly servant opened the drawing-room door.

"If you please, ma'am, Mrs. Morris has called, and she wants to know if
it would disturb you very much to see her?"

"Disturb me? She knows it won't disturb me. Show her in at once. And
Jane, you can get tea ready half-an-hour earlier than usual. I daresay,
as Mrs. Morris has called she'd like a cup. How do you do, Mrs. Morris?
I'm right glad to see you, right glad. Sit here, in this chair--or
perhaps you'd rather sit in this one; this isn't too near the window.
And you'll like a screen, I know;--not that there's any draught--for
these windows fit as tight as tight when shut."

Mrs. Morris was a thin, tall woman. She always spoke in a whisper, for
she was possessed of the belief that she had lost her voice in
bronchitis. She had not, for when she scolded any one she found it
again. She was not scolding now, however, and her tones were very low
and smothered.

"I saw her coming in, my dear; I was standing at the back of the wire
blind, and I saw her going up your steps, so I thought I'd come across
quickly and hear the news. You'll tell me the news as soon as possible,
won't you? Mrs. Butler and Miss Peters are coming to call in a few
minutes. I met them and they told me so. They saw her, too. You'll tell
me the news quickly, Lucy, for I'd like to be first, and it seems as if
I had a right to that much consideration, being an old friend."

"So you have, Jessie."

Mrs. Meadowsweet looked immensely flattered.

"I suppose you allude to Mrs. Bertram having favored me with a call,"
she continued, in a would-be-humble tone, which, in spite of all her
efforts, could not help swelling a little.

"Yes, dear, that's what I allude to; I saw her from behind the wire
screen blind. We were having steak and onions for dinner, and the doctor
didn't like me jumping up just when I had a hot bit on my plate. But I
said, it's Mrs. Bertram, Sam, and she's standing on Mrs. Meadowsweet's
steps! There wasn't a remonstrance out of him after that, and the only
other remark he made was, 'You'll call round presently, Jessie, and
inquire after Mrs. Meadowsweet's cold.' So here I am, my dear. And how
_is_ your cold, by the way?"

"It's getting on nicely, Jessie. Wasn't that a ring I heard at the door
bell?"

"Well, I never!" Mrs. Morris suddenly found her voice. "If it isn't that
tiresome Mrs. Butler and Miss Peters. And now I won't be first with the
news after all!"

Mrs. Meadowsweet smiled again.

"There really isn't so much to tell, Jessie. Mrs. Bertram was just
affable like every one else. Ah, and how are you, Mrs. Butler? Now, I do
call this kind and neighborly. Miss Peters, I trust your cough is
better?"

"I'm glad to see you, Mrs. Meadowsweet," said Mrs. Butler, in a slightly
out-of-breath tone.

"My cough is no better," snapped Miss Peters. "Although it's summer, the
wind is due east; east wind always catches me in the throat."

Miss Peters was very small and slim. She wore little iron-gray,
corkscrew curls, and had bright, beady black eyes. Miss Peters was Mrs.
Butler's sister. She was a snappy little body, but rather afraid of Mrs.
Butler, who was more snappy. This fear gave her an unpleasant habit of
rolling her eyes in the direction of Mrs. Butler whenever she spoke. She
rolled them now as she described the way the east wind had treated her
throat.

Mrs. Butler seated herself in an aggressive manner on the edge of the
sofa, and Miss Peters took a chair as close as possible to Mrs. Morris,
who pushed hers away from her.

Each lady was anxious to engross the whole attention of Mrs.
Meadowsweet, and it was scarcely possible for the good-natured woman not
to feel flattered.

"Now, you'll all have a cup of tea with me," she said. "I know Jane's
getting it, but I'll ring the bell to hasten her. Ah, thank you, Miss
Peters."

Miss Peters had sprung to her feet, seized the bell-rope before any one
could hinder her, and sounded a vigorous peal. Then she rolled her eyes
at Mrs. Butler and sat down.

Mrs. Morris said that when Miss Peters rolled her eyes she invariably
shivered. She shivered now in such a marked and open way that poor Mrs.
Meadowsweet feared her friend had taken cold.

"Dear, dear--I only wish I had a fire lighted," she said. "Your
bronchitis will be getting worse, if you aren't careful, Jessie. Miss
Peters, a cup of tea will do your throat good. It always does mine when
I get nipped."

"Don't encourage Maria in her fancies," snapped Mrs. Butler. "There's
nothing ails her throat, only she will wrap herself in so much wool that
she makes herself quite delicate. I tell her she fancies she is a
hothouse plant."

"Oh, nothing of the kind," whispered Mrs. Morris.

"That's what I say," nodded back Mrs. Butler. "More of the nature of the
hardy broom. But now we haven't come to discuss Maria and her fads. You
have had a visitor to-day, Mrs. Meadowsweet."

"Ah, here comes the tea," exclaimed Mrs. Meadowsweet. "Bring the table
over here, Jane. Now this is what I call cozy. Jane, you might ask cook
to send up some buttered toast, and a little more cream. Yes, Mrs.
Butler, I beg your pardon."

"I was remarking that you had a visitor," repeated Mrs. Butler.

"Ah, so I had. Mrs. Bertram called on me."

"And why shouldn't she call on you, dear?" suddenly whispered
Mrs. Morris. "Aren't you quite as good as she is when all's said and
done? Yes, dear, I'll have some of your delicious tea. Such a treat!
Some more cream? Thank you, yes; I'll help myself. Why shouldn't Mrs.
Bertram call on Mrs. Meadowsweet? That's what I say, ladies," continued
Mrs. Morris, looking over the top of her cup of tea in a decidedly
fight-me-if-you-dare manner.

"Nobody said she shouldn't call," answered Mrs. Butler. "Maria, you'll
oblige me by going into the hall and fetching my wrap. There's rather a
chill from this window--and the weather is very inclement for the time
of year. No, thank you, Mrs. Morris, I wouldn't take your seat for the
world. As you justly remark, why shouldn't Mrs Bertram call on our good
friend here? And, for that matter, why shouldn't she cross the road, and
leave her card on _you_, Mrs. Morris?"

Mrs. Morris was here taken with such a fit of bronchial coughing and
choking that she could make no response. Miss Peters rolled her eyes at
her sister in a manner which plainly said, "You had her there, Martha,"
and poor Mrs. Meadowsweet began nervously to wish that she had not been
the honored recipient of Mrs. Bertram's favors.

"She came to see me on account of Beatrice," remarked the hostess. "At
least I think that was why she came. I beg your pardon, did you say
anything, ladies?"

"Oh! fie, fie! Mrs. Meadowsweet," said Miss Peters, "you are too modest.
In my sister's name and my own, I say you are too modest."

"And in my name too," interrupted Mrs. Morris. "You are too humble, my
dear friend. She called to see you for _your own dear sake_ and for
no other."

"And now let us all be friendly," continued Miss Peters, "and learn the
news. I think we are all of one mind in wishing to learn the news."

Mrs. Meadowsweet smoothed down the front of her black satin dress. She
knew, and her friends knew, that she would have much preferred the honor
of Mrs. Bertram's call to be due to Beatrice's charms than her own. She
smiled, however, with her usual gentleness, and plunged into the
conversation which the three other ladies were so eager to commence.

Before they departed they had literally taken Mrs. Bertram to pieces.
They had fallen upon her tooth and nail, and dissected her morally, and
socially, and with the closest scrutiny of all, from a religious point
of view.

Mrs. Meadowsweet, who never spoke against any one, was amazed at the
ingenuity with which the character of her friend (she felt she must call
Mrs. Bertram her friend) was blackened. Before the ladies left Mrs.
Meadowsweet's house they had proved, in the ablest and most thorough
manner, that Mrs. Bertram was worldly and vain, that she lived beyond
her means, that she trained her daughters to think of themselves far
more highly than they ought to think, that in all probability she was
not what she pretended to be, and, finally, that poor Mrs. Meadowsweet,
dear Mrs. Meadowsweet, was in great danger on account of her friendship.

"I don't agree with you, ladies," said the good woman, as they were
leaving the house, but they neither heeded nor heard her remark.

The explanation of their conduct was simple enough. They were devoured
with jealousy. Had Mrs. Bertram called on any one of them, she would
have been in that person's estimation the most fascinating woman in
Northbury.




CHAPTER II.

MRS. BERTRAM'S WILL.


And Mrs. Bertram did not care in the least what anybody thought of her.
She was in no sense of the word a sham. She was well-born,
well-educated, respectably married, and fairly well-off. The people in
Northbury considered her rich. She always spoke of herself as poor. In
reality she was neither rich nor poor. She had an income of something
like twelve hundred a year, and on that she lived comfortably, educated
her children well, and certainly managed to present a nice appearance
wherever she went.

There never was a woman more full of common sense than Mrs. Bertram. She
had quite an appalling amount of this virtue; no one ever heard her say
a silly thing; each step she took in life was a wise one, carefully
considered, carefully planned out. She had been a widow now for sis
years. Her husband had nearly come into the family estate, but not
quite. He was the second son, and his eldest brother had died when his
heir was a month old. This heir had cut out Mrs. Bertram's husband from
the family place, with its riches and honors. He himself had died soon
after, and had left his widow with three children and twelve hundred a
year.

The children were a son and two daughters. The son's name was Loftus,
the girls were called Catherine and Mabel. Loftus was handsome in
person, and very every-day in mind. He was good-natured, but not
remarkable for any peculiar strength of character. His mother had
managed to send him to Rugby and Sandhurst, and he had passed into the
army with tolerable credit. He was very fond of his mother, devotedly
fond of her, but since he entered the army he certainly contrived to
cost her a good deal.

She spoke to him on the subject, believed as much as she chose of his
earnest promises to amend, took her own counsel and no one else's, gave
up her neat little house in Kensington, and came to live at Northbury.

Catherine and Mabel did not like this change, but as their mother never
dreamt of consulting them, they had to keep their grumbles to
themselves.

Mrs. Bertram considered she had taken a wise step, and she told the
girls so frankly. Their house in Kensington was small and expensive. In
the country they had secured a delightful old Manor--Rosendale Manor was
its pretty name--for a small rent.

Mrs. Bertram found herself comparatively rich in the country, and she
cheered the girls by telling them that if they would study economical
habits, and try to do with very little dress for the present, she would
save some money year by year, so that by the time Catherine was twenty
they might have the advantage of a couple of seasons in town.

"Catherine will look very young at twenty," remarked the mother.
"By that time I shall have saved quite a fair sum out of my income.
Catherine looked younger at twenty than Mabel at eighteen. They can both
come out together, and have their chances like other girls."

Catherine did not want to wait for the dear delights of society until
she had reached so mature an age. But there was no murmuring against her
mother's decree, and as she was a healthy-minded, handsome, good-humored
girl, she soon accommodated herself to the ways and manners of country
folk, and was happy enough.

"I shall live on five hundred a year at Rosen dale Manor," determined
Mrs. Bertram. "And I have made up my mind that Loftie shall not cost me
more than three. Thus I shall save four hundred a year. Catherine is
only seventeen now. By the time she is twenty I shall have a trifle over
and above my income to fall back upon. Twelve hundred pounds is a
bagatelle with most people, but I feel I shall effect wonders with it.
Catherine and Mabel will be out of the common, very out of the common.
Unique people have an advantage over those who resemble the herd.
Catherine and Mabel are to be strongly individual. In any room they are
to be noticeable. Little hermits, now, some day they shall shine. They
are both clever, just clever enough for my purpose. Catherine might with
advantage be a shade less beautiful, but Mabel will, I am convinced,
fulfil all my expectations. Then, if only Loftie," but here Mrs. Bertram
sighed. She was returning from her visit to Mrs. Meadowsweet, walking
slowly down the long avenue which led to the Manor. This avenue was kept
in no order; its edges were not neatly cut, and weeds appeared here and
there through its scantily gravelled roadway. The grass parterre round
the house, however, was smooth as velvet, and interspersed with gay
flower-beds. It looked like a little agreeable oasis in the middle of a
woodland, for the avenue was shaded by forest trees, and the house
itself had a background of two or three acres of an old wood.

Mrs. Bertram was tired, and walked slowly. She did not consider herself
a proud woman, but in this she was mistaken. Every line of her upright
figure, each glance of her full, dark eyes, each word that dropped from
her lips spoke of pride both of birth and position. She often said to
herself, "I am thankful that I don't belong to the common folk; it would
grate on my nerves to witness their vulgarities,--their bad taste would
torture me; their want of refinement would act upon my nature like a
blister. But I am not proud, I uphold my dignity, I respect myself and
my family, but with sinful, unholy pride I have no part."

This was by no means the opinion held of her, however, by the Northbury
folk. They had hailed her advent with delight; they had witnessed her
arrival with the keenest, most absorbing interest, and, to the horror of
the good lady herself, had one and all called on her. She was petrified
when this very natural event happened. She had bargained for a life of
retirement for herself and her girls. She had never imagined that
society of a distinctly lower strata than that into which she had been
born would be forced on her. Forced! Whoever yet had forced Mrs. Bertram
into any path she did not care to walk in?

She was taken unawares by the first visitors, and they absolutely had
the privilege of sitting on her sofas, and responding to a few icy
remarks which dropped from her lips.

But the next day she was armed for the combat. The little parlor-maid,
in her neat black dress, clean muslin apron, large frilled, picturesque
collar, and high mob-cap, was instructed to say "Not at home" to all
comers. She was a country girl, not from Northbury, but from some still
more rusticated spot, and she thought she was telling a frightful lie,
and blushed and trembled while she uttered it. So apparent was her
confusion that Miss Peters, when she and her sister, Mrs. Butler,
appeared on the scene, rolled her eyes at the taller lady and asked her
in a pronounced manner if it would not be well to drop a tract on the
heinousness of lying in the avenue.

This speech was repeated by Clara to the cook, who told it again to the
young ladies' maid, who told it to the young ladies, who narrated it to
their mother.

Mrs. Bertram smiled grimly.

"Don't repeat gossip, my dears," she said, Then after a pause she
remarked aloud: "The difficulty will be about returning the calls."

Mabel, the youngest and most subservient of the girls, ventured to ask
her mother what she intended to do, but Mrs. Bertram was too wise to
disclose her plans, that is, if she had made any.

The Rector of Northbury was one of the first to visit the new
inhabitants of the Manor. To him Mrs. Bertram opened her doors gladly.
He was old, unmarried, and of good family. She was glad there was at
least one gentleman in the place with whom she might occasionally
exchange a word.

About a fortnight after his visit the Rector inclosed some tickets for a
bazaar to Mrs. Bertram. The tickets were accompanied by a note, in which
he said that it would gratify the good Northbury folk very much if Mrs.
Bertram and the young ladies would honor the bazaar with their presence.

"Every soul in the place will be there," said Mr. Ingram. "This bazaar
is a great event to us, and its object is, I think, a worthy one. We
badly want a new organ for our church."

"Eureka!" exclaimed Mrs. Bertram when she had read this note.

"What is the matter, mother?" exclaimed Mabel.

"Only that I have found a way out of my grand difficulty," responded
their mother, tossing Mr. Ingram's note and the tickets for the bazaar
into Catherine's lap.

"Are you so delighted to go to this country bazaar, mother?" asked the
eldest daughter.

"Delighted! No, it will be a bore."

"Then why did you say Eureka! and look so pleased?"

"Because on that day I shall leave cards on the Northbury folk--not one
of them will be at home."

"Shabby," muttered Catherine. Her dark cheek flushed, she turned away.

Mabel put out her little foot and pressed it against her sister's. The
pressure signified warning.

"Then you are not going to the bazaar, mother?" she questioned.

"I don't know. I may drop in for a moment or two, quite at the close. It
would not do to offend Mr. Ingram."

"No," replied Mabel. "He is a dear, _gentlemanly_ old man."

"Don't use that expression, my love. It is my object in life that
_all_ your acquaintances in the world of men should be gentlemen.
It is unnecessary therefore to specify any one by a term which must
apply to all."

Mrs. Bertram then asked Mabel to reply to Mr. Ingram's note. The reply
was a warm acceptance, and Mr. Ingram cheered those of his parishioners
who pined for the acquaintance of the great lady, with the information
that they would certainly meet her at the bazaar.

Accordingly when the fateful day arrived the town was empty, and the
Fisherman's Hall (Northbury was a seaport), in which the bazaar was held
was packed to overflowing. Accordingly Mrs. Bertram in a neat little
brougham, which she had hired for the occasion, dropped her cards from
house to house in peace; accordingly, too, she caught the
maids-of-all-work in their undress toilets, and the humble homes looking
their least pretentious.

The bazaar was nearly at an end, when at last, accompanied by her two
plainly-dressed, but dainty looking girls, she appeared on the scene.

The Northbury folk had all been watching for her. Those who had been
fortunate enough to enter the sacred precincts of the Manor watched with
interest, mingled with approval. (Her icy style was quite
_comme-il-faut_, they said.) Those who had been met by the
frightened handmaid's "not at home" watched with interest, mixed with
disapproval, but all, all waited for Mrs. Bertram with interest.

"How late these fashionable people are," quote Miss Peters. "It's
absolutely five o'clock. My dear Martha, do sit down and rest yourself.
You look fit to drop. I'll keep an eye on the door and tell you the very
moment Mrs. Bertram comes in. Mrs. Gorman Stanley has promised to
introduce us. Mrs. Gorman Stanley was fortunate enough to find Mrs.
Bertram in. It was she who told us about the drawing-room at the Manor.
Fancy! Mrs. Bertram has only a felt carpet on her drawing-room. Not even
a red felt, which looks warm and wears. But a sickly green! Mrs. Gorman
Stanley told me _as a fact_ that the carpet was quite a worn-out
shade between a green and a brown; and the curtains--she said the
_drawing room_ curtains were only cretonne. You needn't stare at
me, Martha. Mrs. Gorman Stanley never makes mistakes. All the same,
though she couldn't tell why, she owned that the room had a
_distingué_ effect. _En règle_, that was it; she said the room
was _en règle_."

"Maria, if you could stop talking for a moment and fetch me an ice, I'd
be obliged," answered Mrs. Butler. "Oh!" standing up, "there's Mrs.
Gorman Stanley. How do you do, Mrs. Gorman Stanley? Our great lady
hasn't chosen to put in her appearance yet. For my part I don't suppose
she's any better than the rest of us, and so I say to Maria. Well,
Maria, what's the matter now?"

"Here's your ice," said Miss Peters; "take it. Don't forget that you
promised to introduce us to Mrs. Bertram, Mrs. Gorman Stanley."

Mrs. Gorman Stanley was the wealthy widow of a retired fish-buyer. She
liked to condescend; also to show off her wealth. It pleased her to
assume an acquaintance with Mrs. Bertram, although she thoroughly
despised that good lady's style of furnishing a house.

"I'll introduce you with pleasure, my dear," she said to Mrs. Butler.
"Yes, I like Mrs. Bertram very much. Did you say she was out when you
called? Oh! she was in to me. Yes, I saw the house. I don't think she
had finished furnishing it. The drawing-room looked quite bare. A
made-up sort of look, you understand. Lots of flowers on the tables, and
that nasty, cold, cheap felt under your feet. Not that _I_ mind how
a house is furnished." (She did very much. Her one and only object in
life seemed to be to lade her own mansion with ugly and expensive
upholstery.) "Now, what's the matter, Miss Peters? Why, you are all on
wires. Where _are_ you off to now?"

"I see the Rector," responded Miss Peters. "I'll run and ask him when he
expects Mrs. Bertram. I'll be back presently with the news."

The little lady tripped away, forcing her slim form through the
ever-increasing crowd. The rector was walking about with a very favorite
small parishioner seated on his shoulder.

"Mr. Ingram," piped Miss Peters. "Don't you think Mrs. Bertram might
favor us with her presence by now? We have all been looking for her.
It's past five o'clock, and--"

There was a hush, a pause. At that moment Mrs. Bertram was sailing into
the room. Miss Peters' exalted tones reached her ears. She shuddered,
turned pale, and also turned her back on the eager little spinster.

Nobody quite knew how it was managed, but Mrs. Bertram was introduced to
very few of the Northbury folk. They all wanted to know her; they talked
about her, and came in her way, and stared at her whenever they could.
There was an expectant hush when she and the Rector were seen
approaching any special group.

"I do declare it's the Grays she's going to patronize," one jealous
matron said.

But the Grays were passed over just as sedulously as the Joneses and the
Smiths. Excitement, again and again on the tenter-hooks, invariably came
to nothing. Even Mrs. Gorman Stanley, who had sat on Mrs. Bertram's
sofa, and condemned her felt carpet was only acknowledged by the most
passing and stately recognition. Little chance had the poor lady of
effecting other introductions; she realized for the first time that she
was only a quarter introduced to the great woman herself.

The fact was this: There was not a soul in Northbury, at least there was
not an acknowledged soul who could combat Mrs. Bertram's will. She had
made up her mind to talk to no one but Mr. Ingram at the bazaar. She
carried out her resolve, and that though the Rector had formed such
pleasant visions of making every one cheerful and happy all round, for
he knew the simple weaknesses and desires of his flock, and saw not the
smallest harm in gratifying them. Why should not the Manor and the town
be friendly?

Mrs. Bertram saw a very good reason why they should not. Therefore the
Rector's dreams came apparently to nothing.




CHAPTER III.

A GENTLEMAN, MADAM.


Only apparently. Every one knows how small the little rift within the
lute is. So are most beginnings.

Mrs. Bertram felt, that in her way, she had effected quite a victory.
She stepped into her brougham to return to Rosendale Manor with a
pleasing sense of triumph.

"I am thankful to say that ordeal is over," she remarked. "And I think,"
she continued, with a smile, "that when the Northbury people see my
cards, awaiting them on their humble hall-tables, they will have learnt
their lesson."

Neither of the girls made any response to this speech. Mabel was leaning
back in the carriage looking bored and cross, but Catherine's expression
was unusually bright.

"Mother," she exclaimed suddenly, "I met such a nice girl at the
bazaar."

"You made an acquaintance at the bazaar, my dear Catherine," answered
Mrs. Bertram with alacrity. "You made an acquaintance? The acquaintance
of a girl? Who?"

"Her name is Beatrice Meadowsweet. She is a dear, delightful, fresh
girl, and exactly my own age."

Catherine's dark face was all aglow. Her handsome brown eyes shone with
interest and pleasure.

"Catherine, how often, how very often have I told you that expressions
of rapture such as you have just given way to are underbred."

"Why are they underbred, mother?" Catherine's tone was aggressive, and
Mabel again kicked her sister's foot.

The kick was returned with vigor, and Catherine said in an earnest
though deliberate voice:

"Why are expressions of rapture underbred? Can enthusiasm, that fire of
the gods, be vulgar?"

"Kate, you are cavilling. Expressions of rapture generally show a lack
of breeding because as a rule they are exaggerated, therefore untrue. In
this case they are manifestly untrue, for how is it possible for you to
tell that the girl you have just been speaking to is dear, delightful,
and fresh?"

"Her face is fresh, her manners are fresh, her expression is delightful.
There is no use, mother, you can't crush me. I am in love with Beatrice
Meadowsweet."

Mrs. Bertram's brow became clouded. It was one of the bitter defeats
which she had ever and anon to acknowledge to herself that, in the midst
of her otherwise victorious career, she could never get the better of
her eldest daughter Catherine.

"Who introduced you to this girl?" she asked, after a pause.

"The Rector. He saw me standing by one of the stalls, looking what I
felt--awfully bored. He came up in his kind way and took my hand, and
said: 'My dear, you don't know any one, I am afraid. You would like to
make some acquaintances, would you not?' I replied: 'I am most anxious
to know some of the nice people all around me.'"

"My dear Catherine! The _nice_ people! And when you knew my express
wishes!"

"Yes, mother, but they weren't mine. And I had to be truthful, at any
cost. Beatrice was standing not far off, and when I said this my eye met
hers, and we both smiled. Then the rector introduced me to her, and we
mutually voted the bazaar close and hot, and went out to watch the
tennis players in the garden. We had a jolly time. I have not laughed so
much since I came to this slow, poky corner of the world."

"And what were you doing, Mabel?" questioned her mother. "Did you, too,
pick up an undesirable acquaintance and march away into the gardens with
her? Was your new friend also fresh, delightful and dear?"

"I wish she had been, mother," answered Mabel, her tone still very
petulant. "But I hadn't Kate's luck. I was introduced to no one,
although lots of people stared at me, and whispered about me as I
passed."

"And you saw this paragon of Catherine's?"

"Yes, I saw her."

"What did you think of her, May? I like to get your opinion, my love.
You have a good deal of penetration. Tell me frankly what you thought of
this low-born miss, whom Catherine degraded herself by talking to."

Mabel looked at her sister. Catherine's eyes flashed. Mabel replied
demurely:

"I thought Miss Meadowsweet quiet-looking and graceful."

Catherine took Mabel's hand unnoticed by their mother and squeezed it,
and Mrs. Bertram, who was not wholly devoid of tact, thought it wisest
to let the conversation drop.

The next day the Rector called, and Mrs. Bertram asked him, in an
incidental way what kind of people the Meadowsweets were.

"Excellent people," he replied, rubbing his hands softly together.
"Excellent, worthy, honorable. I have few parishioners whom I think more
highly of than Beatrice and her mother."

Mrs. Bertram's brow began to clear.

"A mother and daughter," she remarked. "Only a mother and a daughter,
Mr. Ingram?"

"Only a mother and a daughter, my dear madam. Poor Meadowsweet left us
six years ago. He was one of my churchwardens, a capital fellow, so
thoroughgoing and reliable. A sound churchman, too. In short, everything
that one could desire. He died rather suddenly, and I was afraid Mrs.
Meadowsweet would leave Northbury, but Bee did not wish it. Bee has a
will of her own, and I fancy she's attached to us all."

"I am very glad that you can give us such a pleasant account of these
parishioners of yours, dear Mr. Ingram," responded Mrs. Bertram. "The
fact is, I am in a difficult position here. No, the girls won't overhear
us; they are busy at their embroidery in that distant corner. Well,
perhaps, to make sure. Kate," Mrs. Bertram raised her voice, "I know the
Rector is going to give us the pleasure of his company to tea. Mr.
Ingram, I shall not allow you to say no. Kate, will you and Mabel go
into the garden, and bring in a leaf of fresh strawberries. Now, Mr.
Ingram I want you to see our strawberries, and to taste them. The
gardener tells us that the Manor strawberries are celebrated. Run,
dears, don't be long."

The girls stepped out through the open French window, interlaced their
arms round one another and disappeared.

"They are good girls," said the mother, "but Kate has a will of her own.
Mr. Ingram, you will allow me to take you into my confidence. I am often
puzzled to know how to act towards Catherine. She is a good girl, but I
can't lead her. She is only seventeen, only just seventeen. Surely that
is too young an age to walk quite without leading strings."

Mr. Ingram was an old bachelor, but he was one of those mellow, gentle,
affectionate men who make the most delightful companions, whose sympathy
is always ready, and tact always to the fore. Mr. Ingram was full of
both sympathy and tact, but he had also a little gentle vanity to be
tickled, and when a handsome woman, still young, appealed to him with
pathos in her eyes and voice, he laid himself, metaphorically, at her
feet.

"My dear madam," he responded, "it is most gratifying to me to feel that
I can be of the least use to you. Command me at all times, I beg. As to
Miss Catherine, who can guide her better than her excellent mother? I
don't know much about you, Mrs. Bertram, but I feel--forgive me, I am a
man of intuition--I feel that you are one to look up to. Miss Catherine
is a fortunate girl. You are right. She is far too young to walk alone.
Seventeen, did you say--pooh--a mere child, a baby. An immature
creature, ignorant, innocent, fresh, but undeveloped; just the age, Mrs.
Bertram, when she needs the aid and counsel of a mother like you."

Mrs. Bertram's dark eyes glowed with pleasure.

"I am glad you agree with me," she said. "The fact is, Mr. Ingram, we
have come to the Manor to retrench a little, to economize, to live in
retirement. By-and-bye, I shall take Catherine and Mabel to London. As a
mother, I have duties to perform to them. These, when the time comes,
shall not be neglected. Mr. Ingram, I must be very frank, I _don't_
want to know the good folk of Northbury."

Mr. Ingram started at this very plain speaking. He had lived for thirty
years with the Northbury people. They had not vulgarized him; their
troubles and their pleasures alike were his. His heart and soul, his
life and strength were given up to them. He did not feel himself any the
less a gentleman because those whom he served were, many of them, lowly
born. He started, therefore, both inwardly and outwardly at Mrs.
Bertram's plain speech, and instantly, for he was a man of very nice
penetration, saw that the arrival of this lady, this brilliant sun of
society, in the little world of Northbury, would not add to the
smoothness of his lot.

Before he could get in a word, however, Mrs. Bertram quickly continued:

"And Catherine is determined to make a friend of Beatrice Meadowsweet."

"She is quite right, Mrs. Bertram. I introduced Miss Catherine to
Beatrice yesterday. They will make delightful companions; they are about
the same age--I can vouch for the life and spirit possessed by my friend
Bee, and if I mistake not Miss Catherine will be her worthy companion."

Mrs. Bertram laughed.

"I wish I could tell you what an imp of mischief Kate is," she said.
"She is the most daring creature that ever drew the breath of life. Dear
Mr. Ingram, forgive me for even doubting you for a moment. I might have
known that you would only introduce my daughter to a lady."

The Rector drew himself up a very little.

"Certainly, Beatrice Meadowsweet is a lady," he replied. "If a noble
heart, and frank and fearless ways, and an educated mind, and a refined
nature can make a lady, then she is one--no better in the land."

"I am charmed, _charmed_ to hear it. It is such a relief. For,
really Mr. Ingram, some people from Northbury came and sat on that very
sofa which you are occupying, who were quite too--oh, well, they were
absolutely dreadful. I wonder if Mrs. Meadowsweet has called. I don't
remember the name, but I suppose she has. I must look amongst the cards
which have absolutely been showered on us and see. I must certainly
return her visit and at once. Poor Mr. Meadowsweet--he was in the army
perhaps! I am quite glad to know there are people of our position here.
Did you say the army? Or perhaps a retired gentleman,--ah, I see
Catherine and Mabel coming back. Which was Mr. Meadowsweet's regiment?"

Poor Mr. Ingram's face grew absolutely pink.

"At some time in his life poor Meadowsweet may have served in the local
volunteers," he replied. "He was however, a--ah, Miss Catherine, what
tempting strawberries!"

The rector approached the open French window. Mrs. Bertram followed him
quickly.

"A--what?" she repeated. "The girls needn't know whom we are talking
about. A gentleman who lived on his private means?"

"A gentleman, madam, yes, a _gentleman_,--and he lived on his
means,--and he was wealthy. He kept a shop, a draper's shop, in the High
Street. Now, young ladies, young ladies--I call this wrong. _Such_
strawberries! Strawberries are my special weakness. Oh, it is cruel of
you to tempt me. I ought to be two miles from here now."

"You ought not," said Catherine in a gay voice. "You must sit with us on
the lawn, and drink our tea, and eat our strawberries."

Catherine had given a quick, lightning glance at her mother's face.
She saw a cloud there, she guessed the cause. She felt certain that her
mother would consult Mr. Ingram on the subject of Beatrice. Mr. Ingram's
report was not satisfactory. Delightful! She felt the imp of mischief
taking possession of her. She was a girl of many moods and tenses.
At times she could even be sombre. But when she chose to be gay and
fascinating she was irresistible. She was only seventeen, and in several
ways she was unconventional, even unworldly. In others, however, she was
a perfect woman of the world, and a match for her mother.




CHAPTER IV.

TWO LETTERS.


Northbury was so completely out of the world that it only had a postal
delivery twice a day. The early post was delivered at eight o'clock, so
that the good people of the place could discuss their little items of
outside news over their breakfast-tables. The postman went round with
his evening delivery at seven. He was not overwhelmed by the aristocracy
of Rosendale Manor, and, notwithstanding Mrs. Bertram's open annoyance,
insisted on calling there last. He said it suited him best to do so, and
what suited Sammy Benjafield he was just as determined to do, as Mrs.
Bertram was to carry out her own schemes.

Consequently, the evening letters never reached the Manor until between
eight and half-past. Mrs. Bertram and her daughters dined at seven. They
were the only people in Northbury who ate their dinner at that
aristocratic hour; tea between four and five, and hot, substantial and
unwholesome suppers were the order of the day with the Northbury folk.
_Very_ substantial these suppers were, and even the Rector was not
proof against the hot lobster and rich decoctions of crab with which his
flock favored him at these hours.

For the very reason, however, that heavy suppers were in vogue at
Northbury, Mrs. Bertram determined to adhere to the refinement of a
seven-o'clock dinner. Very refined and very simple this dinner generally
was. The fare often consisting of soup made out of vegetables from the
garden, with a very slight suspicion of what housekeepers call stock to
start it; fish, which meant as often as not three simple but fresh
herrings; a morsel of meat curried or hashed would generally follow; and
dessert and sweets would in the summer be blended into one;
strawberries, raspberries or gooseberries from the garden forming the
necessary materials. Cream did not accompany the strawberries, and the
rich wine in the beautiful and curiously-cut decanters was placed on the
table for show, not for use.

But then the dinners at the Manor were so exquisitely served. Such
napery, such china, such sparkling and elegant glass, and such
highly-polished plate. Poor little Clara, the serving-maid, who had not
yet acquired the knack of telling a lie with _sang froid_
absolutely trembled, as she spread out her snowy table-cloths, and laid
her delicate china and glass and silver on the board.

"It don't seem worth while," she often remarked to the cook. "For what's
an' erring? It seems wicked to eat an' erring off sech plates as them."

"It's a way the quality have," retorted Mrs. Masters, who had come from
London with the Bertrams and did not mean to stay. "They heats nothing,
and they lives on _sham_. Call _this_ soup! There, Clara, you'll be
a sham yourself before you has done with them."

Clara thought this highly probable, but she was still young and
romantic, and could do a great deal of living on make-beliefs, like many
other girls all the world over.

As the Bertrams were eating their strawberries off delicate Sevres
plates on the evening of the day when Mr. Ingram had disclosed the
parentage of poor Beatrice Meadowsweet, the postman was seen passing the
window.

Benjafield had a very slow and aggravating gait. The more impatient
people were for their letters, the more tedious was he in his delivery.
Benjafield had been a fisherman in his day, and had a very sharp,
withered old face. He had a blind eye, too, and walked by the aid of a
crutch but it was his boast that, notwithstanding his one eye and his
lameness, no one had ever yet got the better of him.

"There's Benjafield!" exclaimed Mabel. "Shall I run and fetch the
letters, mother?"

Mrs. Bertram rose slowly from her seat at the head of the board.

"The post is later than ever," she remarked; "it is past the half-hour.
I shall go myself and speak to Benjafield."

She walked slowly out through the open window. She wore an evening dress
of rusty black velvet with a long train. It gave her a very imposing
appearance, and the effect of her evening dress and her handsome face
and imperious manners were so overpowering that the old postman, as he
hobbled toward her, had to mutter under his breath:

"Don't forget your game leg, Benjafield, nor your wall eye, and don't
you be tooken down nor beholden to nobody."

"Why is the post so late?" inquired Mrs. Bertram. "It is more than
half-past eight."

"Eh!" exclaimed Benjafleld.

"I asked why the post was so late."

"Eh? I'm hard of hearing, your ladyship."

He came a little nearer, and leered up in the most familiar way into the
aristocratic face of Mrs. Bertram.

"Intolerable old man," she muttered, aloud: "Take the letters from him,
Catherine, and bring them here."

Then raising her voice to a thin scream, she continued:

"I shall write to the general post-office on this subject; it is quite
intolerable that in any part of England Her Majesty's Post should be
entrusted to incapable hands."

Old Benjafield, fumbling in his bag, produced two letters which he
presented to Catherine. He did so with a dubious, inquiring glance at
her mother, again informed the company generally that he was hard of
hearing, and hobbled away.

One of the letters, addressed in a manly and dashing hand, was for
Catherine. The other, also in manly but decidedly cramped writing, was
addressed to Mrs. Bertram.

She started when she saw the handwriting, instantly forgot old
Benjafield, and disappeared into the house.

When she was gone Mabel danced up to her sister's side, and looked over
her shoulder at the thick envelope addressed in the manly hand.

"Kate, it's from Loftie!" she exclaimed.

"Yes, it's from Loftie," responded Catherine. "Let us come and sit under
the elm-tree and read what he says, May."

The girls seated themselves together on a rustic bench, tore open the
thick letter, and acquainted themselves with its contents.


  "Dearest,--I'm coming home to-morrow night. _Must_ see the mater.
  Have got into a fresh scrape. Don't tell anyone but May--I mean about
  the scrape.

  "Your devoted brother,

  "LOFTUS."


Catherine read this letter twice, once to herself, then aloud for
Mabel's benefit.

"Now, what's up?" exclaimed Mabel. "It must be very bad. He never calls
you 'dearest;' unless it's awfully bad. Does he, Kitty?"

"No," said Catherine. "Poor mother," she added then, and she gave a
profound and most ungirlish sigh.

"Why, Catherine, you have been grumbling at mother all day! You have
been feeling so cross about her."

"You never will understand, Mabel! I grumble at mother for her
frettiness, but I love her, I pity her for her sorrows."

Mabel looked full into her sister's face.

"I confess I don't understand you," she said. "I can't love one side of
a person, and hate the other side; I don't know that I love or hate
anybody very much. It's more comfortable not to do things very much,
isn't it, Kitty?"

"I suppose so," replied Catherine, "but I can't say. That isn't my
fashion. I do everything very much. I love, I hate, I joy or sorrow, all
in extremes. Perhaps it isn't a good way, but it's the only way I've
got. Now let us talk about Loftus. I wonder if he is going to stay long,
and if he will make himself pleasant."

"No fear of that," responded Mabel. "He'll be as selfish and exacting as
ever he can be. He'll keep mother in a state of fret, and you in a state
of excitement, and he'll insist on smoking a cigarette close to the new
cretonne curtains in the drawing-room, and he'll make me go out in the
hot part of the day to gather fresh strawberries for him. Oh, I do think
brothers are worries! I wish he wasn't coming. We are very peaceful and
snug here. And mother's face doesn't looked harassed as it often did
when we were in town. I do wish Loftus wasn't coming to upset
everything. It was he turned us away from our nice, sprightly, jolly
London, and now, surely he need not follow us into the country. Yes,
Catherine, what words of wisdom or reproof are going to drop from your
lips?"

"Not any," replied Catherine. "I can't make blind people see, and I
can't bring love when there is no love to bring. Of course, it is
different for me."

"How is it different for you?"

"I love Loftus. He gives me pain, but that can be borne, for I love
him."

At this moment Mrs. Bertram's tall figure was seen standing on the steps
of the house. It was getting dark; a heavy dew was falling, and the air
was slightly, pleasantly chill after the intense heat of the day. Mrs.
Bertram had wrapped a white fleecy cloud over her head. She descended
the steps, stood on the broad gravel sweep, and looked around her.

"We are here, mother," said May, jumping up. "Do you want us?"

"I want Catherine. Don't you come, Mabel. I want Catherine alone."

"Keep Loftus's letter," said Catherine, tossing it into her sister's
lap. "I know by mother's tone she is troubled. Don't let us show her the
letter to-night. Put it in your pocket, May."

Aloud she said,--

"Yes, mother, I'm coming. I'll be with you directly." She ran across the
grass, looking slim and pale in her white muslin dress, her face full of
intense feeling, her manner so hurried and eager that her mother felt
irritated by it.

"You need not dash at me as if you meant to knock me down, Kate," she
said.

"You said you wanted me, mother."

"So I did, Catherine. I do want you. Come into the house with me."

Mrs. Bertram turned and walked up the steps. She entered the wide hall
which was lit by a ghostly, and not too carefully-trimmed, paraffin
lamp. Catherine followed her. They went into the drawing-room. Here also
a paraffin lamp gave an uncertain light; very feeble, yellow, and
uncertain it was, but even by it Catherine could catch a glimpse of her
mother's face. It was drawn and white, it was not only changed from the
prosperous, handsome face which the girl had last looked at, but it had
lost its likeness to the haughty, the proud, the satisfied Mrs. Bertram
of Catherine's knowledge. Its expression now betokened a kind of inward
scare or fright.

"Mother, you have something to worry you," said Kate, "I see that by
your face. I am sorry. I am truly sorry. Sit down, mother. What can I do
for you?"

"Nothing, my dear, except to be an attentive daughter--attentive and
affectionate and obedient. Sometimes, Catherine, you are not that."

"Oh, never mind now, when you are in trouble, I'd do anything in the
world for you when you are in trouble. You know that."

Mrs. Bertram had seated herself. Catherine knelt now, and took one of
her mother's hands between her own. Insensibly the cold hand was
comforted by the warm steadfast clasp.

"You are a good child, Kate," said her mother in an unwonted and gentle
voice. "You are full of whims and fancies; but when you like you can be
a great support to one. Do you remember long ago when your father died
how only little Kitty's hand could cure mother's headaches?"

"I would cure your heartache now."

"You can't, child, you can't. And besides, who said anything about a
heartache? We have no time, Kate, to talk any more sentimentalities. I
have had a letter, my dear, and it obliges me to go to town to-night."

"To-night? Surely there is no train?"

"There is. One stops at Northbury to take up the mails at a quarter to
twelve. I shall go by it."

"Do you want me to go with you?"

"By no means. Of what use would you be?"

"I don't know. Perhaps not of any use, and yet long ago when you had
headaches, Kitty could cure them."

There was something so pathetic and so unwonted in Catherine's tone that
Mrs. Bertram was quite touched. She bent forward, placed her hand under
the young chin, raised the handsome face, and printed a kiss on the
brow.

"Kitty shall help her mother best by staying at home," she said.
"Seriously, my love. I must leave you in charge here. Not only in charge
of the house, of the servants, of Mabel--but--of my secret."

"What secret, mother?"

"I don't want any one here to know that I have gone to London."

Catherine thought a moment.

"I know you are not going to give me your reasons," she said, after a
pause. "But why do you tell me there is a secret?"

"Because you are trustworthy."

"Why do tell _me_ that you are going to London?"

"Because you must be prepared to act in an emergency."

"Mother, what do you mean?"

"I will tell you enough of my meaning to guide you, my love. I have had
some news that troubles me. I am going to London to try and put some
wrong things right. You need not look so horrified, Kate; I shall
certainly put them right. It might complicate matters in certain
quarters if it were known that I had gone to London, therefore I do it
secretly. It is necessary, however, that one person should know where to
write to me. I choose you to be that person, Catherine, but you are only
to send me a letter in case of need."

"If we are ill, or anything of that sort, mother?"

"Nothing of that sort. You and Mabel are in superb health. I am not
going to prepare for any such unlikely contingency as your sudden
illness. Catherine, these are the _only_ circumstances under which
you are to communicate with your mother. Listen, my dear daughter.
Listen attentively. A good deal depends on your discretion. A stranger
may call. The stranger may be either a man or a woman. He or she will
ask to see me. Finding I am away this person, whether man or woman, will
try to have an interview with either you or Mabel, and will endeavor by
every means to get my address. Mabel, knowing nothing, can reveal
nothing, and you, Kate, you are to put the stranger on the wrong scent,
to get rid of the stranger by some means, and immediately to telegraph
to me. My address is in this closed-up envelope. Lock the envelope in
your desk; open it if the contingency to which I have alluded occurs,
not otherwise. And now, my dear child, I must go upstairs and pack."

Catherine roused herself from her kneeling position with difficulty. She
felt cold and stiff, queer and old.

"Shall I help you, mother," she asked.

"No, my dear, I shall ring for Clara. I shall tell Clara that I am going
to Manchester. A train to Manchester can be taken from Fleet-hill
Junction, so it will all sound quite natural. Go out to Mabel, dear.
Tell her any story you like."

"I don't tell stories, mother. I shall have nothing to say to Mabel."

"Tell her nothing, then; only run away. What is the matter now?"

"One thing before you go, mother. I too had a letter to-night."

"Had you, my dear? I cannot be worried about your correspondence now."

"My letter was from Loftie."

"Loftus! What did he write about?"

"He is coming here to-morrow night."

Catherine glanced eagerly into her mother's face as she spoke. It did
not grow any whiter or any more careworn.

She stood still for a moment in the middle of the drawing-room,
evidently thinking deeply. When she spoke her brow had cleared and her
voice was cheerful.

"This may be for the best," she said.

Catherine stamped her foot impatiently.

"Mother," she said, "you quite frighten me with your innuendoes and your
half-confidences. I don't understand you. It is very difficult to act
when one only half understands."

"I cannot make things plainer for you, my dear. I am glad Loftie is
coming. You girls must entertain him as well as you can. This is
Wednesday evening. I hope to be back at the latest on Monday. It is
possible even that I may transact my business sooner. Keep Loftus in a
good temper, Kate. Don't let him quarrel with Mabel, and, above all
things, do not breathe to a soul that your mother has gone to London.
Now, kiss me, dear. It is a comfort to have a grown-up daughter to lean
on."




CHAPTER V.

THE USUAL SORT OF SCRAPE.


On the following evening Loftus Bertram made his appearance at Rosendale
Manor. Catherine and Mabel were both waiting for him under the shade of
the great oak tree which commanded a view of the gate. His train was due
at Northbury at seven o'clock. He was to come by express from London,
and the girls concluded that the express would not be more than five
minutes late. Allowing for this, and allowing also for the probability
that Loftus would be extremely discontented with the style of hackney
coach which alone would await him at the little station and might in
consequence prefer to walk to the Manor, the girls calculated he might
put in an appearance on the scene at about twenty minutes past seven.
They had arranged to have dinner at a quarter to eight, and sat side by
side now, looking a little forlorn in the frocks they had grown out of,
and a little lonely, like half-fledged chicks, without their mother's
august protection.

"Loftie will wonder," said Mabel, "at mother going off to Manchester in
such a hurry."

It was the cook who had told Mabel about Manchester, Clara having
informed her.

"There's Loftus!" suddenly exclaimed Catherine. "I knew he'd walk. I
said so. There's the old shandrydan crawling after him with the luggage.
Come, Mabel. Let's fly to meet the dear old boy."

She was off and away herself before Mabel had time to scramble to her
feet. Her running was swift as a fawn's--in an instant she had reached
her brother--threw herself panting with laughter and joy against him,
and flung one arm round his neck.

"Here you are!" she said, her words coming out in gasps. "Isn't it
jolly? Such a fresh old place! Lots of strawberries--glad you'll see it
in the long days--give me a kiss, Loftie--I'm hungry for a kiss!"

"You're as wild an imp as ever," said Loftus, pinching her cheek, but
stooping and kissing her, nevertheless, with decided affection. "Why did
you put yourself out of breath, Kitty? Catch May setting her precious
little heart a-beating too fast for any fellow! Ah, here you come, lazy
Mabel. Where is the mater? In the house, I suppose? I say, Kate, what a
hole you have pitched upon for living in? I positively couldn't ride
down upon the thing they offered me at the station. It wasn't even
_clean_. Look at it, my dear girls! It holds my respectable
belongings, and not me. It's the scarecrow or ghost of the ordinary
station-fly. Could you have imagined the station-fly could have a
ghost?"

"No," retorted Mabel, "being so scarecrowy and ghost-like already.
Please, driver, take Captain Bertram's things up to the house. He heard
you speak, Loftie. These Northbury people are as touchy as if they were
somebodies. Oh, Loftus, you will be disappointed. Mother has gone to
Manchester."

"To Manchester?" retorted Loftus. "My mother away from home! Did she
know that I was coming?"

"Yes," answered Kate, "I told her about your letter last night."

"Did you show her my letter?"

"No."

"Why didn't you? If she had read it she wouldn't have gone. I said I was
in a scrape. I was coming down on purpose to see the mater. You might
have sent me a wire to say she would not be at home, or you might have
kept her at home by showing her my letter. You certainly did not act
with discretion."

"I said you'd begin to scold the minute you came here, Loftie," remarked
Mabel. "It's a way you have. I told Kitty so. See, you have made poor
Kitty quite grave."

Loftus Bertram was a tall, slim, young fellow. He was well-made,
athletic, and neat in appearance, and had that upright carriage and
bearing which is most approved of in her Majesty's army. His face was
thin and dark; he had a look of Kate, but his eyes were neither so large
nor so full; his mouth was weak, not firm, and his expression wanted the
openness which characterized Catherine's features.

He was a selfish man, but he was not unkind or ill-natured. The news
which the girls gave him of their mother's absence undoubtedly worried
and annoyed him a good deal, but like most people who are popular, and
Loftus Bertram was undoubtedly very popular, he had the power of
instantly adapting himself to the exigencies of the moment.

He laughed lightly, therefore, at Mabel's words, put his arm round his
younger sister's unformed waist, and said, in a gay voice:

"I won't scold either of you any more until I have had something to
eat."

"We live very quietly at the Manor," remarked Mabel, "Mother wants to
save, you know. She says we must keep up our refinement at any cost, but
our meals are very--" she glanced with a gay laugh at Catherine.

"Oh, by Jove! I hope you don't stint in the matter of food," exclaimed
the brother. "You'll have to drop it while I'm here, I can tell you. I
thought the mater would be up to some little game of this kind when she
buried you alive in such an out-of-the-way corner. She makes a great
mistake though, and so I shall tell her. Young girls of your age ought
to be fed up. You'll develop properly then, you won't otherwise. That's
the new dodge. All the doctors go upon it. Feed up the young to any
extent, and they'll pay for it by-and-bye. Plenty of good English beef
and mutton. What's the matter, Kate? What are you laughing in that
immoderate manner for?"

"Oh, nothing, Loftie. I may laugh, I suppose, without saying why. I wish
you would not put on that killing air, though. And you know perfectly
there is no use in laying down the law in mother's house."

The three young people were now standing in the hall, and Clara tripped
timidly forward.

"We want dinner as quickly as possible, Clara," said Mabel. "Come,
Loftus, let us take you to your room."

That night the choicely served repast was less meagre than usual. Caller
herring graced the board in abundance, and even Loftus did not despise
these, when really fresh and cooked to perfection. The hash of New
Zealand mutton, however, which followed, was not so much to this
fastidious young officer's taste, but quantities of fine strawberries,
supplemented by a jug of rich cream, put him once more into a good
humor. He did not know that Kate had spent one of her very scarce
sixpences on the cream, and that the girls had walked a mile-and-a-half
through the hot sun that morning to fetch it.

The decanters of wine did not only do duty as ornaments that evening,
and as the black coffee which followed was quite to Loftus' taste, he
forgot the New Zealand mutton, or, at least, determined not to speak on
the subject before the next morning.

After Mabel went to bed that night Kate asked her brother what the fresh
scrape was about. He was really in an excellent humor then; the
seclusion and almost romance of the old place soothed his nerves, which
were somewhat jaded with the rush and tear of a life not lived too
worthily. He and Kitty were strolling up and down in the moonlight, and
when she asked her question and looked up at him with her fine,
intelligent, sympathetic face, he pulled her little ear affectionately,
and pushed back the tendrils of soft, dark hair from her brow.

"The usual thing, Kitty," he responded. "I'm in the usual sort of
scrape."

"Money?" asked Catherine.

"Confound the thing, yes. Why was money invented? It's the plague of
one's life, Catherine. If there was no money there'd be no crime."

"Nonsense," answered Catherine, with shrewdness. "If there wasn't money
there would be its equivalent in some form or other. Are you in debt
again, Loftie?"

"How can I help it? I can't live on my pittance."

"But mother gives you three hundred a year."

"Yes--such a lot! You girls think that a fine sum, I suppose! That's all
you know. Three hundred! It's a pittance. No fellow has a right to go
into the army with such small private means."

"But, Loftie, you would not accept Uncle Roderick Macleod's offer. He
wrote so often, and said he could help you if you joined him in India."

"Yes, I knew what that meant. Now, look here, Kate. We needn't rake up
the past. My lot in life is fixed. I like my profession, but I can't be
expected to care for the beggary which accompanies it. I'm in a scrape,
and I want to see the mater."

"Poor mother! I _wish_ you weren't going to worry her, Loftie."

"It doesn't worry a mother to help her only son."

"But she has helped you so often. You know it was on account of you that
we came down here, because mother had given you so much, and it was the
only way left to us to save. It wasn't at all a good thing for Mabel and
me, for we had to leave our education unfinished. But mother thought it
best. What's the matter, Loftie?"

"Only if you're going on in this strain I'm off to bed. It is hard on a
fellow when he comes once in a while to see his sisters to be called
over the coals by them. You know I'm awfully fond of you, Kitty, and
somehow I thought you'd be a comfort to me. You know very little indeed
of the real worries of life."

Loftus spoke in a tone of such feeling that Catherine's warm heart was
instantly touched.

"I won't say any more," she answered. "I know it isn't right of me. I
always wished and longed to be a help to you, Loftie."

"So you can. You are a dear little sis when you like. You're worth
twenty of May. I think you are going to be a very handsome girl, Kate,
and if you are only fed up properly, and dressed properly, so that the
best points of your figure can be seen--well--now what's the matter?"

"Only I won't have you talking of me as if I were going to be put up to
auction."

"So you will be when you go to London. All girls are. The mothers are
the auctioneers, and the young fellows come round and bid. Good
gracious, what a thunder-cloud! What flashing eyes! You'll see what a
famous auctioneer mother will make! What is the matter, Kitty?"

"Nothing. Good-night. I'm going to bed."

"Come back and kiss me first. Poor little Kit! Dear, handsome,
fiery-spirited little Kit! I say though, _what_ a shabby frock
you've got on!"

"Oh, don't worry me, Loftie! Any dress will do in the country."

"Right, most prudent Catherine. By the way, when did you say mother
would come back?"

"Perhaps on Monday."

"What did she go to Manchester for?"

"I can't tell you."

"Well, I trust she will be back on Monday evening, for I am due at the
Depot on Tuesday. Lucky for me I got a week's leave, but I didn't mean
to see it out. It will be uncommonly awkward if I cannot get hold of the
mater between now and Tuesday, Kate."

"Loftus--_are_ you going to ask her to give you much money?"

"My dear child, you would think the sum I want enormous, but it isn't
really. Most fellows would consider it a trifle. And I don't want her
really to give it, Kate, only to lend it. That's altogether a different
matter, isn't it? Of course I could borrow it elsewhere, but it seems a
pity to pay a lot of interest when one's mother can put one straight."

"I don't know how you are to pay the money back, Loftus."

Loftus laughed.

"There are ways and means," he said. "Am I going to take all the bloom
off that young cheek by letting its owner into the secrets of Vanity
Fair? Come Kitty, go to bed, and don't fret about me, I'll manage
somehow."

"Loftus, how much money do you want mother to lend you?"

"What a persistent child you are. You positively look frightened. Well,
three fifty will do for the present. That oughtn't to stump anyone,
ought it?"

"I suppose not," answered Kate, in a bewildered way.

She put her hand to her forehead, bade her brother good-night, and
sought her room.

"Three hundred and fifty pounds!" she murmured. "And mother won't buy
herrings more than eightpence a dozen! And we scarcely eat any meat, and
lately we have begun even to save the bread. Three hundred and fifty
pounds! Well, I won't tell Mabel. Does Mabel really know the world
better than I do, and is it wrong of me in spite of everything to love
Loftus?"




CHAPTER VI.

FOR MY PART, I AM NOT GOING TO TAKE ANY NOTICE OF THE BERTRAMS.


But notwithstanding all worries, the world in midsummer, when the days
are longest and the birds sing their loudest, is a gay place for the
young. Catherine Bertram stayed awake for quite an hour that night. An
hour was a long time for such young and bright eyes to remain wide open,
and she fancied with a wave of self-pity how wrinkled and old she would
look in the morning. Not a bit of it! She arose with the complexion of a
Hebe, and the buoyant and gladsome spirit of a lark.

As she dressed she sang, and when she ran downstairs she whistled a
plantation melody with such precision and clearness that Loftus
exclaimed, "Oh, how shocking!" and Mabel rolled up her eyes, and said
sagely, that no one ever could turn Kate into anything but a tom-boy.

"Girls, what are we to do after breakfast?" asked the brother.

"Have you any money at all in your pocket, Loftie?" demurely asked
Mabel, "for if so, if so--" her eyes danced, "I can undertake to provide
a pleasant day for us all."

"Well, puss, I don't suppose an officer in her Majesty's Royal
Artillery--is quite without some petty cash. How much do you want?"

"A few shillings will do. Let us pack up a picnic basket. Kate, you
needn't look at me. I have taken Mrs. Masters into confidence, and
there's a cold roast fowl downstairs--and--and--but I won't reveal
anything further. We can have a picnic--we can go away an hour after
breakfast, and saunter to that place known as the Long Quay, and hire
the very best boat to be had for money, and we can float about on this
lovely harbor, and land presently on the shore over there where the
ruins of the old Port are; and we can eat our dinners there and be
jolly. Remember that we have never but once been on the water since we
came. Think how we have pined for this simple pleasure, Loftie, and fork
out the tin."

"My dear Mabel, I must place my interdict on slang."

"Nonsense. When the cat's away. Oh, don't look shocked! Are we to go?"

"Go! of course we'll go. Is there no pretty girl who'll come with us?
It's rather slow to have only one's sisters."

"Very well, Loftus. We'll pay you out presently," said Kate.

"And there is a very pretty girl," continued Mabel, "At least Catherine
considers her very pretty--only--" her eyes danced with mischief.

"Only what?"

"The mother doesn't like her. There's a dear old Rector here, and he
introduced the girl to Kitty, and mother was wild. Mother sounded the
Rector the next day and heard something which made her wilder still, but
we are not in the secret. Kate fell in love with the girl."

"Did you, Kate? When a woman falls in love with another woman the
phenomenon is so uncommon that a certain amount of interest must be
roused. Describe the object of your adoration, Kitty."

"Her name," responded Kate, "is Beatrice Meadowsweet. I won't say any
more about her. If ever you meet her, which isn't likely, you can judge
for yourself of her merits."

"Kitty is rather cross about Beatrice," said Mabel; then she continued,
"Loftie, what do you think? Mother has cut all the Northbury folk."

"Mabel, you talk very wild nonsense."

It was Kate who spoke. She rose from the breakfast-table with an annoyed
expression.

"Wild or not--it is true," replied Mabel. "Mother has cut the Northbury
people, cut them dead. They came to see us, they came in troops. Such
funny folk! The first lot were let in. Mother was like a poker. She
astonished her visitors, and the whole scene was so queer and
uncomfortable, although mother was freezingly _polite_, that Kate
and I got out of the room. The next day more people came--and more, and
more every day, but Clara had her orders, and we weren't 'at home.'
Kitty and I used to watch the poor Northburians from behind the
summer-house. One day Kitty laughed. It was awful, and I am sure they
heard.

"Another day a dreadful little woman with rolling eyes said she would
leave a tract on _Lying_ in the avenue--I wish she had. But I
suppose she thought better of it.

"Then there came a bazaar, a great bazaar, and the Rector invited us,
and said all the Northburians would be there. What do you think mother
did? She returned their calls on that day. She knew they'd be out, and
they were. Wasn't that a dead cut, Loftie?"

"Rather," responded Loftus.

He rose slowly, looked deliberately at Kate, and then closed his lips.

"Mother is away, so we won't discuss her," said Kate. "Run and pack the
picnic basket, Mabel, and then we'll be off."

The picturesque little town of Northbury was built on the slope of a
hill. This hill gently descended to the sea. Nowhere was there to be
found a more charming, landlocked harbor than at Northbury. It was a
famous harbor for boating. Even at low tide people could get on the
water, and in the summer time this gay sheet of dark blue sparkling
waves had many small yachts, fishing smacks, and row-boats of all sizes
and descriptions skimming about on its surface. In the spring a large
fishing trade was done here, and then the steamers whistle? and
shrieked, and disturbed the primitive harmony of the place. But by
midsummer the great shoals of mackerel went away, and with them the dark
picturesque hookers, and the ugly steamers, and the inhabitants were
once more left to their sleepy, old-fashioned, but withal pleasant life.

Rosendale Manor was situated on high ground. It was surrounded by a
wall, and the wide avenue was entered by ponderous iron gates. It was
about eleven o'clock when the girls and their brother started gayly off
for their day on the water. Loftus carried a couple of rugs, so that the
fact of Mabel lugging a heavy picnic basket on her sturdy left arm did
not look specially remarkable. They went down a steep and straggling
hill, passed through an old-fashioned green, with the local club at one
side, and a wall at the other which seemed to hang right over the sea.

They soon reached the Long Quay, and made their bargain for the best
boat to be had. A man of the name of Driver kept many boats for hire,
and he offered now to accompany the young party and show off the
beauties of the place.

This, however, Mabel would not hear of. They must go alone or not at
all. Loftus did not like to own to his very small nautical experience;
the sea was smooth and shining, and apparently free from all danger, and
the little party embarked gayly, and put out on their first cruise in
high spirits.

Miss Peters and Mrs. Butler watched them with intense interest from
their bay window. Miss Peters had possession of the spy-glass. With this
held steadily before her eyes, she shouted observations to her sister.

"There they go! No, Dan Driver is _not_ going with them! Any one
can see by the way that young man handles the oar that he doesn't know a
great deal about the water. Good gracious, Martha, they're taking a sail
with them! Now I do call that tempting Providence. That young man has a
very elegant figure, Martha, but mark my words he knows nothing at all
about the management of a boat. The girls know still less."

"Put down your spy-glass for a moment, and let me speak to you, Maria,"
exclaimed Mrs. Butler in an exasperated voice. "I never knew such a
tongue as yours for clap, clap, clapping. Did you say those two Bertram
girls were going out alone with a _man_! Well, I have known what to
think for some time! Alone on the water with a _young man_. Surely,
Maria, you must have made a mistake."

"It's just like you, Martha, you never believe in any one's eyes but
your own. Here's the glass, look for yourself. If that isn't a man, and
a young man, and a stylish, handsome man, my name isn't Maria Peters."

"You'd be very glad if your name wasn't Peters," replied the irate
sister. "But I fear me there's little likelihood of your changing it
now. Ah, here's Beatrice Meadowsweet. Good-morning, Bee, my dear. How's
your dear mother? Is her poor precious cough any better?"

"Come here, Bee," said Miss Peters. "Come over to the window this
minute, and use your young eyes. Who are those people in Dan Driver's
boat? There, you tell Martha, she wont believe me."

"Those are the Bertrams," exclaimed Beatrice.

She put up her hand to shade her eyes, and took a long steadfast look
over the shining water.

"Those are the Bertrams, and of course, their brother."

"Oh, my dear Bee, how you have relieved me!" exclaimed Mrs. Butler.

She re-seated herself on a settee which stood near, and took her
handkerchief to wipe out some wrinkles of anxiety from her stout face.

Beatrice stared in astonishment.

"I don't quite understand," she said.

"My dear! I feared something improper was going on. A young man, not a
relation, out alone on the water with two girls! That's the kind of
thing we don't allow, in Northbury, Bee. Now, what's the matter?"

"Look," said Beatrice, "look! They are putting up the sail, and they are
not doing it right. They oughtn't all three to stand up in the boat
together. It will capsize! Oh, I must fly to them. Good-bye, Mrs.
Butler. Mother would like to see you at tea, to-night. Good-bye, Miss
Peters."

She rushed away, and the next moment was down on the quay. Three moments
later she was speeding with swift long strokes across the harbor in her
own beautifully appointed row-boat.

Her dress was of dark blue serge, with white collar and cuffs. Her hat
was a simple sailor one. The exercise brought the color into her cheeks,
and her big somewhat pathetic gray eyes were bright.

"There she goes!" exclaimed Miss Peters. "Never saw such a girl. Doesn't
she handle her oars with a touch? Oh, of course she is off to the rescue
of those poor bunglers. And I daresay they don't think her good enough
to speak to."

"Good enough!" exclaimed Mrs. Butler. "She's twice too good for any one
of them. Didn't her dress fit neat, Maria? Well, I hope she won't get
let in by their fine ways. For my part, I'm not going to take any notice
of the Bertrams. The way they behaved was past enduring. Not at homing
when I called, and then leaving their cards on the day when I was at the
bazaar. Highty-tighty, says I, who's Mrs. Bertram that she should look
down on us in this fashion? Isn't the widow of a good honest butter
merchant who paid his way, and left a comfortable fortune behind him,
fit to associate with any lady of the land? Mrs. Bertram, indeed! A nice
way she has treated us all. It isn't every newcomer we Northbury folks
would take up. We hold ourselves high, that we do. Now, what's the
matter, Maria?"

"We didn't hold ourselves high about Mrs. Bertram," replied Miss Peters.
"It isn't fair to say that we did. We all rushed up to call before she
had the carpets well down. I did say, Martha, and you may remember too
that I said it, for you were helping me to the tail of the salmon at the
time, and I remarked that there was little or nothing to eat on it,
you'll remember that I said to you: 'let them put their carpets straight
at least.' But you wouldn't--you were all agog to be off, when you saw
that Mrs. Gorman Stanley had gone up there in her new bonnet, with the
red and yellow poppies--the bonnet you know that she said she got from
London."

"Which she didn't," snapped Mrs. Butler; "for I saw those identical
poppies in Perry's shop on the quay. Well, well, Maria, I may have been
a bit hasty in rushing after those who didn't want me, but the result
would have been all the same. Maria, there's only one solution of the
way we have been treated by that proud, stuck-up, conceited body. Maria,
she doesn't pay her way."

Miss Peters rolled her eyes with a quick dart at her sister.

"They do say she's very close in the kitchen," she remarked; "and the
butcher told Susan that they only go in for New Zealand."

Mrs. Butler rose from her seat, to express more markedly her disgust for
colonial viands.

"Ugh!" she said. "Catch me putting a morsel of that poisonous stuff
inside my mouth. Well, well, you'll see I'm right, Maria. She don't pay
her way, so she's ashamed, and well she may be, to look honest folk in
the face."

"Beatrice has got up to the other boat," interrupted Miss Peters. Give
me the glass, quickly, Martha. My word, the two boats are touching.
And--would you believe it?--one of the young ladies is getting into
Bee's boat, Martha. She's towing Driver's boat after her own! Well,
well, that will be nuts to Mrs. Bertram. I declare, Martha, I shouldn't
be one bit surprised if that young jackanapes of a brother fell in love
with our Bee."

"He won't get her for his pains," retorted Mrs. Butler. "Those who don't
pay their way won't touch Beatrice Meadowsweet's fortune. But, there,
I'm sick of the subject. Let's talk of something else. Isn't that Mrs.
Gorman Stanley coming down the street? Open the window and call out to
her, Maria. Ask her if she wants me to send her round one pound of
butter, or two from the farm?"




CHAPTER VII.

REPLY FOR US, KATE.


Beatrice Meadowsweet and the Bertrams spent a delightful day together.
The Bertrams frankly owned their inability to manage a boat. They
welcomed her timely assistance, and thanked her for offering it, and
then the young folk laughed and joked together, the Bertrams secretly
finding Beatrice all the more interesting and fascinating because they
knew that their mother would not quite approve of their being found in
her society.

Beatrice told them about the harbor, took Kate into her boat, instructed
Loftus how to manage his sail, and showed him the difference between
rowing on a river and on the sea. Finally, she frankly accepted their
suggestion that she should join their impromptu picnic. They landed on
the green banks of that part of the coast which contained the ruins of
an ancient Danish fort. There they kindled a fire, boiled a kettle of
water, made tea, enjoyed bread-and-butter, cold chicken and
strawberries, and had an exceedingly festive time.

When the meal was over Bertram asked Miss Meadowsweet to show him over
the fort. She complied at once, in that easy, unconcerned manner which
gave her a certain charm, and which in itself was the perfection of
good-breeding. Mabel was about to follow, but Kate caught hold of her
skirt.

"Help me to wash up," she said.

When the girls were alone, Mabel burst into a peal of laughter.

"Oh, what a time the little mice are having!" she exclaimed. "What a
time! I only wish that nice Beatrice of yours had a couple of brothers
as charming as herself. Then our state would approach perfection."

"May, you oughtn't to talk in that silly fashion. No one hates
leading-strings as I do, and I'm determined that mother shall allow me
to make Miss Meadowsweet my friend. But this meeting seems like taking
advantage of mother's absence; it does really, and although we could not
help ourselves, I am sorry about it."

"Well, I'm not. We have had a delicious time, and I think, too, we owe
our lives to Miss Bee. Loftie was making an awful mess of that sail, and
you know, Kate, none of us can swim. Now look at Loftie, do look at him!
See how he's bending towards Miss Meadowsweet. He is quite taken with
her, I can see. Oh, what a flirt he is. Doesn't she hold herself nicely,
Kate? And hasn't she an independent sort of way?"

"Yes," responded Catherine. "I think even mother must own that Beatrice
is in good style. I knew that the moment she spoke to me."

"They are coming back," said Mabel. "Just toss me over that towel,
please, Kate. Don't you think I provided a very nice little lunch? Mrs.
Masters and I managed it between us, and you none of you knew, no none
of you, how very ancient that chicken was."

"Didn't I?" replied Kate. "I had one of the drumsticks. That chicken
has woke me in a very lusty manner more than once in the morn. 'Up, Up!'
cries the crowing cock. Oh, Mabel, it was cruel of you to deprive us of
his clarion note."

"Never mind. I saw that Loftie and Miss Meadowsweet had the breast to
eat. I nearly died when I saw you attacking the drumstick, but I knew
you wouldn't split. Now, do look up, Kate? Doesn't Loftus look radiant?
Isn't he a handsome fellow when he is pleased? What can Miss Meadowsweet
be saying to him? How he does laugh!"

"Miss Meadowsweet has a good deal of fun in her," responded Kate. "I
think it is a certain tone in her voice. Well, here they come. How did
you like the ruins, Loftus?"

"Very much--I mean as much as I care for any ruins. And I have had a
capital guide. Miss Meadowsweet wants to propose something to you
girls."

"Yes," said Beatrice, in her bright, quick way. "It will be so nice if
you can do it. Captain Bertram says he is fond of tennis, and we have
four very good courts at home. Will you all come and have supper this
evening? Mother will be delighted to see you--Do come, Miss Bertram."

She looked sympathetically and eagerly at Catherine. Catherine in her
shabby, ill-fitting dress was not nearly such a distinguished figure as
Miss Meadowsweet, whose serge costume fitted her like a glove. Yet
Catherine drew herself up as if the invitation half offended her.

"I?" she began. She looked at Loftus. Her color came and went.

"Catherine is overpowered," remarked the brother, with a smile at Miss
Meadowsweet, but a certain expression about his mouth which Kate too
well interpreted. "Catherine is overpowered. She and this little woman,"
taking Mabel's hand, "have had very few invitations lately. Never mind,
Kate, I'll support you, and if we hurry home now, you can polish up your
rusty tennis powers at Rosendale. We must make a proper court there,
Miss Meadowsweet. In the meantime, we are all delighted to accept your
kind invitation."

"Be with us at seven," said Beatrice. "Mother doesn't like supper to be
later than half-past-eight, but if you are with us by seven we shall
have time for a good game first. And now, I think I must go home, or my
mother will wonder what has become of me."

Mabel picked up the luncheon basket. Loftus flung the rugs over his
shoulder, and the four young people went down to the boats.

Loftus and Mabel lingered a little behind. Catherine and Beatrice led
the way.

"You don't want to come to-night," suddenly said Beatrice to her
companion.

Catherine started and colored.

"Why do you say that? I--I am glad to come."

"Don't come if you don't want to. I shall understand."

They had reached the boats. The Bertrams seated themselves in their own.
Miss Meadowsweet advised them not to put up the sail, but thought if she
kept within easy distance, they might manage the oars. Loftus and Mabel
rowed. Kate sat in the stern and steered. Beatrice Meadowsweet
applauded, and rowed her own boat with skill. She reached the shore
before them, and called out in her clear voice:

"I sha'n't wait now. I shall see you all at seven this evening."

"Reply for us, Kate," whispered Loftus. "Reply for us all, quickly."

"Yes--we'll come," called Catherine across the water.

Beatrice smiled. Her smile was of the sunniest. It flashed back a look
of almost love at Catherine. Then she turned to walk up the steep steps
which led from the quay to the little High Street.

"We ought not to go," instantly began Catherine.

Loftus stopped rowing, bent forward and put his hand across her mouth.

"Not another word," he said. "I'll undertake to conciliate the mother,
and I think she can trust to my ideas of good-breeding."

Meanwhile Beatrice walked quickly home. The Meadowsweets lived at the
far end of the town in a large gray stone house. The house stood back a
little from the road, and a great elm tree threw its protecting shade
over the porch and upper windows. It was, however, an ordinary house in
a street, and looked a little old-fashioned and a little gloomy until
you stepped into the drawing-room, which was furnished certainly with no
pretension to modern taste or art, but opened with French windows into a
glorious, big, old-world garden.

The house was known by the name of the Gray House, and the old garden as
the Gray Garden, but the garden at least bore no resemblance to its
neutral-tinted name. It had green alleys, and sheltering trees, and a
great expanse of smoothly kept lawn. It possessed flower-beds and flower
borders innumerable. There was more than one bower composed entirely of
rose-trees, and there were very long hedges of sweet briar and Scotch
roses.

The tennis-courts were kept to perfection in the Gray Garden, and all
the lasses and boys of Northbury were rejoiced when an invitation came
to them to test their skill at a tournament here. There was no girl in
Northbury more popular than Beatrice. This popularity was unsought. It
came to her because she was gracious and affectionate, of a generous
nature, above petty slanders, petty gossips, petty desires. Life had
always been rich and plentiful for her, she possessed abundant health,
excellent spirits, and a sunny temper not easily ruffled; she was
sympathetic, too, and although, in mind and nature she was many steps
above the girls with whom she associated, she was really unconscious of
this difference and gave herself no superior airs. A companion who would
have been her equal, whose intellect would have sharpened hers, whose
spirit would have matched her own, whose refinement would have delighted
and whose affection would have been something to revel in, she had never
hitherto known.

Unconscious of her loss she had not deplored it. It was not until she
and Catherine Bertram had flashed a look of delight and sympathy at one
another that she first felt stirring within her breast the wings of a
new desire. For the first time she felt unsatisfied and incomplete. She
scarcely knew that she thirsted for Catherine, but this was so.
Catherine awakened all sorts of new emotions in her heart. She had spent
a delightful day with the Bertrams, and hurried home now in the highest
spirits.

In the High Street she met three girls, whose names were Matty, Alice,
and Sophy Bell. Their father was a retired coal merchant. There was
scarcely any active trade down in Northbury, almost all the inhabitants
having retired to live there on their fortunes. The Bells were small,
rather thickly-made girls, with round faces and round eyes. They always
dressed alike, and one was never seen without the other two. They
generally walked through the streets with their arms linked, and each
one echoed the sentiments of the other, so that the effect produced was
a sense of medley and multiplicity.

To such an extent was this felt that the three girls were spoken of by
the wits of the town as the "four-and-twenty Miss Bells." They adored
Beatrice, and bore down upon her now in a neat phalanx.

"Delighted to see you, Bee!" exclaimed Matty.

"Delighted!" echoed Alice.

"Lighted!" exclaimed Sophy.

"Where have you been?" began Matty, again.

Beatrice told. While she spoke, three pairs of lips were raised for a
salute.

People kissed in the streets or anywhere at Northbury.

"You were with those Bertrams! Those _rude_ Bertrams! Oh, fascinating--"

"Fascinating--"

"Nating," burst from the three.

"Tell us about them, darling!" exclaimed one.

"Tell us!" said the other.

"--Us"--gasped the third.

Beatrice narrated her morning adventure with some spirit, praised her
new friends, defended them from any score of rudeness, and altogether
conjured up an interesting picture of them.

The Bells turned to walk with her. Matty hung on one arm, Alice on
another, Sophy hopped backwards in front. Before she quite knew that she
meant to do so, Beatrice had asked the Bells to join the tennis party
that evening. They accepted the invitation rapturously.

"Might Polly and Daisy Jenkins come too, and might Polly's brother come,
and if they met Mr. Jones, the curate--Mr. Jones did so love
tennis--might _he_ come?"

"Is the brother an officer in the real army?" inquired Matty.

"Real army--"

"Army--" echoed the others

Beatrice was able to assure them that Captain Bertram had nothing
spurious about him.

"I'll see you at seven," she added, nodding to her companions. "Yes, you
can bring the Jenkinses and the boys, and Mr. Jones. I really must hurry
home now."

She reached the Gray House, found her mother nodding, as usual, in her
great easy-chair, and told her what she had done.

"I met the Bertrams on the water, and had lunch with them, and they are
coming to tennis to-night, and to supper afterwards, mother," she said.

Mrs. Meadowsweet always approved of her daughter's doings. She approved
now, nodding her kind old head, and raising her face with a smile.

"Quite right, Trixie," she said. "How many Bertrams are there? Is Mrs.
Bertram coming? If so, I had better put on my cap with the Honiton
lace."

"Mrs. Bertram is not coming, mother, but you must put on your best cap
all the same. Mrs. Bertram is from home. It was the girls I met this
morning--the girls, and their brother, Captain Bertram."

"Oh, well, child, if they are all young folk the cap with Maltese lace
will do. I don't wear Honiton, except for those who know."

"Mother, I thought we might have supper in the garden. The weather is so
lovely now, and it is quite light at half-past eight. Shall I give the
order, and take all the trouble off you?"

Mrs. Meadowsweet rose with a slight effort to her feet.

"Do you think I am going to let you be worried, child?" she said. "No,
no, what good is the old mother if she can't manage a thing of that
sort? Of course you shall have supper in the garden, and a good supper,
too. I am glad you have asked your friends, Bee. How well and bright you
look. I am very glad you have made nice friends at last, child."

"All my friends are nice, mother, at least I think so. By the way, I met
the little Bells, and they were dying to come, so I asked them, and they
said perhaps they would bring the Jenkinses, and Mr. Jones, and of
course, the boys will drop in."

"My word, child, but that's quite a party! I had better send out at once
for a salmon, and two or three lobsters and some crabs. There's cream
enough in the house, and eggs, and plenty of stuff in the garden for
salads. Oh, I'll manage, I'll manage fine. I got in a couple of chickens
and a pair of ducks this morning; I'll warrant that your grand friends
have enough to eat, Trixie. But now I must go and have a talk with
Jane."




CHAPTER VIII.

NOBODY ELSE LOOKED THE LEAST LIKE THE BERTRAMS.


It was the fashion to be punctual at Northbury, and when Catherine,
Mabel and Loftus Bertram arrived about ten minutes past seven at the
Gray House they found the pleasant old drawing-room already full of
eager and expectant guests.

Beatrice would have preferred meeting her new friends without any
ceremony in the garden, but Mrs. Meadowsweet was nothing if she was not
mistress of her own house, and she decided that it would be more
becoming and _comme il faut_ to wait in the drawing-room for the
young visitors.

Accordingly Mrs. Meadowsweet sat in her chair of state. She wore a
rose-colored silk dress, and a quantity of puffed white lace round her
neck and wrists; and a cap which was tall and stiff, and had little
tufts of yellow ribbon and little rosettes of Maltese lace adorning it,
surmounted her large, full-blown face. That face was all beams and
kindliness and good-temper, and had somehow the effect of making people
forget whether Mrs. Meadowsweet was vulgar or not.

She sat in her chair of state facing the garden, and her visitors, all
on the tip-toe of expectation, stationed themselves round her. The Bells
had taken possession of the Chesterfield sofa. By sitting rather widely
apart they managed to fill it; they always looked alike. To-night they
so exactly resembled peas in a pod that one had a sense of ache and
almost fatigue in watching them. This fatigue and irritation rose to
desperation when they spoke. The Bells were poor, and their dresses bore
decided signs of stint and poverty. They wore white muslin jackets, and
pale green skirts of a shining substance known as mohair. Their mother
fondly imagined that the shine and glitter of this fabric could not be
known from silk. It was harsh, however, and did not lie in graceful
folds, and besides, the poor little skirts lacked quantity.

The Bells had thin hair, and no knack whatever with regard to its
arrangement. They looked unprepossessing girls, but no matter. Beatrice
thought well of them. Mrs. Meadowsweet bestowed one or two broad glances
of approval upon the inseparable little trio, and their own small hearts
were dancing with expectation.

Would Bee, their darling, delightful, beautiful Bee, introduce them to
Captain Bertram? Would he speak to them and smile upon them? Would he
tell them stories of some of his gallant exploits? The Bells' round
faces seemed to grow plumper, and their saucer eyes fuller, as they
contemplated this contingency. What supreme bliss would be theirs if
Captain Bertram singled them out for attention? Already they were in
love with his name, and were quite ready to fall down in a phalanx of
three, and worship the hero of many imaginary fights.

Standing by the open window, and with no shyness or stiffness whatever
about them, Daisy and Polly Jenkins were to be seen. Daisy was a
full-blown girl with a rather loud voice, and a manner which was by some
considered very fascinating; for it had the effect of instantly taking
you, as it were, behind the scenes, and into her innermost confidence.

Daisy was rather good-looking, and was the adored of Albert Bell, the
little round-faced girls' brother. She was dressed in voluminous muslin
draperies, and was a decidedly large and comfortable-looking young
woman.

Polly was a second edition of her sister, only not so good-looking. She
had made up her mind to marry Mr. Jones, the curate, who for his part
was deeply in love with Beatrice.

"They are frightfully late, aren't they?" exclaimed Daisy Jenkins,
giving a slight yawn, and looking longingly out at the tennis courts as
she spoke. "I suppose it's the way with fashionable folk. For my part, I
call it rude. Mrs. Meadowsweet, may I run across the garden, and pick a
piece of sweet brier to put in the front of my dress? Somehow I pine for
it."

"I'll get it for you," said Albert Bell, blushing crimson as he spoke.

He was a very awkward young man, but his heart was as warm as his
manners were uncouth.

"I'll get it for you, Daisy," he said. His dull eyes had not the power
of shining or looking eloquent. He stepped from behind the sofa where
his sisters sat, and stumbled over Mrs. Meadowsweet's footstool.

"I think, my dears, we'll just wait for our guests," said the old lady.
"We'll all just be present, please, when they come. It's my
old-fashioned ideas, my loves, just for us all to be ready to give them
a right-down, good welcome."

"Bother!" exclaimed Miss Daisy. She flounced her full skirts, cast a
withering glance at young Bell, and once more looked out of the open
window.

"Come here, Beatrice," exclaimed Polly.

Mr. Jones was talking to Beatrice, and Polly hoped they would both
approach the window together.

"Come and tell us about that Adonis you went rowing with to-day," called
the girl in her shrill, half-jealous voice.

It was just at that moment that the door was flung open by Jane, and the
Bertrams made their appearance.

Catherine and Mabel wore the simplest white washing-dresses. Their
girlish waists were encircled by sashes of pale gold. Catherine's thick
dark hair was coiled tightly round her head--Mabel's more frizzy and
paler locks fell in wavy curls round her forehead and on her shoulders.
Nobody else looked the least like the Bertrams. Their dresses were as
cheap as any other girl's dresses in the room. Daisy and Polly Jenkins
had really much handsomer and finer hair, but somehow the effect
produced by the Bertrams was altogether different.

Mrs. Meadowsweet addressed them in a deferential tone as "Miss," and it
went like an electric flash through the minds of all the other visitors
that the old lady was quite right when she thought it her duty to
receive them in state.

Bertram was in flannels, and these were cut not exactly after the
pattern of those worn by young Bell, who looked with a sort of despair
at his true love, Daisy, whose eyes, in company with the three pairs of
eyes of the Bells, were directed full upon the aristocratic face of
Captain Bertram.

"Come into the garden," said Beatrice, stepping forward in her usual
bright way, forgetting herself completely, and in consequence putting
every one else at their ease. "We are very punctual people at
Northbury," she continued, "and we are all wild to begin our game
Captain Bertram, these are my friends, the Bells. May I introduce you?
This is Miss Matty, and this is Miss Alice, and this is Miss Sophy.
Matty, I put Captain Bertram into your charge. Albert," she continued,
looking at young Bell, "will you and Daisy arrange a set for tennis?"

How Albert Bell did bless Beatrice! In a moment or two all the visitors
were perambulating about the garden. Mr. Jones was escorted on one side
by Polly Jenkins, on the other, he, in his turn, tried to escort Mabel
Bertram, who did not talk a great deal and seemed somewhat out of her
element. Catherine and Beatrice walked together, and Mrs. Meadowsweet,
still sitting in her arm-chair, smiled as she saw them.

"That's a nice girl, and a fine looking girl," she murmured, "and very
good company for my Bee. Very good company for her. Yes, the Bertrams
are stylish but not of our set. My word, not a bit of our set. Bee, of
course, might talk to anybody, but the rest of us--no, no, I'm the first
to see the fitness of things, and the Bertrams don't belong to us nor we
to them. Bee takes after her father, poor man, but the rest of us, we
have no right to know the Bertrams. Now, do look at that young captain.
Why, he's making the little Bells laugh themselves into fits. Dear me,
I'd better go out. These girls don't know manners, and their heads will
be turned by that fine young spark. They are certain to believe any
rubbish he talks to them."

Mrs. Meadowsweet rose with difficulty, stepped out of the open window,
and sailed in her rose-colored satin across the grass.

"Now, what's up?" she said. "Fie, fie, Matty, your laugh is for all the
world like a hen cackling."

"He, he!" exclaimed the younger girls.

"Now, there you are off again, and all three of you this time!"

"It's Captain Bertram, ma'am," began Matty.

"Captain Bertram!" echoed Alice.

"Bertram," sighed Sophy.

"He says," continued Matty, "that we are all alike, and he doesn't know
one from the other, and we are trying to puzzle him. It is such
delicious fun."

"Delicious fun!" said Alice.

"Fun!" gasped Sophy, through her peals of mirth.

"Now," continued Alice, "he shall begin again. He shall go through his
catechism. Here we three stand in a row. Which is Matty, which is Alice,
which is Sophy?"

Captain Bertram pulled his mustache, swept his dark eyes over the little
eager palpitating group, and in a languid tone pronounced the wrong one
to be Matty.

The cackling rose to a shriek.

"You shall pay a forfeit, you bad man," said the real Matty. She shook
her little fat finger at him. "Oh, yes, Mrs. Meadowsweet, he really
shall--he _must_. This really is too sweetly delicious,--fancy his
not knowing me from Alice--I call it ungallant. Now what shall the
forfeit be, Alice and Sophy. Let's put our fingers on our lips and
think."

"He shall tell us," exclaims Alice, "he shall describe at full length
his--"

She looked at her sisters.

"His first battle," prompted Matty.

"No, no, better than that, better than that--" came from Sophy's girlish
lips. "Captain Bertram shall tell us about his--his first love."

It may have been rude, but at this remark Captain Bertram not only
changed color but turned in a very marked way from the Misses Bell, and
devoted himself to his hostess.

He was attacked by a complaint somewhat in vogue in high life--he had a
sudden fit of convenient deafness. He said a few words in a cold voice
to Mrs. Meadowsweet, crushed the little Bells by his icy manner, and
took the first opportunity of finding more congenial society.

An eager game of tennis was going on, and Beatrice, who did not play,
stood by to watch. Northbury was accustomed to Beatrice, and did not
therefore observe, what was very patent to Captain Bertram, that this
girl was as perfectly well-bred as his own sisters. She wore a long,
gray cashmere dress, slightly open at her throat, with ruffles of soft,
real lace.

As she watched the game, her sensitive and speaking face showed
interest, sympathy, keen appreciation. She heard Captain Bertram's step,
and turned to welcome him with a smile.

"Would not you like to play?"

"Will you be my partner?"

"When they make up a fresh set I will, with pleasure; although," she
added, looking down at her long dress, "I did not expect to play
to-night, and did not dress for it."

"Thank goodness. I hate tennis dresses. All girls should wear trains."

Beatrice raised her bright eyes to his face. Their open expression said
plainly, "It is a matter of indifference to me what you think about my
dress." Aloud she said:

"What have you done with my friends, the Bells?"

"I am afraid, Miss Meadowsweet, that long intercourse with those young
ladies would be too severe a strain on my intellect."

"Captain Bertram, you don't mean what you are saying."

"I do, on my honor. They are too intellectual for me."

"They are not! You are laughing at them."

Beatrice stepped back a pace, and looked at him with a heightened color
coming into her face.

Captain Bertram began to explain. Before he could get in a word she
said, abruptly:

"Pardon me," and flew from his side.

Her movement was so fleet and sudden that he had not realized her
departure before the impulsive girl was standing by the despised Matty,
talking to her in a cheery and affectionate voice, and making fresh
arrangements for the pleasure and satisfaction of all three.

"By Jove, she's a fine creature!" thought the captain. "I don't mind how
much I see of her--but as to the rest of this motley herd, my mother is
quite right in not letting the girls have anything to do with them. I
suppose I put my foot in it bringing them here to-night. Well, that
can't be helped now. I hope Miss Beatrice will soon come back. Her eyes
flashed when I said even a word against those terrible little friends of
hers. I should like her eyes to flash at me again. I suppose she'll soon
return. She promised to be my partner in the next set at tennis. That
girl doesn't care a bit for fine speeches. She won't take a compliment
even when it is offered to her--won't stretch out her hand for it or
touch it. Cool? I should think she is cool. Might have been through two
or three London seasons. What a queer lot surround her! And how unlike
them she is. There's the old mother--I had better go and talk to her.
She's quite as vulgar as the rest, but somehow she doesn't jar on a
man's nerves like those charming Miss Bells. Positively, I should have a
fever if I talked much longer to them. My first love, too! I'm to tell
them about _her_. Oh, yes, that's so likely."

Again the angry flame mounted to Captain Bertram's thin cheek. He
strolled across the grass, and joined his hostess.

"Now I call this a shame!" exclaimed the good lady, "you don't tell me
that you are all by yourself, captain, and no one trying to make
themselves agreeable to you! Oh, fie! this will never do--and you, so to
speak, the lion of the party."

"Pray don't say that, Mrs. Meadowsweet, I hate being a lion."

"But you can't help it, my good young sir. You, who represent our
Gracious Sovereign Lady's Army. Now, where's that girl of mine?
Beatrice! Trixie! Bee!"

Captain Bertram was amazed at the shrill and far-sounding quality of
Mrs. Meadowsweet's voice. It distressed him, for anything not ultra
refined jarred upon this sensitive young officer's nerves; but he
trusted that the result would be satisfactory, and that Beatrice, whose
motions he began to liken to a poem, would put in a speedy appearance.

She was talking to Mr. Jones, however, and when her mother called her,
she and the curate approached together.

"Beatrice, this poor young man--Captain Bertram, the hero of the
evening, is all alone. Not a soul to amuse him or entertain him."

"Mother, you mistake," answered Beatrice, "Captain Bertram is being
entertained by you."

"Hoots, child! What should an old lady have to say to a gay young lad?"

"Plenty, I assure you. I am being delightfully amused," replied the
captain.

He gave Beatrice an angry look which she would not see.

"I want to talk to Jane about the supper," said the young lady in a calm
voice. "Captain Bertram, may I introduce you to Mr. Jones?"

Again she flew lightly away, and the captain owned to himself that the
tennis party at the Gray House was a very dull affair.

Supper, however, made amends for much. The incongruous elements were not
so apparent. Everybody was hungry, and even the most fastidious had to
acknowledge the fare of the best. Captain Bertram quite retrieved his
character in Beatrice Meadowsweet's eyes, so well did he help her in
serving her guests. Matty, Alice and Sophy Bell forgave him for his
abrupt departure earlier in the evening from the charms of their
society, when he helped them each twice to lobster salad.

Captain Bertram was not at all averse to the charms of a small
flirtation. He was forced to remain for a few days in the remote little
world-forgotten town of Northbury, and it occurred to him as he helped
the Bells to lobster salad, and filled up Miss Matty's glass more than
once with red currant wine, that Beatrice could solace him a good deal
during his exile from a gayer life. He was absolutely certain at the
present moment that the best way to restore himself to her good graces
was once again to endure the intellectual strain of the Bells' society.
Accordingly when supper was over, and people with one consent, and all,
as it were, moved by a sudden impulse, joined first in a country dance,
then formed into sets for quadrilles, and finally waltzed away to the
old-fashioned sound of Mrs. Meadowsweet's piano, played with vigor by
the good lady herself, Captain Bertram, with a beseeching and
deprecatory glance at Beatrice, who took care not to see it, led out
Miss Matty Bell as his partner.

How much that young lady giggled! How badly she danced--with what
rapture she threw up her round eyes at her partner's dark face, this
chronicle need not record; so _naïve_ was she, into such ecstasies
did every word spoken by the captain throw her, that he quite feared for
the result.

"It is awful when a girl falls in love in five minutes!" he mentally
soliloquized. "I wonder if I have satisfied Miss Meadowsweet now? I do
honestly think I have done my duty by Miss Matty Bell."

So he conveyed the gushing young person back to her sisters, and sought
for Beatrice who was once more frank and friendly, but gave him
excellent reasons for not dancing with him.

At this moment Catherine came up and touched her brother. Her cheeks had
a bright color in them, she looked animated and happy.

"Loftus, it is close on twelve o'clock. We must go home. Look at Mabel,"
she added, seeing her brother hesitate, "she is frightfully sleepy.
Mother never allows her to be up so late. We have had a happy evening,"
continued Catherine, looking full into Miss Meadowsweet's face, "and we
are very much obliged to you. Now I must go and say good-night to your
mother."

She tripped away, and Beatrice looked after her with affectionate eyes.

"It is unkind of you not to give me one dance," said the captain.

She had forgotten his presence.

"It is not unkind," she said. "The dancing is altogether an impromptu
affair, and I had to attend to my guests. I was talking to your sister,
Catherine, who did not care to dance."

"Very ungenerous to me," pursued the captain. "A poor return for all my
efforts to please you."

"Your efforts--pray, what efforts?"

"Did you not observe me with your friend, Miss Matty Bell? I assure you
she and I are now excellent friends."

"I do not suppose in my mother's house you would be anything else,
Captain Bertram."

Her tone irritated the captain. His manner changed.

"Do you think I _wanted_ to dance with her?"

"I don't think about it. Here is your sister. I will help you to find
your wraps, Catherine."

She linked her hand through Catherine Bertram's arm, and went with her
into the hall. A few moments later the brother and sisters were walking
quickly home.

"So you have come to Christian names already, Catherine," said Loftus.

"Yes," replied Catherine. "She is the very dearest girl. Have we not had
a delightful evening?"

"Delightful, truly. How did you enjoy yourself, Mab?"

"Middling," replied Mabel. "I was with Mr. Jones, and he talked about
vestments, and deplored the Rector's decision against High Church
practices. He thought we were kindred souls, but we weren't, and I told
him so. Then he turned crusty. I waltzed twice with Mr. Bell, and he
kicked my ankle, and hurt me very much. I don't think I cared much for
the party, Catherine, the people were so queer."

"Were they?" answered Catherine. "I didn't notice anything the matter
with them. I talked for a short time with Mrs. Meadowsweet, and found
her most interesting. She told me a lot about Beatrice. She thinks
Beatrice the noblest creature in the world. As I very nearly agreed with
her we got on capitally."

"What a romantic puss you are, Kate," said her brother.

She was leaning on him, and he gave her arm a playful pinch.

"You met Miss Meadowsweet on Tuesday, wasn't it? This is Friday, and she
is the 'very dearest girl in the world,' and already you are Catherine
and Beatrice to one another. Upon my word, hearts move rapidly towards
each other in certain quarters."

"In more quarters than one," replied Kate, with an arch smile. "How you
did flatter that poor little Miss Bell, Loftie. Her cheeks were like
peonies while you talked to her. You certainly had an air of great
tenderness, and I expect you have turned the poor little thing's head."

"Yes, Loftus," interrupted Mabel. "I remarked you, too, with Miss Bell.
What a little fright she is--I never could have supposed she was in your
style."

"Good gracious," began Loftus, "you didn't think--"

But Catherine in her sedate voice interrupted him.

"Beatrice and I were watching you. I laughed when I saw that expression
of tenderness filling your glorious dark eyes, but I think Bee was
vexed."

"Vexed? No, Kate, surely not vexed?"

"I think so, Loftus. She said to me--'I hope your brother is not
laughing at my little friend, Matty Bell.' Then she added, 'I know Matty
is not beautiful nor specially attractive, but she has the kindest
heart.' I said perhaps you were flirting, and that I knew you could
flirt. She did not make any answer, only she looked grave, and turned
away when you and Miss Bell came near us."

"That accounts," began Loftus. He did not explain himself further and
by-and-by the little party reached the Manor.

There was an old tumble-down lodge at the gates. It was inhabited by a
very poor man, who, for the sake of getting a shelter over his head, now
and then undertook to clean up and do odd jobs in the Rosendale gardens.
Mrs. Bertram thought it well to have some one in the lodge, and she was
pleased with the economical arrangement she had made with David Tester.

One of his duties was to lock the old gates at night. There was a small
and a large gate leading into the avenue, and it was one of Mrs.
Bertram's special whims that both should be locked at night. Old Tester
thought his mistress foolishly particular on this point, and wondered at
so close a lady going to the expense of new locks, which were sent down
from London, and were particularly good and expensive.

The small gate was furnished with a latch-lock as well. This arrangement
was made for Tester's convenience, so that if Mrs. Bertram and her
daughters chose to be absent from home a little later than usual, he
could still close the gate and go to bed.

When the girls and their brother left home that evening Catherine had
not forgotten the latch-key.

"We may be late," she said, "so I will put it in my pocket."

They were late, and as they approached the old gates Catherine gave the
key to Mabel, who hastened to fit it into the lock of the side gate.

To her surprise it opened at a touch.

"Kate!" exclaimed the young girl, "Tester has been very careless; he has
never closed the side gate."

"I will call him up and speak to him now," said Catherine, who had a
certain touch of her mother's imperious nature. "He shall do it now.
Mother is always most particular about the gates, and she ought not to
be disobeyed in her absence."

Catherine was running across the avenue to wake old Tester when Loftus
laid his hand on her arm.

"You really are too absurd, Kitty," he said. "I simply won't allow that
poor, infirm, old man to be got out of his bed for such a ridiculous
reason. Who cares whether the gates are locked, or not locked?"

"Mother cares," said Catherine, her eyes flashing.

"Now, Kate, you must use your common-sense. That fad about locking the
gates is a pure and simple whim on the mother's part. Of course we'll
humor it, but not to the extent of waking up old Tester. Come, Kitty,
you shall give the old man any amount of blowing up in the morning, only
now you really must leave him alone."

"I'm going on," said Mabel; "I can scarcely keep my eyes open. Will
you come with me, Loftie? If Kate likes to stay by herself with the
dark trees and the ghosts, why, let her. I'm off to bed."

She ran laughing and singing up the old avenue.

Loftus turned to resume his argument with Catherine, Mabel's gay voice
echoed more faintly as she ran on. Suddenly it stopped. Patter, patter,
came back the swift feet, and, trembling and shivering, she threw
herself into Loftus's arms.

"I heard something--there's something in the avenue!"

The moon was shining, and showed Mabel's face as white as a sheet.

"You silly child," said Loftus, "you heard a rabbit scuttling home.
Here, take my arm, and let us all get home as fast as we can. Why, you
are trembling from head to foot. You are tired out, that's it. Take her
other arm, will you, Kate?"

"They say Rosendale is haunted," panted Mabel.

"Folly! Don't listen to such rubbish. Your rabbit was hurrying to bed,
and was as much afraid of you as you of it."

"It--it wasn't a rabbit," said Mabel. "Rabbits don't sigh."

"Oh--sighs only belong to ghosts?"

"I don't know. Don't laugh at me, Loftie. I heard a real sigh and a
rustle, and something white flashed."

"Then you flashed back to us. Never talk of being a brave girl again,
May."

"Let us walk very quickly," said Mabel. "It was just there I saw it.
Just by that great clump of Lauristinus. Don't let us speak. There,
that's better. I own I'm frightened, Loftie. You needn't laugh at me."

Loftus Bertram had many faults, but he was not ill-natured. He took
Mabel's little cold hand, and pressed it between his warm fingers, and
ceased to laugh at her, and walked quickly, and was even silent at her
bidding. By degrees, Mabel leaned all her weight on Loftus, and took no
notice of Kate, who, for her part, held herself erect, and walked up the
avenue with a half-aggrieved, half-scornful look on her face, and with
some anxiety in her heart.




CHAPTER IX.

THE GHOST IN THE AVENUE.


Rosendale Manor had heaps of rooms. It was an old house, added to at
many times; added to by builders, who had little or no knowledge of
their craft, who were prodigal of space, and illiberal in all matters of
convenience.

The Manor was the sort of house which might best be described as
inadequate for the wants of ordinary people. For instance, its
drawing-rooms were large out of all proportion, whereas its dining-room,
morning-room and library were ridiculously small. It had a spacious hall
and wide landings, but its stairs were steep and narrow, and there was
not even one decent-sized bedroom in the house. All the rooms had low
ceilings and were small. Their only virtue was that there were such a
number of them.

Catherine and Mabel liked the bedrooms at the Manor, because being
rather distinct in their tastes, and decidedly given to quarrel over the
arrangements of their separate properties, it was impossible for them to
sleep together. Each girl had a room of her own, and these rooms did not
even touch, for Mabel slept near her mother, and Catherine away in a
wing by herself. This wing could only be reached by a spiral staircase,
and was pronounced by the timid Mabel to be odiously lonely.

Catherine, however, knew no fears, and enjoyed the privacy of her quaint
little bedroom with its sloping roof and lattice window.

She bade her brother and sister good-night, and went up to it, now.

"You'll go to bed at once, won't you, Kitty?" said Mabel, whose eyes
were half-shut. "Perhaps it _was_ only a rabbit I heard. Only why
did it flash white, and why did it sigh? Well, I won't think of it any
more. Good-night, Kitty, how wide awake you look."

Catherine kissed her sister and sought her distant chamber. She waited
until all was silent in the house, then slowly and cautiously she
unbarred her door and went downstairs.

In the large square entrance hall she took a white shawl from a stand.
She hung it across her arm, and still walking very softly reached the
hall door, drew back its bolts, removed its chain, opened it, and went
out into the porch.

Her mother had stood in that porch two nights fgo. Catherine thought of
her now. The remembrance of her mother's face caused her to sigh and
shiver as if she had been struck with sudden cold. Leaving the hall door
ajar she wrapped the white shawl about her shoulders, and then walked a
little way across the wide gravel sweep in front of the house.

Her footsteps crunched the gravel, but her brother and sister slept in
distant bedrooms and could hear nothing. The moon was riding full and
high in the heavens, and its reflection caused intense light and dark
shadows. Catherine's own shadow stalked heavy and immense by her side.

She walked a little way down the avenue, listening intently. Even the
crunching of the gravel disturbed her, so she stepped on the grass, and
walked noiselessly on its velvet path.

Suddenly she stopped, threw up her head, flung her shawl off, and with a
movement quick as lightning, put out her hand and caught something.

She was holding a girl's slender and round arm. She drew her forward,
pushed back her somewhat tawdry hat, and looked into her face.

"What are you doing here? What is your name? Speak at once. Tell me the
truth."

The girl had queer, half-wild eyes. She looked down and began to mutter
something indistinct. The next instant she went on her knees, caught
Catherine's white dress and pressed it to her lips.

"Don't," said Miss Bertram, with a movement both of decision and
repulsion. "You aren't even clean. Don't touch my dress. What are you
doing here?"

"I have travelled a long way. I am only dirty because I am travel-sore.
I have come to see the lady, your mother. I have come from far to see
her. I have a message for her. Is she at home?"

"Would she see you, if she were at home, at this hour? Tell me your name
first, and then go away. You cannot see my mother."

"You are Miss Bertram, are you not?"

"Yes--and Rosendale Manor is my home. It is not yours. Go away. Never
come back here again. You are not to see my mother."

The girl rose to her feet. Her dress was dirty, her face was begrimed
with the dirt of travel, but Catherine noticed that the dress was whole,
not patched anywhere, also that her accent was pure, and almost refined.

"Miss Bertram," she said, "I must see the lady, your mother. I have an
important message for her; I am not a spy, and I don't come in any
unkindness, but I must see the lady who lives here, and who is your
mother. I have waited for hours in the avenue, hours and hours. I will
wait until morning. The nights are not cold, and I shall do very well.
Let me see your mother then."

"You cannot. She is from home. It was you then, who bribed Tester to
keep the lodge gate open?"

"I gave the man a shilling. Yes, I confess it. I am doing no harm here.
Put yourself in my place."

"How dare you? How can you?" said Catherine, stepping away from the
travel-stained figure.

"Ah, you are very proud, but there's a verse of Scripture that fits you.
'Let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall.' I know your
age--you are just seventeen, I'm only nineteen, just two years older
than you. You have no feeling for me. Suppose I had none for you?"

The refinement of the girl's voice became more and more apparent to
Catherine. There was a thrill and a quality in it which both repelled
and fascinated. This queer waif and stray, this vagabond of the
woodside, was at least as fearless as herself.

"I don't know what you mean," she said, in a less imperious tone than
she had hitherto used.

"I could explain what I mean, but I won't. I have too kind a heart to
crush you. I could crush you. I could take that dainty white hand of
yours, and feel it tremble in mine--and if you knew all that I could say
you wouldn't leave me out here in the avenue, but you'd take me in, and
give me the best to eat, and the softest bed to lie upon. Don't you
think it's very kind of me when I could use such power over you that I
don't use it? Don't you think it's noble of me? Oh, you are a dainty
girl, and a proud, but I could bring you and yours to the very dust."

"You must be mad," said Catherine. "Absolutely mad. How can you possibly
expect me to listen to this wild nonsense? You had better go away now.
I'll walk with you as far as the gate, and then I'll wake up Tester to
lock it after you. You needn't suppose that I'm afraid."

"Don't taunt me," said the girl. "If you do I'll use my power. Oh, I am
hungry, and thirsty, and footsore. Why shouldn't I go into that house
and sleep there, and eat there, and be rested?"

Her words were defiant, but just at the last they wavered, and Catherine
saw by the moonlight that her face grew ghastly under its grimness, and
she saw the slender young figure sway as if it would fall.

"You are hungry?" said Catherine, all her feelings merged in sudden
pity. "Even though you have no right to be here, you sha'n't go hungry
away. Sit down. Rest against that tree, and I will fetch you something."

She ran into the house, returning presently with a jug of milk, and some
thick bread and butter.

"Eat that," she said, "and drink this milk, then you will be better. I
slipped a cup into my pocket. It is not broken. I will pour you out a
cup of milk."

The girl seized the bread and butter, and began devouring it. She was so
famished that she almost tore it as she ate. Catherine, who had quite
forgotten her dignified _rôle_ in compassion for the first real
hunger she had ever witnessed, knelt on the grass by her side, and once,
twice, thrice, filled the cup full of milk, and held it to her lips.

"Now you are better," she said, when the meal had come to an end.

"Yes, thank you, Miss Bertram, much better. The horrible sinking is
gone, and the ground doesn't seem to reel away when I look at it. Thank
you, Miss Catherine Bertram, I shall do nicely now. I do not at all mind
sleeping here on the cool grass till the morning."

"But you are not to stay. Why are you obstinate when I am good to you?
And why do you call me Miss Catherine Bertram? How can you possibly know
my name?"

The girl laughed. Her laugh was almost cheerful, it was also young and
silvery.

"You ask me a lot of questions," she said. "I'll answer them one by one,
and the least important first. How I know your name is my own secret; I
can't tell that without telling also what would crush you. But I may as
well say that I know all about you. I know your appearance, and your
age, and even a little bit about your character; and I know you have a
younger sister called Mabel, and that she is not so pretty as you, and
has not half the character, and in short that you are worth two of her.

"Then you have a brother. His name is Loftus. He is like you, only he is
not so fearless. He is in the army. He is rather extravagant, and your
mother is afraid of him. Ah, yes, I know all about you and yours; and I
know so much in especial about that proud lady, your mother, that if
there were daylight, and I had pencil and paper, I could draw a portrait
of her for you. There, have I not answered your first question? Now you
want to know why I don't go away. If you had no money in your purse, and
if you had walked between twenty and thirty miles to effect an object of
the greatest possible importance to yourself, would you give it up at
the bidding of a young girl? Would you now?"

"You are very queer," said Catherine; "I fail to understand you. I don't
know how you have got your extraordinary knowledge about us. You talk
like a lady, but ladies don't starve with hunger, nor walk until they
are travel-sore and spent. Ladies don't hide at midnight in shrubberies,
in private grounds that don't belong to them. Then you say you have no
money, and yet you gave Tester a shilling."

"I gave him my last shilling. Here is my empty purse. Look at it."

"Well, you are very, very queer. You have not even told me your name."

"Josephine. I am called Josephine."

"But you have another name. I am called Catherine, but I am also
Bertram. What are you besides Josephine?"

"Ah, that's trenching into the darkness where you wouldn't like to find
yourself. That's light for me, but dark ruin for you. Don't ask me what
my other name is."

"Listen," said Catherine, suddenly, "you want to see my mother?"

"Yes, I certainly want to see her."

"Listen again. I am absolutely determined that you shall not see her."

"But I have a message for her."

"You shall not see her. My mother is not well. I stand between my mother
and trouble. I know you are going to bring her trouble; and you shall
not see her."

"How can you prevent me?"

"In this way. My mother is away from home. I will take care that she
does not return until you have left this place. I am determined."

"Is that true?" asked the girl. "Is she really away from home?"

"Am I likely to tell you a lie? My mother is from home."

The strange girl had been sitting on the grass. Now she rose, pushed
back her thick hair, and fixed her eyes on Catherine. Catherine again
noticed the singular brightness, the half-wild light in her eyes.
Suddenly it was quenched by great tears. They splashed down on her
cheeks, and made clean channels where the dust had lain.

"I am deadly tired," she said, with a half moan.

"Listen, Josephine," said Catherine. "You shall not spend your night
here. You shall not stay to see my mother. I will take you down to the
lodge and wake up Tester, and his wife shall get a bed ready for you,
and you shall sleep there, and in the morning you are to go away. You
can have breakfast before you start, but afterwards you are to go away.
Do you promise me? Do you agree to this?"

The girl muttered something, and Catherine took her hand and led her
down to the lodge.




CHAPTER X.

THE REASON OF THE VISIT.


On the evening of the next day Mrs. Bertram came home. She looked very
tired and worn, but her manner to her children was less stern, and more
loving than usual. Loftus, in especial, she kissed with rare tenderness;
and even for one brief moment laid her head on her tall son's broad
shoulder, as if she wanted to rest herself there.

On the evening of her mother's return Catherine was particularly bright
and cheerful. As a rule, Catherine's will and her mother's were two
opposing elements. Now they were one. This conjunction of two strong
wills gave an immense sense of rest and harmony to the whole
establishment. No one knew particularly why they felt peaceful and
satisfied, but this was the true cause.

After dinner, Mrs. Bertram saw Catherine by herself. She called her into
the big drawing-room; and while Loftus and Mabel accurately measured out
a new tennis-court, asked her daughter many and various questions.

"She has really gone away, mother," said Catherine in conclusion. "I
went to the lodge early this morning, and Tester told me that she got up
early, and took a bit of bread in her pocket; but she would not even
wait for a cup of tea. Tester said she was out of the house by six
o'clock. She washed herself well first, though, and Mrs. Tester said
that she came out of her bath as fair as a lily, and her hair shining
like red gold. I thought last night, mother," concluded Catherine, "that
Josephine must be a pretty girl. I should like to have seen her this
morning when her hair shone and her face was like a lily."

"You are full of curiosity about this girl, are you not, Catherine?"
asked her mother.

"It is true, mother. I conjecture much about her."

"I can never gratify your curiosity, nor set your conjectures right."

"You know about her then, mother?"

"Yes, I know about her."

"Is Josephine an impostor?"

Mrs. Bertram paused.

"She is an impostor," she said then, in a slow, emphatic voice.

"Mother," said her daughter, suddenly. "You look very ill."

"I have gone through a bad time, Kate. I have been worried. My dear
child, be thankful you are not a middle-aged woman with many cares."

"The thing I should be most thankful for at this moment, mother, would
be to share in all your worries."

"God forbid, child. Heaven forbid that such a lot should be yours. Now,
my dear, we will keep our secret. It is only yours and mine. And--come
here--kiss me--you have acted well, my darling."

The rare caress, the unwonted word of love, went straight to Catherine
Bertram's deep heart. She put her firm young arm round her mother's
neck, and something like a vow and a prayer went up to God from her
fervent soul.

"Come out," said Mrs. Bertram. "The others will wonder what we are
doing. Look as usual, Kitty, and fear nothing. I have been in peril, but
for the present it is over."

When Mrs. Bertram appeared Loftus went up to her at once. She took his
arm, and they paced slowly under the trees. If Mrs. Bertram loved her
daughters, and there is no doubt she had a very real regard for them,
Loftus Bertram was as the apple of her eye. She adored this young man,
she was blind to his faults, and she saw his virtues through magnifying
glasses.

Loftus could always talk his mother into the best of humors. He was not
devoid of tact, and he knew exactly how to manage her, so as to bring
her round to his wishes. Having two ends in view to-night he was more
than usually fascinating. He wanted money to relieve a pressing
embarrassment, and he also wished to cultivate his acquaintance with
Beatrice Meadowsweet. He was not absolutely in love with Beatrice, but
her cool indifference to all his fascinations piqued him. He thought it
would be pleasant to see more of her, delightful to make a conquest of
her. He was not the sort of man to thwart his own inclinations. Beatrice
had contrived to make Northbury interesting to him, and he thought he
could easily manage to get leave to visit it soon again.

That evening, therefore, Mrs. Bertram not only found herself arranging
to put her hand to a bill, payable at the end of six months, for her
son's benefit, but further, quite complacently agreeing to call the very
next day on Mrs. Meadowsweet, the wife of the ex-shopkeeper.

Hence that visit which had aroused the jealous feelings not only of Mrs.
Morris, of Mrs, Butler and Miss Peters, but more or less of the whole
society of Northbury.




CHAPTER XI.

SOMEBODY ADMIRED SOMEBODY.


"Then, if that's the case," said Mrs. Bell, "if that's really and truly
the case, and no mistake about it, Matty must have some new frocks made
up for her at once. I have no idea of a child of mine looking shabby or
behind any one else, but you must tell me truly, Alice, if he really was
attentive. Bless you, child, you know what I mean. Was there any
hand-squeezing, and was he always and forever making an excuse to have a
look at her. No one could have been more genteel than your father during
courtship, but the way his eyes did follow me wherever I turned, over
and over put me to the blush."

"Don't say anything to Matty," responded Alice Bell. "She'll be sure to
giggle awfully when next they meet, if you do. She can't keep anything
in, and she owned to Sophy and me that he had got her heart. Well, yes,
I suppose he was particular with her. He danced with her, and he looked
at her, only, I do think it was _she_ squeezed _his_ hand."

"Oh, fie, Alice, to say such things of your sister. Well, anyhow the
town is full of it. When I went out yesterday Mrs. Morris asked me
point-blank if I hadn't news for her, and Miss Peters has taken so
frightfully to rolling her eyes whenever Matty and Captain Bertram are
seen together, that I'm quite afraid she will contract a regular squint.
How long was he with Matty on the green last night, Alice?"

"About half-an-hour, I should say," responded Alice. "They walked round
the Green five times, with me and Sophy doing gooseberry behind. I don't
think Matty stopped laughing for a single minute, and the captain he did
quiz her frightfully."

"Poor man, he was trying to wheedle her heart out of her!" remarked the
gratified mother. "And he has all my sympathies, and what's more, we
must have him to supper, and lobsters and crabs, and anything else he
fancies. It isn't for me to be hard-hearted, and not give the poor
fellow his opportunities; and no doubt Matty will relent by-and-bye."

"Oh, dear me, mother, she has relented now. She's only waiting and dying
for him to pop the question."

"If I were you, Alice, I wouldn't make so light of your own sister. Of
course she is gratified by being spoken to and appreciated, but if you
think a girl of mine is going to let herself down cheap--well, she'll be
very different metal from her mother before her. Three times Bell had to
go on his knees for me, and he thought all the more of me for having to
do it. If I'm not mistaken, there are some in this town who are jealous
of Matty. Who would have thought that handsome friend of yours, Bee
Meadowsweet, would be looked over and made nothing of, and my girl be
the favored one? Well, I must own I'm pleased, and so will her father
be, too. It's a nice genteel connection, and they say there's lots of
money somewhere in the background.--Oh, is that you, Matty?--Goodness,
child, don't get your face so burnt,--you shouldn't go out without a
veil in the sun. Now come here, pet, sit down and keep cool, and I'll
bring in some buttermilk presently to bathe your neck and cheeks.
There's nothing like buttermilk for burns. Well, well, what were we
talking about, Alice, when Matty came in?"

"About the person we're always talking about," replied Alice, rather
crossly. "About Captain Bertram. Good gracious, Matty, it isn't at all
becoming to you to flame up in that sudden way. Lor' ma, look at her,
she's the color of a peony."

[It may be remarked in passing that the Bells did not echo one another
when at home.]

"Never mind, never mind," retorted Mrs. Bell, who, with true delicacy,
would not look at her blushing daughter.

"I was thinking Matty, my love, that you wanted a new evening dress. I
don't like you to be behind any one else, my dear, and that green skirt
with the white jacket, though genteel enough, doesn't seem quite the
thing. I can't tell what's the matter with it, for the mohair in the
skirts cost nine-pence half-penny a yard, and the first day you wore
those dresses, girls, they shone as if they were silk, and your father
asked me why I was so extravagant, and said that though he would like it
he hadn't money to dress you up in silk attire. Poor Bell has a turn for
poetry, and if he had not lost his money through the badness of the coal
trade, he'd make you look like _three poems_, that's what he said
to me. Well, well, somehow the dresses are handsome, and yet I don't
like them."

"They're hideous," said Matty, kicking out her foot with a petulant
movement. "Somehow, those home-made dresses never look right. They don't
sit properly. We weren't a bit like the other girls at Mrs.
Meadowsweet's a fortnight ago."

"No," said Alice, "we weren't. The Bertrams had nothing but full skirts
and baby bodies, and sashes round their waists, just like little girls.
Mabel Bertram's dress was only down to her ankles--nothing could have
been plainer--no style at all, and yet we didn't look like them."

"Well," said the mother, bristling and bridling, "handsome dresses or
not, _somebody_ admired _somebody_ at that party, or I'm greatly
mistaken. Well, Matty dear, what would you fancy for evening wear? If my
purse will stand it you shall have it. I won't have you behind no one,
my love."

It was at this critical moment, when Matty's giggles prevented her
speaking, and Alice was casting some truly sarcastic and sisterly shafts
at her, that Sophy burst open the door, and announced, in an excited
voice, that Mrs. Middlemass, the pedler, had just stepped into the hall.

"She has got some lovely things to-day," exclaimed Sophy. "Shall we have
her up, mamma? Have we anything to exchange?"

"It's only a week since she was here," replied Mrs. Bell. "And she
pretty nearly cleared us out then. Still it would be a comfort if we
could squeeze a frock for Matty out of her. I could buy the trimmings
easy enough for you, Matty, at Perry's, if I hadn't to pay for the
stuff. Dear, dear, now what can we exchange? Look here, Sophy, run, like
a good child, to your father's wardrobe, and see if there are a couple
of pairs of old trousers gone at the knees, and maybe that great-coat of
his that had one of the flaps torn, and the patch on the left sleeve. It
was warm, certainly, but it always was a show, that great-coat. Maybe he
wouldn't miss it, or at any rate he'd give it up to help to settle
Matty."

"Lor, ma, I really do think you are indelicate, when the man hasn't even
proposed!" exclaimed Alice. "There's Matty, she's off giggling again. I
do believe she'll soon laugh day and night without stopping."

"Are we to have Mrs. Middlemass up or not, mother?" exclaimed Sophy.

"Yes, child, yes. Bring her up by all means. We'll contrive to make some
sort of a bargain with her."

Sophy disappeared, and a moment or two later she ushered Mrs. Middlemass
into the bedroom where the above conversation had taken place.

The pedler was a very stout person, with a red face, and the bundle
which she carried in front of her and propelled first into the room, was
of enormous dimensions.

"Good-day, Mrs. Bell," she said. "Good-day, young ladies. And what may I
have the pleasure of serving you with to-day, Mrs. Bell? I've got some
elegant goods with me, just the style for your beautiful young ladies."

With this speech, which was uttered with great gravity, Mrs. Middlemass
proceeded to open her bundle, and to exhibit the worst muslin, cashmere,
French merino, and other fabrics, which she offered for the highest
price.

"There," she said, "there's a cashmere for you! Feel it between your
finger and thumb, Mrs. Bell, mum, there's substance, there's quality. It
would make up lovely. Shall I cut a length a-piece for the three young
ladies, ma'am?"

"No, no," said Mrs. Bell, "that cashmere is dark and heavy, and coarse,
too. I don't expect it's all-wool. It's shoddy, that's what it is."

"Shoddy, ma'am! That a lady whom I've served faithful for years should
accuse me of selling shoddy! No, Mrs. Bell, may Heaven forgive you for
trying to run down a poor widow's goods. This is as pure all-wool
cashmere as is to be found in the market, and dirt cheap at three and
elevenpence a-yard. Have a length for yourself, ma'am; it would stylish
you up wonderful."

"No," said Mrs. Bell, "I don't want a dress to-day, and that cashmere
isn't worth more than one and six. What we are wishing for--though I
don't know that we really _want_ anything--do we, girls? But what
we might buy, if you had it very cheap, is a bit of something light and
airy that would make up very elegantly for the evening. Do you care to
have another evening-dress, Matty? I know you have a good few in your
wardrobe."

"I don't know," said Matty, "until I see what Mrs. Middlemass has. I
don't want anything common. I can get common things at Perry's; and
perhaps I had better send for my best dress to London, ma."

This remark of giggling Miss Matty's was really astute for she knew that
Mrs. Middlemass held Perry, the draper, in the most sovereign contempt.

"Right you are, my dear," said the pedler, a smile of gratified vanity
spreading over her face, "you _can_ get your common things, and
very common things they'll be, at Perry's. But maybe old Auntie
Middlemass can give you something as genteel as the London shops. You
look here, my pretty. Now, then."

Here Mrs. Middlemass went on her knees, and with slow and exasperating
deliberation, unfastened a parcel carefully done up in white muslin.
From the depths of this parcel she extracted a very thin and crackling
silk of a shade between brick and terra-cotta, which was further shot
here and there with little threads of pale blue and yellow. This texture
she held up in many lights, not praising it by any words, for she
guessed well the effect it would have on her company. She knew the Bells
of old: they were proof against anything that wasn't silk, but at the
glitter and sheen of real silk they gave way. They instantly, one and
all, fell down and worshipped it.

"_It is_ pretty," said Matty at last, with a little sigh, and she
turned away as one who must not any longer contemplate so dazzling a
temptation.

Mrs. Bell's heart quite ached for her eldest-born at this critical
juncture. It was so natural for her to wish for silk attire when the
hero was absolutely at the gates. And such a hero! So tall, so handsome,
such an Adonis--so aristocratic! But, alas! silk could not be had for
nothing. It would be an insult to offer Bell's old coat and the two
pairs of trousers gone at the knees for this exquisite substance.

"Sixteen yards," solemnly pronounced Mrs. Middlemass, when the silence
had been sufficiently long. "Sixteen yards for three pound ten. There!
it's a present I'm making to you, Miss Matty."

"I like it very much," said Matty.

"Like it! I should think you do. It was the fellow of it I sold this
morning to Lady Georgiana Higginbotham, of Castle Higgins. She who is to
be married next month. 'Middlemass,' she said, when she saw it, 'I'm in
love with it. It has a sheen about it, and a quality. Cut me twenty
yards, Middlemass; I do declare I'll wear it for my travelling dress,
and no other.' She'll do it, too, Miss Matty, you'll see. And beautiful
she'll look."

The three girls sighed. They sighed in unison. As there was a lover in
the question, the two younger were willing that Matty should have a new
frock. But a silk! Each girl wanted the silk for herself.

"It is exquisite," said Matty.

"Exquisite," repeated Alice.

"Quisite," said Sophy.

"I'll put it away for you, miss," said the pedler, beginning to pack up
her other things. "There, take it, miss," she said, flinging a long
sweep of the glittering texture over Matty's arm. "Now, it does become
you, my dear. Doesn't it, ma'am?" turning to the mother. "Well, now,
I never noticed it before, but Miss Matty has a great look of Lady
Georgiana. Remarkable likeness! You wouldn't be known from her, miss
when you had that dress on. Their eyes! the complexion! the figure! all
ditto, ditto, ditto."

The girls smiled; but what amount of flattery will not one accept when
judiciously offered? They were all pleased to hear Mrs. Middlemass
compare one of their number to Lady Georgiana, although they knew
perfectly that the pedler had never in the whole course of her life even
spoken to that young lady, who was a head and shoulders taller than
Matty, and as unlike her in all particulars as a girl could be.

"There!" said the pedler. "Three pound ten! Dirt-cheap. Going, you may
say, for nothing, and because it's the last piece I have of it. Lady
Georgiana paid me seven pounds for the length I cut her this morning.
I'd like to see you in this dress, Miss Matty, and, maybe, if all
reports is true, you'll want me to sell you something different, and
more--more--well, more, perhaps, bridal-like, by-and-bye, my pretty
young lady."

This last speech finished the fate of the silk. If rumor had reached
down to the strata of pedlers, etc., it simply could not be disregarded.
Mrs. Bell bargained and haggled for the best part of an hour. She
stripped herself of many necessary garments, and even ransacked her very
meagre little collection of jewelry. Finally the purchase was completed
with the sale of the ring which Bell had given her on the day when he
had gone down on his knees for the third and successful time. That ring,
of a showy style, but made of real gold and real gems, was beloved by
Mrs. Bell above all her worldly goods. Nevertheless, she parted with it
to make up the necessary price for the shot silk; for, what will not a
mother do for her child?




CHAPTER XII.

NINA, YOU ARE SO PERSISTENT.


"I wish you wouldn't worry me so, miss."

"Well, answer my question. Has Mr. Hart come back?"

"Yes--no--I'm sure I can't say. Maybe he's in his room, maybe he's not.
You do look dirty, miss, and tired--my word, awful tired. Now, where
have you been, Miss Josephine, since early yesterday morning? After no
good, I'll be bound. Oh, dear me, yes, after no good! You're a wild one,
and you're a daring one; and you'll come to a bad end, for all your eyes
are so bright, if you don't mind."

Josephine's queer, restless eyes flashed with an angry gleam.

"Do you know what this is?" she said, doubling up her small hand, and
thrusting the hard-looking fist within an inch or two of her irate
landlady's nose. "I knocked a man down before now with this, and I have
no respect for women. You'd better not anger me, Mrs. Timms."

"Oh, dear no, miss, I'm sure I meant no disrespect!"

"That's right. Don't say what you don't mean in future."

"I won't, Miss Josephine. Now I come to think of it, I expect Hart is at
home; I heard him shuffling about overhead last night."

"I'll go up and see," said Josephine.

She nodded to Mrs. Timms, and walked slowly, as though she were dead
tired, and every step was an effort to her, up the stairs. They were
rickety stairs, very dirty and dark, and unkept. Josephine went on and
on, until her upward ascent ended under a sloping attic roof. Here she
knocked at a closed door.

"Come in," said a voice.

She entered a long, low room, which did service as a sitting-room,
kitchen and studio, all combined. A little, old man with a long, white
beard and a bald head was bending over a stove, frying eggs.

"Is that you, Nina?" he said, without looking round. "If it is, you may
as well fry these eggs while I lay the cloth for supper."

"No, you can finish them yourself," replied Josephine. "I'm dead tired.
I'd rather eat no supper than cook it."

She flung herself into a long, low wicker-work chair, folded her hands
and closed her eyes. The old man turned the tail of one eye to glance at
her. Then he resumed his cooking, attending to it very carefully,
removing each egg, as it was browned, to a hot and clean dish which
stood in readiness.

"There," he said, at last, "supper's ready. Here's the vinegar, here's
the pepper, here's the salt, here's the pewter jug with the beer, here's
the bread and butter, and last, but not least, here's your tea,
Josephine. You're nowhere without your tea, are you, child?"

"Pour it out for me," said Josephine. "Put an egg on a plate and give it
to me. I'll be better when I've eaten. I can't talk until I have eaten.
I was taken this way last night--I'll be better presently."

The old man gave her a long, curious glance; then he fetched a tray,
piled it with refreshments, and brought it to her side. She ate and
drank ravenously. The food acted on her like magic; she sat upright--her
eyes sparkled, her pallor left her, and the slight shade of petulance
and ill-humor which had characterized her when she entered the room gave
place to a sunshiny and radiant smile.

"Well, Daddy," she said, getting up, going to the old man and giving him
a kiss. "So you have come back at last. I was pretty sick of being a
whole fortnight by myself, with no one but that interesting Mrs. Timms
for company. You never wrote to me, and however careful I was, that five
shillings wouldn't go far. What did you do in London? And why didn't you
write?"

"One question at a time, Nina. Don't strangle me, child. Sit down
quietly, and I'll tell you my news. I'm a good grandfather to you,
Josephine. I'm a very good and faithful grandfather to you."

"So you tell me every day of my life. I'll retort back now--I'm a good
grandchild to you--the best in the world."

"Bless me, what have you ever done, chit, but eat my bread and drink my
water? However, I have news at last. Now, how eager you look! You would
like to be a fine lady and forget your old granddad."

"I'd like to be a fine lady, certainly," responded Josephine.

She said nothing further, but sitting still, with her small hands
crossed in her lap, she absolutely devoured the old man's face with her
eyes.

He was accustomed to her gaze, which glittered and shone, and never
wavered, and was by some people thought uncanny. He finished his supper
slowly and methodically, and until he had eaten the last mouthful, and
drained off the last drop of beer in the pewter mug, he didn't speak.

Then with a sharp glance at the girl he said, suddenly:

"So you wanted to take me unawares?"

"What do you mean, Grandfather?"

"You know what I mean well enough. However, I'll tell you, you have been
on the tramp; you have no money; but you thought your legs would carry
you where your heart wanted to be. Shall I go on?"

"Oh, yes, you may say anything you fancy. Stay, I'll say it for you.
Yesterday I walked to Northbury. Northbury is over twenty miles from
here. I walked every step of the way. In the evening I got there--I was
footsore and weary. I had one and sixpence in my purse, no more for
food, no more for bribes, no more for anything. I went to Northbury to
see the Bertrams--to see that fine lady, that beloved friend of mine,
Mrs. Bertram. She was from home. You probably know where she really was.
I bribed the gatekeeper, and got into the grounds of Rosendale Manor. I
frightened a chit of a schoolgirl, a plain, little, unformed, timorous
creature. She was a Bertram, coming home from a late dissipation. She
spoke of her fright, and gave her sister the cue. About midnight
Catherine Bertram came out to seek me. What's the matter, Grand-dad?"

"Good heavens! Nina, that glib tongue of yours has not been blabbing.
Catherine! What is Miss Bertram's Christian name to you?"

"Never mind. Her Christian name, and she herself also, are a good deal
to me. As to blabbing, I never blab; I saw her, she spoke to me; I slept
at the lodge; I returned home to-day."

"You walked home?"

"Yes, and I am dead tired; I want to go to bed now."

"You can't for a few minutes. I have a few words to say first.
Josephine, I have always been a good grandfather to you."

"Perhaps you have done your best, Grand-dad, but your best has not been
much. I am clothed after a fashion, and fed after a style, and
educated!" she filliped her slender fingers scornfully; "educated! I
belong to the self-taught. Still, after your lights, you have been a
good Grand-dad. Now, what is all this preamble about? I can scarcely
keep my eyes open. If you are not quick your words will soon fall
unregarded, for I shall be in the arms of that god of delight,
Morpheus."

"I have something very important to say, child. I want to lay a command
upon you."

"What is that?"

"You are not to act the spy on the Bertrams again."

"The spy? What do you mean?"

"What I say. You are not to do it. I have made arrangements, and the
Bertrams are to be unmolested. I have given my oath, and you must abide
by it."

"What if I refuse?"

"Then we part company. You go one way, I another. You are truly a
beggar, and can take up no other position without my aid. You have a
story to tell which no one will believe, for I alone hold the proofs.
Talk much about your fine secret, and what will be the result? People
will think you off your head. Be guided by me, and all comes right in
the end and in the meantime we share the spoils."

"The spoils," said Josephine, "what do you mean?

"I can give you a practical answer, Nina. I have made a good bargain, a
splendid bargain; seeing that I have only put on the first screw, my
success has largely anticipated my wildest hopes. Josephine, my poor
girl, you need no longer suffer the pangs of hunger and neglect. You and
I are no longer penniless. What do you say to an income? What do you say
to four hundred a year?"

Josephine put up her thin, white hand to her forehead.

"Four hundred a year?" she repeated, vaguely. "I don't quite know what
it means. What have we now?"

"Anything or nothing. Sometimes a pound a week, sometimes two pounds,
sometimes five shillings."

"And we have in the future?"

"Didn't I tell you, child? Four hundred a year. One hundred pounds paid
regularly every quarter. Got without earning, got without toiling for.
Ours whether we are sick or well; ours under any circumstances from this
day forward; ours just for keeping a little bit of a secret to
ourselves."

"A secret which keeps me out of my own."

"We have no money to prove it, child, at present. In the meantime, this
is a certainty. Whenever we get our proofs complete we can cease to take
this annuity."

"This bribe, you mean. I scorn it. I hate it. I won't touch it."

Josephine's eyes again gleamed with anger.

"I hate bribes," she repeated.

"All right, child. You can go on starving. You can go your own way, I
mine. For myself, at least, I have accepted the annuity; and if you
anger me any more, I'll burn the documents tonight, which give you the
shadow of a claim."

Josephine turned pale. There were moments when, fearless as she was, she
feared this queer old man. The present was one of them. She sat quite
still for a moment or two, during which she thought deeply. Then she
spoke in an altered tone.

"Grandfather, if I consent to make no fuss, to say nothing, to reveal
nothing by word or action, will you give me half your annuity?"

"Why so, Nina? Had we not better live together? When all is said and
done, I'd miss you, Grandchild, if you left me."

"You'd get over that, Grand-dad. These are not the days when people are
especially affectionate. Will you give me two hundred a year, and let me
live away from you?"

The old man looked down at the floor, and up at the ceiling; then
furtively into his granddaughter's face, then away from her.

"It's late now, we'll talk of it to-morrow," he said.

"No, I am not sleepy any longer. Two hundred a year is worth staying
awake for. Will you give it to me? You can promise to-night as well as
tomorrow."

"This is an important thing. I can't make up my mind all in a minute.
I've got to think."

"You can think now. I'll give you half-an-hour. I'll shut my tired eyes,
and you can think hard for half-an-hour."

"Nina, you are so persistent."

"Exactly, I am so persistent. Now my eyes are shut. Please begin to
think."




CHAPTER XIII.

THE WHITE BOAT AND THE GREEN.


About a fortnight after the events mentioned in the last chapter, the
landlady of the Blue Lion, the little slatternly village inn where Mr.
Hart and his granddaughter had their quarters, was somewhat
disappointed, somewhat puzzled, and certainly possessed by the demon of
curiosity when Hart told her that he and his granddaughter intended to
take their departure that evening. Hart often went away; Mrs. Timms was
quite accustomed to his sudden exits, but his granddaughter was always
left as a hostage behind. Hart with his queer ways, his erratic
payments, was perhaps not the most inviting lodger for an honest
landlady to count upon, but Mrs. Timms had grown accustomed to him. She
scolded him, and grumbled at him, but on the whole she made a good thing
out of him, for no one could be more generous than old Hart when he was
at all flush of cash.

He came down, however, this morning, and told her he was going.

"For a fortnight or so?" responded Mrs. Timms. "You'll leave Miss
Josephine behind as usual? I'll take good care of her."

"No, Miss Josephine is also going. Make out our bills, my good Timms,
I can pay you in full."

That evening there arrived at Northbury by the seven o'clock train a
single first-class passenger--a girl dressed in a long gray cloak, and a
big, picturesque shady hat stepped on to the platform. She was the only
passenger to alight at Northbury, and the one or two sleepy porters
regarded her with interest and admiration. She was very graceful, and
her light-colored eyes had a peculiar quick expression which made people
turn to watch her again.

The strange girl had scarcely any luggage--only a small portmanteau
covered with a neat case of brown holland, and a little trunk to match.

She asked one of the porters to call a cab, did not disdain the shaky
and ghastly-looking conveyance which Loftus Bertram had been too proud
to use; sprang lightly into it, desired the porter to put her luggage on
the roof, and gave the address of Rosendale Manor.

"Oh, that accounts for it," said the man to his mate. "She's one of them
proud Bertram folk. I thought by the looks of her as she didn't belong
to none of the Northbury people."

The other laughed.

"She have got an eye," he said. "My word, don't it shine? Seems to
scorch one up."

"There's the 7.12 luggage train signalled, Jim!" exclaimed the other.

The men forgot the strange girl and returned to their duties.

Meanwhile, she sat back in her cab, and gazed complacently about her.
She knew the scene through which she was passing--she had looked on it
before. Very travel-stained and weary she had been then; very fresh and
keen, and all alive she felt now.

She threw open the windows of the close cab, and took a long breath of
the delicious sea air. It was a hot evening towards the middle of July,
but a slight breeze rippled the little waves in the harbor, and then
travelled up and up until it reached the girl in the dusty cab.

The Northburians were most of them out on the water. No one who knew
anything of the ways of Northbury expected to see the good folk in the
streets on an evening like this. No, the water was their highway, the
water was their pleasure-scene. Each house owned a boat, each garden
ended in steps against which the said boat was moored. It was the
tiniest walk from the supper room or the high tea-table to the little
green-painted boat, and then away to float over the limpid waves.

All the girls in Northbury could row, steer--in short, manage a boat as
well as their brothers.

There was a view of the straggling, steep little High Street from the
water; and the Bells now, in a large white boat with four oars, and
occupied at the present moment by Mrs. Bell, fat and comfortable in the
stern, Alice and Sophy each propelling a couple of oars, and the
blushing, conscious Matty in the bow, where Captain Bertram bore her
company, all saw the old cab, as it toiled up the hill in the direction
of Rosendale Manor.

"Do look at Davis's cab!" exclaimed Matty. "Look, Captain Bertram, it's
going in your direction. I wonder now, if any one has come by the train.
It's certainly going to the Manor. There are no other houses out in that
direction. Do look, Captain Bertram."

"Lor, Matty, you are so curious!" exclaimed her sister Sophy, who
overheard these remarks from her position as bow oar. "As if Captain
Bertram cared! You always do so fuss over little things, Matty. Even if
there are visitors coming to the Manor, I'm sure the captain doesn't
care. He is not like us who never see anybody. Are you, Captain
Bertram?"

"I beg your pardon," said the captain, waking put of a reverie into
which he had sunk. "Did you speak, Miss Bell?" he continued, turning
with a little courteous movement, which vastly became him, towards the
enamored Matty.

"I said a cab was going up the hill," said Matty.

"Oh, really! A cab _is_ an interesting sight, particularly a
Northbury cab. Shall I make a riddle for you on the spot, Miss Bell?
What is the sole surviving curiosity still to be found out of Noah's
ark?"

Matty went off into her usual half-hysterical laughter.

"Oh! I do declare, Captain Bertram, you are too killingly clever for
anything," she responded. "Oh, my poor side--I'll die if I laugh any
more. Oh, do have mercy on me! To compare that poor cab to Noah's ark!"

"I didn't; it isn't the least like the ark, only I think it must once
have found a shelter within that place of refuge."

"Oh! oh! oh! I am taken with such a stitch when I laugh. You are too
witty, Captain Bertram. Sophy, you must hear what the captain has said.
Oh, you killing, funny man--you must repeat that lovely joke to Sophy."

"Excuse me, it was only meant for Miss Matty's ears."

Matty stopped laughing, to blush all over her face, and Sophy thought it
more decorous to turn her back on the pair.

"Does not that green boat belong to Miss Meadowsweet?" interrupted
Bertram. "Look, Miss Bell, I am sure that is Miss Meadowsweet's boat."

(He had seen it for the last ten minutes, and had been secretly hoping
that Mrs. Bell would unconsciously steer in that direction; she was
going the other way, however, and he was obliged to speak.)

"Yes, that's Beatrice," said Matty, in an indifferent tone. "She
generally goes for a row in the evening."

"All alone like that?"

"Yes, Mrs. Meadowsweet is such a coward. She is afraid of the water."

"Poor Miss Meadowsweet, how sad for her to be by herself!"

Matty gave a furtive and not too well-pleased glance at her captain.

"Bee likes to be alone," she said.

"I should never have thought it. She seems a sociable, bright sort of
girl. Don't you want to talk to her? I know you do. I see it in your
face. You think it will be irksome for me, but, never mind, we need not
stay long. I must not be selfish nor indulge in the wish to keep you all
to myself. I know you want to talk to Miss Meadowsweet, and so you
shall,--I _won't_ have you balked."

Here he raised his voice.

"Mrs. Bell, will you steer over to Miss Meadowsweet's boat? Miss Matty,
here, has something to say to her."

Not an earthly thing had Matty to communicate to her friend, but the
captain had managed to put the matter in such a light that she could
only try to look pleased, and pretend to acquiesce.

"Oh, yes, she had always lots to say to her darling Bee," she murmured.
And then, somehow, her poor little silly spirits went down, and she had
a sensation of feeling rather flat.

As will be seen by the foregoing remarks, Captain Bertram had a rare
gift for making killing and funny speeches.

Matty had over and over pronounced him to be the most brilliantly witty
person she had ever in the whole course of her life encountered. But his
talent as a supposed wit was nothing at all to the cleverness with which
he now managed to keep the large white boat by the side of the small
green one for the remainder of the evening. It was entirely managed by
the superior will of one person, for certainly none of the Bells wished
for this propinquity.

Mrs. Bell, who like a watchful hen-mother was apparently seeing nothing,
and yet all the time was tenderly brooding over the little chick whom
she hoped was soon about to take flight from the parent nest, saw at a
glance that her chick looked nothing at all beside that superior chicken
of Mrs. Meadowsweet's. For Matty's little nose was sadly burnt, and one
lock of her thin limp hair was flying not too picturesquely in the
breeze. And her home-cut jacket was by no means remarkably becoming, and
one of her small, uncovered hands--why _would_ Matty take her
gloves off?--was burnt red, not brown by the sun. Beatrice, on the
contrary, looked as she always did, trim and neat, and bright and
gracious. She had on the gray cashmere dress which she had worn when
Captain Bertram first began to lose his heart to her, and over this,
tonight, she had twisted a long bright crimson scarf. Into her white
hat, too, she had pinned a great bunch of crimson roses, so that,
altogether, Beatrice in her pretty green boat made a beautiful picture.
She would have made this in any case, for her pose was so good, and her
figure fine, but when, in addition, there was a sweet intelligent face
without one scrap of self-consciousness about it, and two gray eyes full
of a tender and sympathetic light, and when the rosy lips only opened to
make the pleasantest and most appropriate speeches, and only to give
utterance to words of tact and kindness, Mrs. Bell was not very far
wrong when she felt a sense of uneasiness for her own poor chick.

Shuffle, however, as she would up in the stern, viciously pull the
rudder string so as to incline the boat away from Beatrice, the
captain's will still kept the green boat and the white together. Was he
likely to give in or to succumb to a woman like Mrs. Bell? Had he not
planned this meeting in his own mind from an early hour that morning?
For had he not met Beatrice and incidentally gathered that she would be
sure to be on the water that night? And after receiving this
information, had he not carefully made his plans, wandering about on the
quay just when the Bells were getting into their boat, accepting the
invitation eagerly given that he should go on the water with them, and
afterwards come home to supper.

"Sophy," Mrs. Bell had gasped, at that critical and triumphant moment in
a whisper, pulling her youngest daughter aside, "fly up to Gibb's at the
corner, and order in two lobsters for supper. The captain loves lobsters
with the coral in them. Be sure you see that they have the coral in
them, Sophy. Fly, child. We'll wait for you here."

And Captain Bertram had overheard this whisper, and mentally determined
that Beatrice Meadowsweet should also eat lobster with coral in it for
supper. Was it likely, therefore, that he would now yield to that
impatient tug of Mrs. Bell's rudder? On the contrary, he put out his
hand in apparently the most unconscious way, and held the little green
boat to the side of the white. In his way he was a diplomat, and even
Matty did not suspect that he wanted to do anything but show her a
kindness by keeping her in such close conversation with her friend.

"It's getting quite chill," suddenly exclaimed Mrs. Bell. "Girls, it's
time for us to be getting home. Your father likes his supper punctually.
Well, Bee, my dear, there's no use in asking you to supper, I suppose?
Of course, more than welcome you'd be if you would come, lovey, but
you're such a daughter--one in a thousand. I assure you, Captain
Bertram, I can hardly ever get that girl to leave her mother alone in
the evening."

Beatrice laughed.

"It so happens," she said, "that my mother is having tea and supper
to-night at Mrs. Butler's. So if you really care to have me, Mrs. Bell,
I shall be delighted to come."

Beatrice, the popular, the beloved of all in the town, never knew, never
to her dying day, that on a certain memorable occasion, good-humored,
fat, pompous Mrs. Bell would have given half a sovereign to box her
ears. The astute captain, however, guessed her feelings, and chuckled
inwardly. He had also found out during his brief morning's conversation
that Mrs. Meadowsweet was going to sup from home.

"How delightful you look, Miss Bell!" he said, suddenly, fixing his dark
eyes on Matty.

Their glance caused her to start and blush.

"Mrs. Bell," he said, raising his voice again, "Miss Matty has been so
anxious to have Miss Meadowsweet's company this evening. And now we are
all happy," he added, gayly. "Shall I give you another riddle, Miss
Matty?"

Mrs. Bell's anxious brows relaxed, and she smiled inwardly.

"Poor man! He is over head and ears in love," she murmured. "I suppose
he thinks Beatrice will play gooseberry with the other girls, and leave
him more chance to be alone with little Matty. She does _not_ look
her best, that I will say for her; but, poor fellow, he sees no faults,
that's evident. How beautiful the love-light in his eyes is--ah, dear
me, it reminds me of the time when I was young, and Bell used to go on
his knees to me--Bell hadn't eyes like Captain Bertram though. Dear,
dear, he is attentive, poor man, and how close he bends over Matty. I'll
help him, so I will. I'll take Beatrice and the other girls away when
once we get out of the boat. We four will walk up to the house together,
and let Captain Bertram and his little girl follow. Why, of course,
she's his little girl; bless her, the dear child! Then when we get in,
I'll get Bee and Alice and Sophy to come upstairs by way of consulting
how Matty's new dress is to be made, so the two poor things can have the
drawing-room to themselves. I shouldn't be a bit surprised if he popped
there and then. Well, I am gratified. Bertram is a pretty name--Matilda
Bertram! She won't like to be known as Matty, then. 'Mrs. Captain
Bertram'--it sounds very stylish. I wonder how much money pa will allow
for the trousseau. And how am I to manage about the breakfast? None of
our rooms are big, and all the town's people will want to be asked. It
isn't for me to turn my back on old friends; but I doubt if the Bertrams
will like to meet every one, of course, they are the first to be
considered. Lor, Sophy, how you startled me; what's the matter, child?"

"You're in a brown study, ma. How much longer are you going to stay in
the boat? We have all landed."

"Good gracious! mercy mother! Help me out quick, Sophy, quick! Bee,
Beatrice, come and lend me your hand. You are bigger than my girls, and
my legs are always a little unsteady in a boat. Oh, not you, Captain
Bertram, I beg, I pray. You just go on with Matty to the house, and
we'll follow presently. Go on like a good man, and don't bother
yourself."

Here she winked broadly at Beatrice, who started and colored.

"I don't want to keep him back," she said, in a broad whisper to the
young lady, who was helping her to alight on the steps. "He's over head
and ears, and I thought we would give them their chance. You stay close
to me, lovey. What a fine strong arm you have! There! Alice hasn't a bit
of gumption--as if Matty wanted Alice to walk with her! Alice, come back
and help your mother. I'm quite giddy from the motion of the water. Come
back, child, I say!"

But it was not Alice who turned. Captain Bertram, with the most gracious
gallantry, proffered his arm to the fat old lady, and while he helped
her to the house looked again and again at Beatrice.




CHAPTER XIV.

AT HER GATES.


Mr. Bell was as thin as his wife was fat, and as quiet and unassuming as
she was bumptious and talkative. On the occasion of this memorable
supper he very nearly drove his better half into fits by his utter want
of observation.

"It's that that worries me in Bell," the good woman was often heard to
say. "When a thing is as plain as the nose on his face he won't see it.
And not all my hints will make him see it. Hints!--You might hint
forever to Bell, and he wouldn't know what you were driving at."

These remarks Mrs. Bell had made, times without number, concerning her
spouse, but never had ehe more cause to give utterance to them than on
the present occasion. For just when the whole party were seated at
supper, and she by the boldest manoeuvres had placed Captain Bertram
next to herself by the coffee-tray, and had planted Matty at his other
side, so that he was in a measure hemmed in, and if he did not talk to
Matty had no one to fall back on but herself, who, of course, would
quickly, using the metaphor of battledore and shuttlecock, toss him back
to her daughter--having arranged all this, what should Bell do but put
his foot in it?

"Captain Bertram," he called in his thin voice across the table, "I hope
you enjoyed your row, and I'm proud to see you at my humble board. But
come up here, my good young sir; you're quite smothered by the missis
and the teacups. We have fine room at this end, haven't we, Beatrice?
You come away up here, Captain Bertram, where you'll have room to use
your elbows; the missis mustn't keep you to herself altogether, that
ain't fair play."

"Oh, we're as comfortable as possible, Peter," almost screamed Mrs.
Bell.

But in vain. The captain was too acute a person not to seize this
opportunity. He said a courteous word or two to Mrs. Bell, apologized
for having already crowded her, smiled at Matty, and then with a light
heart seated himself beside Beatrice.

After this, matters seemed to go wrong as far as the Bells were
concerned. It is true that after supper Beatrice called Matty to her
side, and looked over a photographic album with her, and tried hard to
draw her into the gay conversation and to get her to reply to the light
repartee which Captain Bertram so deftly employed. But, alas for poor
Matty she had no conversational powers; she was only great at
interjections, at ceaseless giggling, and at violent and uncontrollable
fits of blushing. Even Beatrice felt a sense of repulsion at the very
open way in which Matty played her innocent cards. Matty was in love,
and she showed it by voice, look and gesture. Beatrice tried to shield
her, she was mortified for her, and felt a burning sense of resentment
against the captain.

In spite, however, of the resentment of the one girl, and the too
manifest admiration of the other, this hero managed to have pretty much
his own way. Beatrice had to reply to his sallies, she was forced to
meet his eyes; now and then even he drew a smile from her.

When the time came for Miss Meadowsweet to go home, Albert Bell was
eagerly summoned to accompany her.

"This is unnecessary," said the captain; "I will see Miss Meadowsweet
back to the Gray House."

"Oh, now, Captain! Bee, don't you think it's really too much for him?"

"Of course I don't, dear Mrs. Bell," said Beatrice, stopping the good
lady's lips with a kiss; "but Albert shall come too, so that I shall be
doubly escorted."

She nodded and smiled to her hostess, and Mrs. Bell felt a frantic
desire to send Matty with her brother, but some slight sense of decorum
prevented her making so bare-faced a suggestion.

Albert Bell was very proud to walk with Beatrice, and Captain Bertram
felt proportionately sulky. To Albert's delight, who wanted to confide
his own love affairs to Bee, the captain said good-night at the top of
the High Street.

"As you have an escort I won't come any further," he said. "When are we
to see you again? Will you come to the Manor to-morrow?"

"I don't know," said Beatrice, "I've made no plans for to-morrow."

"Then come to us; Catherine told me to ask you. Our tennis court is in
prime order. Do come; will you promise?"

"I won't quite promise, but I'll come if I can."

"Thanks; we shall look out for you."

He shook hands, gave her an earnest glance, nodded to Bell and turned
away. His evening had been a partial success, but not a whole one. He
left Beatrice, as he almost always did, with a sense of irritation. It
was her frank and open indifference that impelled him to her side.
Indifference when Captain Bertram chose to woo was an altogether novel
experience to so fascinating an individual. Hitherto it had been all the
other way. He had flirted many times, and with success. Once even he had
fallen in love; he owned to himself that he had been badly hit, but
there had been no doubt at all about his love being returned, it had
been given back to him in full and abundant measure. He sighed to-night
as he thought of that passionate episode. He remembered ardent words,
and saw again a face which had once been all the world to him.
Separation had come, however; his was not a stable nature, and the old
love, the first love, had given place to many minor flirtations.

"I wonder where my old love is now," he thought, and then again he felt
a sense of irritation as he remembered Beatrice. "She is quite the
coolest girl I have ever met," he said to himself. "But I'll win her
yet. Yes, I'm determined. Am I to eat the bread of humiliation in vain?
Faugh! Am I to make love to a creature like Matty Bell in the vain hope
of rousing the envy or the jealousy of that proud girl? I don't believe
she has got either envy or jealousy. She seemed quite pleased when I
spoke to that wretched little personage, although she had the grace to
look a trifle ashamed for her sex when Miss Matty so openly made love to
me. Well, this is a slow place, and yet, when I think of that
haughty--no, though, she's not haughty--that imperturbable Beatrice
Meadowsweet, it becomes positively interesting.

"Why has the girl these airs? And her father kept a shop, too! I found
that fact out from Matty Bell to-day. What a spiteful, teasing little
gnat that same Matty is, trying to sting her best friend. What a little
mock ridiculous air she put on when she tried to explain to me the
social status of a coal merchant (I presume Bell is a coal merchant)
_versus_ a draper."

As Bertram strolled along, avoiding the High Street, and choosing the
coast line for his walk, he lazily smoked a pipe, and thought, in that
idle indifferent way with which men of his stamp always do exercise
their mental faculties, about his future. His past, his present, his
possible future rose up before the young fellow. He was harassed by
duns, he was, according to his own way of thinking, reduced to an almost
degrading state of poverty. His mother had put her hand to a bill for a
considerable amount to save him. He was morally certain that she would
have to meet that bill, and when she met it that she would be half
ruined. Nevertheless, he felt gay, and light at heart, for men of his
class are seldom troubled with remorse.

Presently he reached the lodge gates. His mother's fad about having them
locked was always religiously kept, and he grumbled now as he sought for
a latch-key in his waistcoat-pocket.

He opened the side gate and let himself in; the gate had a spring, and
was so constructed that it could shut and lock itself by the same act.
Bertram was preparing to walk quickly up the avenue when he was startled
by a sudden morement; a tall slim apparition in gray came slowly out of
the darkness, caused by the shadow of the lodge, to meet him.

"Good God!" he said; and he stepped back, and his heart thumped hard
against his breast.

"It's me, Loftus--I'm back again--I'm with you again," said a voice
which thrilled him.

The girl in gray flung her arms around his neck, and laid her head of
red gold on his breast.

"Good God! Nina! Josephine! Where have you come from? I was thinking of
you only tonight. It's a year since we met. Where have you sprung from?
Out of the sky, or the earth? Look at me, witch, look in my face!"

He put his hand under her chin, raised her very fair oval face; (the
moonlight fell full on it--he could see it well); he looked long and
hungrily into her eyes, then kissed her eagerly several times.

"Where have you come from?" he repeated. "My God! to think I was walking
to meet you in such a calm fashion this evening."

"You never were very calm, Loftie, nor was I. Feel my heart--I am almost
in a tempest of joy at meeting you again. I knew you'd be glad. You
couldn't help yourself."

"I'm glad and I'm sorry. You know you intoxicate me, witch--I thought I
had got over that old affair. What: don't flash your eyes at me. Oh,
yes, Nina, I am glad, I am delighted to see you once again."

"And to kiss me, and love me again?"

"Yes, to kiss you and love you again."

"How soon will you marry me, Loftie?"

"We needn't talk about that to-night. Tell me why you have come, and
how. Where is your grandfather? Do you still sing in the streets for a
living?"

"Hush, you insult me. I am a rich girl now."

"You rich? What a joke!"

"No, it is a reality. Riches go by comparison, and Josephine Hart has an
income--therefore she is rich compared to the Josephine who had none.
When will you marry me, Loftie?"

"Little puss! We'll talk of that another day."

He stroked her cheek, put his arm around her waist and kissed her many
times.

"You have not told me yet why you came here," he said.

She laughed.

"I came here because my own sweet will directed me. I have taken rooms
here at this lodge. The man called Tester and his wife will attend on
me."

"Good gracious! at my mother's very gates Is that wise, Nina."

"Wise or unwise I have done it."

"To be near me?"

"Partly."

"Nina, you half frighten me. You are not going to do me an injury? It
will prejudice my mother seriously if she finds out my--my--"

"Your love for me," finished Josephine.

"Yes."

"Why will it prejudice her?"

"Need I--must I tell you? My mother is proud; she--she would almost
disown me if I made a _mésalliance_."

Nina flung back her head.

"You talk like a boy," she said. "When you marry me you save, not
degrade, yourself. Ah, I know a secret. Such a secret! Such a blessed,
blessed, happy secret for me. It is turning me into a good girl. It
causes my heart to sing. When I think of it I revel in delight; when I
think of it I could dance: when I remember it I could shout with
exultation."

"Nina, what do you mean?"

"Nothing that you must know. I rejoice in my secret because it brings me
to you, and you to me. You degrade yourself by marrying me? You'll say
something else some day. Now, goodnight. I'm going back to Tester. He's
stone deaf, and he's waiting up for me. Good-night--good-night. No,
Loftus, I won't injure you. I injure those I hate, not those I love."

She kissed her hand to him. He tried to catch the slim fingers to press
them to his lips, but with a gay laugh she vanished, shutting the lodge
door after her. Loftus Bertram walked up the avenue with the queerest
sensation of terror and rejoicing.




CHAPTER XV.

JOSEPHINE LOOKED DANGEROUS.


In those days after her mysterious and secret visit to London Mrs.
Bertram was a considerably altered woman. All her life hitherto she had
enjoyed splendid health; she was unacquainted with headaches; neuralgia,
rheumatism, gout, the supposed banes of the present day, never troubled
her.

Now, however, she had absolutely an attack of the nerves. Mabel found
her mother, on coming to wish her good-morning one day, shivering so
violently that she could not complete her dressing. Loftus was not at
home. He had rejoined his regiment for a brief spell, so Catherine and
Mabel had to act on their own responsibility.

They did not hesitate to send for the local doctor.

Dr. Morris, who was calmly shaving in his bedroom was very much excited
when his wife rushed in to tell him that he was summoned in haste to the
Manor.

"And you might peep into the Manor drawing-room on your way downstairs,
doctor," whispered the good lady, in her muffled tone, "and find out if
the carpet is really felt. Mrs. Gorman Stanley swears that it is, but
for my part I can scarce give credence to such an unlikely story, for
surely no woman who could only afford a felt covering for the floor of
her best sitting-room would give herself the airs Mrs. Bertram has
done."

"Just see that my black bag is ready, Jessie," was the husband's retort
to this tirade. "And you might hurry John round with the pony-chaise."

Dr. Morris felt intensely proud as he drove off to see his august
patient. He drew up his rough pony once or twice to announce the fact to
any stray passer-by.

"Good-day, Bell,--fine morning, isn't it? I'm just off to the Manor.
Mrs. B. not quite the thing. Ah, I see Mrs. Jenkins coming down the
street. I must tell her that I can't look in this morning."

He nodded to Mr. Bell, and drove on until he met the angular lady known
by this name.

"Good-morning, good-morning," he called in his cheery tones, and
scarcely drawing in the pony at all now. "I meant to look round in the
course of the forenoon to see how the new tonic agrees with Miss Daisy;
but I may be a little late; I'm summoned in haste to the Manor."

Here he touched his little pony's head with the whip, and, before Mrs.
Jenkins could utter a word of either astonishment or interest, had
turned the corner and was out of sight.

The fashionable disease of nerves had not yet become an epidemic at
Northbury, and Dr. Morris was a little puzzled at the symptoms which his
great patient exhibited. He was proud to speak of Mrs. Bertram as his
"great patient," and told her to her face in rather a fulsome manner
that he considered it the highest possible honor to attend her. He
ordered his favorite tonic of cod liver oil, told her to stay in bed,
and keep on low diet, and, having pocketed his fee drove away.

Mrs. Bertram was outwardly very civil to the Northbury doctor, but when
he departed she scolded Catherine and Mabel for having sent for him,
tore up his prescription, wrote one for herself, which she sent to the
chemist to have made up, and desired Catherine to give her a glass of
port wine from one of a treasured few bottles of a rare vintage which
she had brought with her to Rosendale.

"It was a few days after her visit to the Meadowsweets that Mrs. Bertram
had been taken ill. She soon became quite well again, and then rather
astonished Catherine by telling her that she had herself seen Beatrice
Meadowsweet; that she had found her daughter's judgment with regard to
her to be apparently correct, and that, in consequence, she did not
object to Beatrice visiting at the Manor.

"You may make Miss Meadowsweet your friend," she said to both girls.
"She may come here, and you may sometimes go to see her. But remember,
she is the only Northbury young lady I will admit into my society."

A few days afterwards, Loftus, who had again managed to obtain leave of
absence from his military duties, reappeared on the scenes. As has been
seen, Loftus would admit of no restrictions with regard to his
acquaintances, and after the remarkable fashion of some young men, he
tried to secure an interest in the affections of Beatrice by flirting
with Matty Bell.

Mrs. Bertram knew nothing of these iniquities on the part of her son. It
never entered even into her wildest dreams that any son or daughter of
her could associate with people of the stamp of the Bells. Even had she
been aware of it, however, she knew better than to try to coerce her
captain.

She had quite worries enough of her own, poor woman, and not the least
of them, in the eyes of the girls, was the fresh mania she took for
saving. Meals had never been too plentiful at Rosendale. Now, the only
remark that could be made in their favor was that they satisfied hunger.
Healthy girls will eat any wholesome food, and when Loftus was not at
home, Catherine and Mabel Bertram made their breakfast off porridge.

Mabel ate hungrily, and grumbled not a little. Catherine was also
hungry, but she did not grumble. She was never one to care greatly for
the luxuries of life, and all her thoughts now were taken up watching
her mother. The effect of her mother's sudden confidence in her, the
effect of the trouble which had undoubtedly come to her mother had
altogether an extraordinary influence over Catherine. She ceased to be a
wild and reckless tom-boy, she ceased to defy her mother in small
matters; her character seemed to gain strength, and her face, always
strong in its expression and giving many indications of latent power of
character, looked now more serious than gay, more sweet and thoughtful
than fastidious and discontented.

Catherine had plenty of tact, and she watched her mother without
appearing to watch her. She was loyal, too, in heart and soul, and never
even hinted to others of the confidence reposed in her.

It was a lovely summer's morning. Catherine and Mabel were up early;
they were picking raspberries to add to the meagre provisions for
breakfast. It was always difficult to manage a pleasant breakfast hour
when Loftus was at home. Mrs. Bertram used to flush up painfully when
Loftus objected to the viands placed before him, and Catherine was most
anxious to spare her mother by satisfying the fastidious tastes of her
brother.

"Why should Loftus have all the raspberries?" angrily queried Mabel. "I
should like some myself, and so would you, Kate. Why should Loftus have
everything?"

"Nonsense, May, he's not going to have everything. This plate of special
beauties is for mother."

"Well, that's quite right. Loftus and you and I can divide the rest."

"May, I'm going to whisper a secret to you. Now, don't let it out, for
the lords of creation would be so angry if they knew. But I do think in
little things girls are much greater than men. Now what girl who is
worth anything cares whether she eats a few raspberries or not. While as
to the men--I consider them nothing but crybabies about their food.
Here, Mab, race me to the house."

Mabel puffed and panted after her more energetic sister. It was a very
hot morning, and it really was aggravating of Kate to fly on the wings
of the wind, and expect her to follow.

"Kate has no thought," she muttered, as she panted along. "I shall feel
hot and messy for the day now, and there's nothing nice for me to eat
when I do get in. It's all very fine to be Kate, who, I don't think, is
mortal at all about some things, but I expect I'm somewhat of a cry-baby
too, when I see all the nice appetizing food disappearing down a certain
manly throat. Hullo, what's the matter now, Kitty?"

Catherine was standing by the window of the breakfast-room waving an
open note in her hand.

"Three cheers for you, Mabel! You may be as greedy as you please. The
knight of the raspberry plantation has departed. Read this; I found it
on my plate."

Catherine was about to toss the note to Mabel, when a hand was put
quietly over her shoulder, and Mrs. Bertram took Loftus's letter to
read.

"Mother, I didn't know you were down."

"I just came in, my dear, and heard you speaking to Mabel. What is
this?"

She stood still to read the brief lines:

  "Dearest Sis,--I have had a sudden recall to Portsmouth. Will
  write from there. Love to the mother and Mab.--Your affectionate
  brother,

  "Loftus."


Mrs. Bertram looked up with a very startled expression in her eyes.

"Now, mother, there's nothing to fret you in this," said Kate, eagerly.
"Was not Loftie always the most changeable of mortals?"

"Yes, my dear, but not quite so changeable as not to know anything at
all about a recall in the afternoon yesterday, and to have to leave us
before we are out of bed in the morning. Did anybody see Loftus go? Had
he any breakfast?"

Catherine flew away to inquire of Clara, and Mabel said in an injured
voice:

"I dare say Loftie had a telegram sent to him to the club. Anyhow, he
has all the excitement and all the pleasure. I watched him through the
spy-glass last night. He was in the Bells' boat, and Beatrice was all
alone in hers. Beatrice was talking to Loftus and the boats were almost
touching. Mother, I wish we could have a boat."

"Yes, dear, I must try and manage it for you at some future time. Well,
Catherine, have you heard anything?"

"No, mother. Loftus must have gone away very, very early. No one saw him
go; he certainly had no breakfast."

Mrs. Bertram was silent for a few moments; then, suppressing a sigh, she
said, in a would-be cheerful tone:

"Well, my loves, we must enjoy our breakfasts, even without the recreant
Loftus. Mabel, my dear, what delicious raspberries! They give me quite
an appetite."

"Kitty picked them for you, mother," said Mabel. "She has been
treasuring a special bush for you for a week past."

Mrs. Bertram looked up at her eldest daughter and smiled at her. That
smile, very much treasured by Kate, was after all but a poor attempt,
gone as soon as it came. Mrs. Bertram leant back in her chair and toyed
with the dainty fruit. Her appetite was little more than a mockery.

"It was very thoughtful of Loftus not to waken any one up to give him
breakfast," said Catherine.

Her mother again glanced at her with a shadow of approval on her worn
face. Artful Kitty had made this speech on purpose; she knew that any
praise of Loftus was balm to her mother.

After breakfast Mrs. Bertram showed rather unwonted interest in her
daughters' plans.

"It is such a lovely day I should like you to go on the water," she
said. "At the same time, I must not think of hiring a boat this summer."

"Are we so frightfully poor, mother?" asked Mab.

Mrs. Bertram's brow contracted as if in pain, but she answered with
unwonted calm and gentleness:

"I have a fixed income, my dear Mabel, but, as you know, we have come to
Northbury to retrench."

She was silent again for a minute. Then she said:

"I see nothing for it but to cultivate the Meadowsweets."

"Mother!" said Catherine. The old fire and anger had come into her
voice. Unusual as it may be with any girl brought up in such a worldly
manner, Catherine hated to take advantage of people.

"You mistake me, Kate," said her mother, shrinking back from her
daughter's eyes, as if she had received a blow. "I want you to have the
pleasure of Beatrice Meadowsweet's friendship."

"Oh, yes," replied Catherine, relieved.

"And," continued the mother, her voice growing firm and her dark eyes
meeting her daughter's fully, "I don't mean to be out in the cold, so I
shall make a friend of Mrs. Meadowsweet."

Mabel burst into a merry girlish laugh. Catherine walked across the
grass to pick a rose. Mrs. Bertram took the rose from her daughter's
hand, although she knew and Catherine knew that it was never intended
for her. She smelt the fragrant, half-open bud, then placed it in her
dress, with a simple, "Thank you, my dear."

"I am going to write a note to Mrs. Meadowsweet," she said, after a
minute or two. "I know Beatrice is coming here this afternoon. It would
give me pleasure if her mother accompanied her."

"Shall we take the note to the Gray House, mother?" eagerly asked Mabel.
"It is not too long a walk. We should like to go."

"No, my dear. You and Kate can amuse yourselves in the garden, or read
in the house, just as you please. I will write my note quietly, and when
it is written take it down to Tester at the lodge. No, thank you, my
loves, I should really like the walk, and would prefer to take it
alone."

Mrs. Bertram then returned to her drawing-room, sat down by her
davenport, and wrote as follows:

  "Rosendale Manor.

  "Thursday.

  "Dear Mrs. Meadowsweet,--Will you and Miss Beatrice join the girls
  and me at dinner this afternoon? Your daughter has already kindly
  promised to come here to play tennis to-day--at least I understand
  from Kate that such is the arrangement. Will you come with her? We
  old people can sit quietly under the shade of the trees and enjoy
  our tea, while the young folks exert themselves. Hoping to see you
  both,

  "Believe me,

  "Yours sincerely,

  "Catherine de Clifford Bertram."


Mrs. Bertram put this letter into an envelope, directed it in her
dashing and lady-like hand, and then in a slow and stately fashion
proceeded to walk down the avenue to the lodge. She was always rather
slow in her movements, and she was slower than usual to-day. She
scarcely owned to herself that she was tired, worried--in short, that
the strong vitality within her was sapped at its foundation.

A man or a woman can often live for a long time after this operation
takes place, but they are never the same again. They go slowly, with the
gait of those who are halt, through life.

Mrs. Bertram reached the lodge, and after the imperious fashion of her
class did not even knock at the closed door before she lifted the latch
and went in.

It was a shabby, little, tumble-down lodge. It needed papering, and
white-washing, and cleaning; in winter the roof let in rain, and the
rickety, ill-fitting windows admitted the cold and wind. Now, however,
it was the middle of summer. Virginia creeper and ivy, honeysuckle and
jasmine, nearly covered the walls. The little place looked picturesque
without; and within, honest, hard-working Mrs. Tester contrived with
plentiful scouring and washing to give a clean and cosy effect.

Mrs. Bertram, as she stepped into the kitchen, noticed the nice little
fire in the bright grate (the lodge boasted of no range); she also saw a
pile of buttered toast on the hob, and the tiny kitchen was fragrant
with the smell of fresh coffee.

Mrs. Bertram was not wrong when she guessed that Tester and his wife did
not live on these dainty viands.

"I'm just preparing breakfast, ma'am, for our young lady lodger," said
good Mrs. Tester, dropping a curtsey.

"For your young lady lodger? What do you mean, Mrs. Tester?"

"Well, ma'am, please take a chair, won't you, Mrs. Bertram--you'll like
to be near the fire, my lady, I'm sure." (The Testers generally spoke to
the great woman in this way--she did not trouble herself to contradict
them.) "Well, my lady, she come last night by the train. It was Davis's
cab brought her up, and set her down, her and her bits of things, just
outside the lodge. Nothing would please her but that we should give her
the front bedroom and the little parlor inside this room and she is to
pay us fifteen shillings a week, to cover board and all. It's a great
lift for Tester and me, and she's a nice-spoken young lady, and pleasant
to look at, too. Oh, yes, miss---I beg your pardon, miss. I was just a
bringing of your breakfast in, miss."

The door had been opened behind Mrs. Bertram. She started and turned, as
a tall, slim girl with a head of ruddy gold hair, a rather pale, fair
face, and big bright eyes, came in.

The girl looked at Mrs. Bertram quickly and eagerly. Mrs. Bertram looked
back at her. Neither woman flinched as she gazed, only gradually over
Mrs. Bertram's face there stole a greeny-white hue.

The girl came a little nearer. Old Mrs. Tester bustled past her with the
hot breakfast.

"_You!"_ said Mrs. Bertram, when the old woman had left the room,
"you are Josephine Hart."

"I am Josephine; you know better than to call me Hart."

"Hush! that matter has been arranged between your grandfather and my
solicitor. Do you wish the bargain undone?"

"I sincerely wish it undone."

"I think you don't," said Mrs. Bertram, slowly. She laughed in a
disagreeable manner. "The old woman is coming back," she said suddenly;
"invite me into your parlor for a moment, I have a word or two to say to
you."

Josephine led the way into the little sitting-room; she offered a chair
to Mrs. Bertram, who would not take it. Then she went and shut the door
between the kitchen and the parlor, and standing with her back to the
shut door turned and faced Mrs. Bertram.

"How did you guess my name?" she said, suddenly.

"That was not so difficult. I recognized you by the description my
daughter gave of you. She saw you, remember, that night you hid in the
avenue."

"I did not know it was that," said Josephine softly; "I thought it was
the likeness. I am the image of _him_, am I not?"

She took a small morocco case out of her pocket and proceeded to open
it.

Mrs. Bertram put her hand up to her eyes as if she would shut away a
terrible sight.

"Hush, child! how dare you? Don't show me that picture. I won't look.
What a wicked impostor you are!"

"Impostor! You know better, and my grandfather knows better. What is the
matter, Mrs. Bertram?"

Mrs. Bertram sank down into the chair which at first she had obstinately
refused.

"Josephine," she said, "I am no longer a young woman; I have not got the
strength of youth. I cannot bear up as the young can bear up. Why have
you come here? What object have you in torturing me with your presence
here?"

"I won't torture you; I shall live quietly."

"But why have you come? You had no right to come."

"I had perfect right to live where I pleased. I had all the world to
choose from, and I selected to live at your gates."

"You did very wrong. Wrong! It is unpardonable."

"Why so? What injury am I doing you? I have promised to be silent; I
will be silent for a little. I won't injure you or yours by word or
deed."

"You have a story in your head, a false story; you will spread it
abroad."

"I have a story, but it is not false."

"False or true, you will spread it abroad."

"No, the story is safe. For the present it is safe, my lips are sealed."

"Josephine, I wish you would go away."

"I am sorry, I cannot go away."

"We cannot associate with you. You are not brought up like us. You will
be lonely here, you will find it very dull, you had better go away."

"I am not going away. I have come here and I mean to stay. I shall watch
you, and your son, and your daughters; that will be my amusement."

"I won't say any more to you, proud and insolent girl. My son, at least,
is spared your scrutiny, he is not at Rosendale; and my daughters, I
think, they can live through it."

Mrs. Bertram turned and left the little parlor. She gave her note to
Mrs. Tester, desired it to be taken at once to the Gray House, and then
returned quietly and steadily to the Manor. When she got in she called
Catherine to her.

"Kate, the girl you saw hiding in the avenue has come to live at the
lodge."

"Mother!"

"I have seen her and spoken to her, my dear daughter. She is nothing
either to you or me. Take no notice of her."

"Very well, mother."

Meanwhile, in her little parlor, in the old lodge, Josephine stood with
her hands clasped, and fiery lights of anger, disappointment, pain,
flashing from her eyes. Were that woman's words true? Had Loftus Bertram
gone away? If so, if indeed he had left because she had arrived,
then--Her eyes flashed once more, and with so wicked a light that Mrs.
Tester, who, unobserved, had come into the room, left it again in a
fright. She thought Josephine Hart looked dangerous. She was right. No
one could be more dangerous if she chose.




CHAPTER XVI.

A BRITISH MERCHANT.


Soon after four that afternoon, Davis's tumble-down cab might have been
seen standing outside the gate of the Gray House. Immediately afterwards
the door was opened, and Mrs. Meadowsweet, in her rose-colored satin,
with a black lace shawl, and a bonnet to match made her appearance.

She stepped into the cab, and was followed by Beatrice, Jane, the little
maid, handing in after them a small band-box, which contained the cap
trimmed with Honiton lace.

Mrs. Meadowsweet's cheeks were slightly flushed, and her good-humored
eyes were shining with contentment and satisfaction.

"Oh, there's Mrs. Morris!" she said to Beatrice. "I'd better tell her
where we are going. She's always so interested in the Manor folks.
Davis, stop the cab a minute! Call to him, Bee. Da-vis!"

The cap stopped, and Mrs. Morris, eager and bustling, drew nigh.

"How are you, dear?" she said. "How do you do, Beatrice? Isn't it bad
for you, dear love," turning again to the elder lady, "to have the
window of the fly open? Although it is summer, and the doctor makes a
fuss about the thermometer being over eighty in the shade, I know for a
positive fact that the wind is east, and very treacherous."

"I don't take cold easily, Jessie," replied Mrs. Meadowsweet. "No, I
prefer not to have the windows up, poor Bee would be over hot. We must
think of the young things, mustn't we, Jessie? Well, you'll wonder why I
am in my best toggery! Bee and I are off to the Manor, no less, I assure
you. And to dinner, too! There's news for you."

"Well, I'm sure!" responded Mrs. Morris. Envy was in every tone of her
voice, and on every line of her face. As usual, when excited, she found
her voice, which came out quite thin and sharp. "Well, I'm sure," she
repeated. "I wish you all luck, Lucy. Not that it's such a
condescension, oh, by no means. The doctor said the bedrooms were very
shabby in their furniture, and such a meal as those poor girls were
eating for breakfast. He said his heart quite ached for them. Nothing
but stale bread, and the name of butter, and tea like water bewitched.
He said he'd rather never have a child than see her put down to such
fare."

"Dear, dear, you don't say so," answered Mrs. Meadowsweet. "Bee, my
love, we must have those nice girls constantly to the Gray House, and
feed them up all we can. I'm very sorry to hear your news, Jessie. But
I'm afraid we can't wait to talk any longer now. Nothing could have been
more affable than Mrs. Bertram's letter, sent down by special messenger,
and written in a most stylish hand."

"You haven't got it in your pocket, I suppose?" asked Mrs. Morris.

"To be sure I have. You'd like to see it; well, here it is. You can let
me have it back to-morrow. Now, good-bye. Drive on, Davis."

The cab jumbled and rattled over the paving stones, and Mrs. Meadowsweet
lay back against the cushions, and fanned her hot face.

"I wonder if it's true about those poor girls being so badly fed," she
inquired of her daughter. "Dear, dear, and there's nothing young things
want like generous living. Well, it's grievous. When I think of the
quarts of milk I used to put into you, Bee, and the pounds and pounds of
the best beef jelly--jelly that you could fling over the house, for
thickness and solidity, and the fowls I had boiled down for you after
the measles--who's that coming down the street, Bee? Look, my love, I'm
a bit short-sighted. Oh, it's Miss Peters, of course. How are you, Miss
Peters? Hot day, isn't it? Bee and I are off to the Manor--special
invitation--letter--I lent it to Mrs. Morris. Oh, yes, to dinner. I have
my best cap in this band-box. What do you say? You'll look in
to-morrow--glad to see you. Drive on, Davis."

"Really, mother, if you stop to speak to every one we won't get to the
Manor to-night," gently expostulated Beatrice.

"Well, well, my love, but we don't go to see the Bertrams every day, and
when one feels more pleased and gratified than ordinary, it's nice to
get the sympathy of one's neighbors. I do think the people at Northbury
are very sympathetic, don't you, Bee?"

"Yes, mother, I think they are," responded the daughter.

"And she took care not to tell her parent of any little lurking doubts
which might come to her now and then with regard to the sincerity of
those kind neighbors, who so often partook of the hospitality of the
Gray House."

When they reached the lodge, old Mrs. Tester came out to open the gates.
She nodded and smiled to Beatrice who had often been very kind to her,
and Mrs. Meadowsweet bent forward in the cab to ask very particularly
about the old woman's rheumatism. It was at that moment that Beatrice
caught sight of a face framed in with jasmine and Virginia creeper,
which looked at her from out of an upper casement window in Mrs.
Tester's little lodge. The face with its half-tamed expression, the
eager scrutiny in the eyes, which were almost too bold in their
brightness, startled Beatrice and gave her a sense of uneasiness. The
face came like a flash to the window and then disappeared, and at that
same moment Davis started the cab forward with a jerk. It was to the
credit of both Davis and his sorry-looking steed that they should make a
good show in the avenue. For this they had been reserving themselves,
and they went along now in such a heedless and almost frantic style that
Mrs. Meadowsweet had her bonnet knocked awry, and the band-box which
contained the precious cap absolutely dashed to the floor of the cab.

Beatrice had therefore no time to make any remark with regard to Mrs.
Tester's unwonted visitor.

"This is delightful," said Mrs. Meadowsweet, as she clasped her
hostess's hand, in the long, cool, refined-looking drawing-room. "I'm
very glad to come, and it's most kind of you to invite me. Dear, dear,
what a cool room! Wonderful! How do you manage this kind of effect, Mrs.
Bertram? Dearie me--_very_ pretty--_very_ pretty indeed."

Here Mrs. Meadowsweet sank down on one of the sofas, and gazed round her
with the most genuine delight.

"Where's Bee?" she said. "She ought to look round this room and take
hints from it. We spent a lot of money over our drawing-room, but it
never looks like this. Where are you, Beatrice?"

"Never mind now," responded Mrs. Bertram, whose voice, in spite of
herself, had to take an extra well-bred tone when she spoke to Mrs.
Meadowsweet. Miss Beatrice has just gone out with my girls, and I
thought you and I would have tea here, and afterwards sit under the
shade of that oak-tree and watch the children at their game."

"Very nice, I'm sure," responded Mrs. Meadowsweet. She spread out her
fat hands on her lap and untied her bonnet-strings. "It's hot," she
said. "Do you find the dog-days try you very much, Mrs. Bertram?"

"I don't feel the heat particularly," said Mrs. Bertram. She was anxious
to assume a friendly tone, but was painfully conscious that her voice
was icy.

"Well, that's lucky for you," remarked the visitor. "I flush up a good
deal. Beatrice never does. She takes after her father; he was
wonderfully cool, poor man. Have you got a newspaper of any sort about,
that you'd lend me, Mrs. Bertram?"

"Oh, certainly," answered Mrs. Bertram, in some astonishment. "Here is
yesterday's _Times_."

"I'll make it into a fan, if you have no objection. Now, that's better.
Dear, dear, what a nice room!"

Mrs. Bertram fidgetted on her chair. She wondered how many more times
Mrs. Meadowsweet would descant on the elegancies of her drawing-room.
She need not have feared. Whatever Mrs. Meadowsweet was she was honest;
and at that very moment her eyes lighted on the felt which covered the
floor. Mrs. Meadowsweet had never been trained in a school of art, but,
as she said to herself, no one knew better what was what than she did;
above all, no one knew better what was _comme il faut_ in the
matter of carpets. Meadowsweet, poor man, had been particular about his
carpets. There were grades in carpets as in all other things, and felt,
amongst these grades, ranked low, very low indeed. Kidderminster might
be permitted in bedrooms, although Mrs. Meadowsweet would scorn to see
it in any room in _her_ house, but Brussels was surely the only
correct carpet for people of medium means to cover their drawing-room
floors with. The report that Mrs. Bertram's drawing-room wore a mantle
of felt had reached Mrs. Meadowsweet's ears. She had emphatically
declined to believe in any such calumny, and yet now her own eyes saw,
her own good-humored, kind eyes, that wished to think well of all the
world, rested on that peculiar greeny-brown felt, which surely must have
come to its present nondescript hue by the aid of many suns. The whole
room looked immediately almost sordid to the poor woman, and she felt no
longer anxious for Beatrice to appreciate its beauties.

At that moment Clara appeared with the tea. Now, if there was a thing
Mrs. Meadowsweet was particular about it was her tea; she revelled in
her tea; she always bought it from some very particular and exclusive
house in London. She saw that it was served strong and hot; she was
particular to have it made with what she called the "first boil"
of the water. Water that had boiled for five minutes made, in Mrs.
Meadowsweet's opinion, contemptible tea. Then she liked it well
sweetened, and flavored with very rich cream. Such a cup of tea, as she
expressed it, set her up for the day. The felt carpet had given Mrs.
Meadowsweet a kind of shock, but all her natural spirits revived when
she saw the tea equipage. She approved of the exquisite eggshell china,
and noted with satisfaction that the teapot was really silver.

"What a refreshment a cup of tea is!" exclaimed the good woman. "Nothing
like it, as I dare say you know, Mrs. Bertram."

Mrs. Bertram smiled languidly, and raising the teapot, prepared to pour
out a cup for her guest. She was startled by a noise, which sounded
something like a shout, coming from the fat lady's lips.

"Did you speak?" she asked.

"Oh, I beg your pardon, Mrs. Bertram, but don't--it's cruel."

"Don't do what?"

"The tea isn't drawn. Let it rest a bit--why, it's the color of straw."

"This peculiar tea is always of a light color," replied Mrs. Bertram,
her sallow face growing darkly red. "I hope you will appreciate it; but
perhaps it is a matter of training. It is, however, I assure you, quite
the vogue among my friends in London."

Mrs. Meadowsweet felt crushed. She received the cup of flavorless,
half-cold liquid presented to her in a subdued spirit, sipped it with
the air of a martyr, and devoutly wished herself back again in the Gray
House.

Mrs. Bertram knew perfectly well that her guest thought the tea
detestable and the cake stale. It was as necessary for people of Mrs.
Meadowsweet's class to go in for strong tea and high living as it was
for people of Mrs. Bertram's class to aspire to faded felt in the matter
of carpets, and water bewitched in the shape of tea. Each after her
kind, Mrs. Bertram murmured. But as she had an object in view it was
necessary for her to earn the good-will of the well-to-do widow.

Accordingly, when the slender meal came to an end, and the two ladies
found themselves under the shelter of the friendly oak-tree, matters
went more smoothly. Mrs. Bertram put her guest into an excellent humor
by bestowing some cordial praise upon Beatrice.

"She is not like you," continued the good lady, with some naïveté.

"No, no," responded the gratified mother. "And sorry I'd be to think
that Beatrice took after me. I'm commonplace. Mrs. Bertram. I have no
figure to boast of, nor much of a face either. What _he_ saw to
like in me, poor man, has puzzled my brain a score and score of times.
Kind and affectionate he ever was, but he couldn't but own, as own I did
for him, that I was a cut below him. Beatrice features her father, Mrs.
Bertram, both in mind and body."

Mrs. Bertram murmured some compliment about the mother's kind heart, and
then turned to a subject which is known to be of infallible interest to
all ladies. She spoke of her ailments.

Mrs. Meadowsweet beamed all over when this subject came on the
_tapis_. She even laid her fat hand on Mrs. Bertram's lap.

"Now, _did_ you ever try Eleazer Macjone's Pills of Life?" she
asked. "I always have a lot of them in the house; and I assure you, Mrs.
Bertram, they are worth all the doctor's messes put together; for years
I have taken the pills, and it's a positive fact that they're made to
fit the human body all round. Headaches--it's wonderful what Macjone's
pills do for headaches. If you have a low, all-overish feeling,
Macjone's pills pick you up directly. They are wonderful, too, for
colds; and if there's any infection going they nip it in the bud. I wish
you would try them, Mrs. Bertram; I know they'd pull you round, I'll
send for a box for you with pleasure when I'm having my next chest of
tea down from London. I always get my tea from London. I think what they
sell here is little better than dishwater; so I say to Beatrice, 'Bee,
my love, whatever happens, we'll get our tea from town."

"And your pills from town, too," responded Mrs. Bertram. "I think you
are a very wise woman, Mrs. Meadowsweet. How well your daughter plays
tennis. Yes, she is decidedly graceful. I have heard of many pills in my
day, and patent pills invariably fit one all round, but I have never yet
heard of Eleazer Macjone's Life Pills. You look very well, Mrs.
Meadowsweet, so I shall recommend them in future. For my part, I think
the less drugs one swallows the better."

"You are quite right, Mrs. Bertram, quite right. Except for the pills I
never touch medicine. And now I'd like to give you a wrinkle. I wouldn't
spend much money, if I were you, on Dr. Morris. He's all fads, poor man,
all fads. He speaks of the Life Pills as poison, and his terms--I have
over and over told his wife, Jessie Morris, that her husband's terms are
preposterous."

"Then I am afraid he will not suit me," replied Mrs. Bertram, "I cannot
afford to meet preposterous terms, for I, alas! am poor."

"Dear, dear, I'm truly sorry to hear it, Mrs. Bertram. And with your
fine young family, too. That lad of yours is as handsome a young fellow
as I've often set eyes on. And your girls, particularly Miss Catherine,
are specially genteel."

"A great many people consider Catherine handsome," replied her mother,
who began to shiver inwardly under the infliction of Mrs. Meadowsweet's
talk. She tried to add something about Loftus, but for some reason or
other words failed her. After a moment's pause she resumed:

"Only those who know what small means are can understand the constant
self-denial they inflict.

"And that's true enough, Mrs. Bertram."

"Ah, Mrs. Meadowsweet, you must be only assuming this sympathetic tone.
For, if all reports are true, you and Miss Beatrice are wealthy."

Mrs. Meadowsweet's eyes beamed lovingly on her hostess.

"We have enough and to spare," she responded. "Thank the good God we
have enough and to spare. Meadowsweet saw to that, poor man."

"Your husband was in business?" gently in quired Mrs. Bertram.

"He kept a shop, Mrs. Bertram. I'm the last to deny it. He kept a good,
thriving draper's shop in the High Street. The best of goods he had, and
he sold fair. I used to help him in those days. I used to go to London
to buy the Spring fashions, and pretty things I'd buy, uncommonly
pretty, and the prettiest of all, you may be sure, for little Beatrice.
Ah! you could get a stylish hat in Northbury in those days. Poor man, he
had the custom of all the country round. There was no shop like
Meadowsweet's. Well, he made his fortune in it, and he died full of
money and much respected. What could man do more?"

"And your daughter Beatrice resembles her father?"

"She does, Mrs. Bertram. He was a very genteel man--a cut above me, as I
said before. He was fond of books, and but for me maybe he'd have got
into trade in the book line. But I warned him off that shoal. I said to
him, scores of times, 'Mark my words, William, dress will last, and
books won't. People must be clothed, but they needn't read.' He was wise
enough to stick to my words, and he made his fortune."

"I suppose," said Mrs. Bertram, in a slow, meditative voice, "that
a--um--merchant--in a small town like this, might, with care, realize,
say, two or three thousand pounds."

Mrs. Meadowsweet's eyes almost flashed.

"Two or three thousand!" she said, "dearie me, dearie me. When people
talk of fortunes, in Northbury, they _mean_ fortunes, Mrs. Bertram."

"And your daughter will inherit?" asked the hostess of her guest.

"There's full and plenty for me, Mrs. Bertram, and when Beatrice comes
of age, or when she marries with her mother's approval, she'll have
twenty thousand pounds. Twenty thousand invested in the funds, that's
her fortune, not bad for a shopkeeper's daughter, is it, Mrs. Bertram?"
Mrs. Bertram said that it was anything but bad, and she inwardly
reflected on the best means of absolutely suppressing the memory of the
shopkeeper, and how, by a little judicious training, she might induce
Mrs. Meadowsweet to speak of her late partner as belonging to the roll
of British merchants.




CHAPTER XVII.

THE WITCH WITH THE YELLOW HAIR.


A corner is a very pretty addition to a room, and a cleft-stick has been
known to present a more picturesque appearance than a straight one. But
to find oneself, metaphorically speaking, pushed into the corner or
wedged into the cleft of the stick is neither picturesque nor pleasant.

This was Mrs. Bertram's present position. She had suddenly, and at a
moment when she least expected it, been confronted with the ghost of
a long ago past. The ghost of a past, so remote that she had almost
forgotten it, had come back and stared her in the face. This ghost had
assumed terrible dimensions, and the poor woman was dreadfully afraid
of it.

She had taken a hurried journey to London in the vain hope of laying it.
Alas! it would not be laid. Most things, however, can be bought at a
price, and Mrs. Bertram had bought the silence of this troublesome ghost
of the past. She had bought it at a very heavy cost.

Her money was in the hands of trustees; she dared not go to them to
assist her, therefore, the only price she could pay was out of her
yearly income.

To quiet this troublesome ghost she agreed to part with four hundred
a year. A third of her means was, therefore, taken away with one fell
swoop. Loftus must still have his allowance, for Loftus of all people
must know nothing of his mother's anxieties. Mrs. Bertram and her girls
would, therefore, have barely five hundred a year to live on. Out of
this sum she would still struggle to save, but she knew she could save
but little. She knew that all chance of introducing Catherine and Mabel
into society was at an end. She had dreamed dreams for her girls, and
these dreams must come to nothing. She had hoped many things for them
both, she had thought that all her care and trouble would receive its
fruition some day in Catherine's establishment, and that Mabel would
also marry worthily. In playing with her grandchildren by-and-bye, Mrs.
Bertram thought that she might relax her anxieties and feel that her
labors had not been in vain. She must put these hopes aside now, for her
girls would probably never marry. They would live on at this dull old
Manor until their youth had left them, and their sweet, fresh bloom
departed.

Mrs. Bertram thought of the girls, but no compunctions with regard to
them caused her to hesitate even for a moment. She loved some one else
much better than these bright-eyed lasses. Loftus was the darling of his
mother's heart. It was bad to sacrifice girls, but it was impossible to
sacrifice the beloved and only son.

Mrs. Bertram saw her solicitors, confided to them her difficulties, and
accepted the terms proposed to her by the enemy, who, treacherous and
awful, had suddenly risen out of the ashes of the past to confront her.

With four hundred a year she bought silence, and silence meant
everything for her. Thus she saved herself, and one at least belonging
to her, from open shame.

She received Catherine's telegram, and was made aware that Josephine
Hart had come down to spy out the nakedness of the land. She felt
herself, however, in a position to defy Josephine, and she returned to
the Manor fairly well pleased.

It was Loftus, for whom she had really sacrificed so much, who dealt her
the final blow. This idle scapegrace had got into fresh debt and
difficulty. Mrs. Bertram expostulated, she wrung her hands, she could
almost have torn her hair. The young man stood before her half-abashed,
half sulky.

"Can you help me, mother? That's the main point," was his reiterated
cry.

Mrs. Bertram managed at last to convince him that she had not a farthing
of ready money left.

"In that case," he replied, "nothing but ruin awaits me."

His mother wept when he told her this. She was shaken with all she had
undergone in London, poor woman, and this man, who could cringe to her
for a large dole out of her pittance, was the beloved of her heart.

He begged of her to put her hand to a bill; a bill which should not
become due for six months. She consented; she was weak enough to set
him, as he expressed it, absolutely on his feet. All debts would be paid
at once, and he would never exceed his allowance again; and as to his
mother's difficulty, in meeting a bill for six hundred pounds, it was
not in Loftus Bertram's nature to trouble himself on this score six
months ahead.

That bill, however was the proverbial last straw to Mrs. Bertram. It
haunted her by day and night; she dreamt of it, sleeping, she pondered
over it, waking. Six short months would speedily disappear, and then she
would be ruined; she could not meet the bill, exposure and disaster must
follow.

Even very honorable people when they get themselves into corners often
seek for means of escape which certainly would not occur to them as the
most dignified exits if they were, for instance, not in the corner, but
in the middle of the room.

Mrs. Bertram was a woman of resources, and she made up her mind what to
do. She made it up absolutely, and no doubts or difficulties daunted her
for an instant. Loftus should marry Beatrice Meadowsweet long before the
six months were out.

Having ascertained positively not only from her mother's lips, but also
from those of Mr. Ingram, that the young girl could claim as her portion
twenty thousand pounds on her wedding day, Mrs. Bertram felt there was
no longer need to hesitate. Beatrice was quite presentable in herself;
she was handsome, she was well-bred, she had a gracious and even
careless repose of manner which would pass muster anywhere for the
highest breeding. It would be quite possible to crush that fat and
hopelessly vulgar mother, and it would be easy, more than easy, to talk
of the wealthy merchant's office instead of the obnoxious draper's shop.

Bertram, who had just moved with the _dépot_ of his regiment to
Chatham, on returning to his quarters one evening from mess saw lying on
his table a thick letter in his mother's handwriting. He took it up
carelessly, and, as he opened it, he yawned. Mother's letters are not
particularly sacred things to idolized sons of Bertram's type.

"I wonder what the old lady has got to say for herself," he murmured.
"Can she have seen Nina? And has Nina said anything. Not that she can
seriously injure me in the mater's eyes. No one would be more lenient to
a little harmless flirtation which was never meant to lead anywhere than
my good mother. Still it was a great bore for Josephine to turn up when
she did. Obliged me to shorten my leave abruptly, and see less of Miss
Beatrice. What a little tiger Nina would be if her jealousy was
aroused--no help for me but flight. Yes, Saunders, you needn't wait."

Bertram's servant withdrew; and taking his mother's letter out of its
envelope, the young man proceeded to acquaint himself with its contents.
They interested him, not a little, but deeply. The color flushed up into
his face as he read. He made one or two strong exclamations, finally he
laughed aloud. His laugh was excited and full of good humor.

"By Jove! the mother never thought of a better plot. Beatrice--and
fortune. Beatrice, and an escape into the bargain from all my worries.
Poor mater! She does not know that that six hundred of hers has only
just scraped me through my most pressing liabilities. But a small dip
out of Beatrice Meadowsweet's fortune will soon set me on my feet. The
mater's wishes and mine never so thoroughly chimed together as now. Of
course I'll do it. No fear on that point. I'll write off to the dear old
lady, and set her heart at rest, by this very post. As to leave, I must
manage that somehow. The mother is quite right. With a girl like
Beatrice there is no time to be lost. Any fellow might come over to
Northbury and pick her up. Why, she's perfectly splendid. I knew I was
in love with her--felt it all along. Just think of my patrician mother
giving in, though. Well, nothing could suit me better."

Bertram felt so excited that he paced up and down his room, and even
drank off a brandy and soda, which was not in his usual line, for he was
a sober young fellow enough.

As he walked up and down he thought again of that night when he had last
seen Beatrice. How splendid she had looked in her boat on the water; how
unreserved, and yet how reticent she was; how beautiful, and yet how
unconscious of her beauty. What a foil she made to that dreadful little
Matty Bell!

Bertram laughed as he remembered Matty's blushes and affected giggles
and simpers. He conjured up the whole scene, and when he recalled poor
Mrs. Bell's frantic efforts to get the white boat away from the green,
his sense of hilarity doubled. Finally he thought of his walk home, of
the meditations which had occupied his mind, and last of all of the girl
in the gray dress who had put her arms round his neck, laid her head on
his breast, and whose lips he had passionately kissed. That head! He
felt a thrill now as he remembered the sheen of its golden locks, and he
knew that the kisses he had given this girl had been full of the passion
of his manhood. He ceased to laugh as he thought of her. A growing sense
of uneasiness, of even fear, took possession of him, and chased away the
high spirits which his mother's acceptable proposal had given rise to.

He sat down again in his easy chair and began to think.

"It is not," he said to himself, "that I have got into any real scrape
with Nina. I have promised to marry her, of course, and I have made love
to her scores and scores of times, but I don't think she has any letters
of mine, and in any case, she is not the sort of girl to go to law with
a fellow. No, I have nothing really to fear on that score. But what
perplexes and troubles me is this: she has got a great power over me.
When I am with her I can't think of any one else. She has an influence
over me which I can't withstand. I want her, and her only. I know it
would ruin me to marry her. She has not a penny; she is an uneducated
poor waif, brought up anyhow. My God, when I think of how I first saw
you, Nina! That London street, that crowd looking on, and the pure young
voice rising up as it were into the very sky. And then the sound
stopping, and the shout from the mob. I got into the middle of the ring
somehow, and I saw you, I saw you, my little darling. Your hand was
clenched, and the fellow who had dared to insult you went down with that
blow you gave him to the ground. Didn't your eyes flash fire, and the
flickering light from that fishmonger's shop opposite lit up your hair
and your pale face. You looked half like a devil, but you were
beautiful, you were superb. Then you saw me, and you must have guessed
that I felt with you and for you. Our souls seemed to leap out to meet
one another, and you were by my side in an instant, kissing my hand, and
raining tears on it. We loved each other from that night; our love began
from the moment we looked at each other, and I love you still--but I
mustn't marry you, little wild, desperate, bewitching Nina, for that
would ruin us both. My God! I wish I had never met you; I am afraid of
you, and that is the fact."

Perhaps it was the unwonted beverage in which he had just indulged,
which gave rise to such eager and impetuous thoughts in the breast of
Captain Bertram. It is certain when he had slept over his mother's
letter he felt much more cool and collected. If he still feared
Josephine Hart, he was absolutely determined not to allow his fears to
get the better of him. He ceased even to say to himself that he was in
love with this pretty witch of the yellow hair, and his letter to his
mother was as cool and self-possessed as the most prudent among parents
could desire.

Bertram told his mother that he thought he could manage to exchange with
a brother officer, so as to secure his own leave while the days were
long and the weather fine. He said that if all went as he hoped, he
would be at the Manor by the end of the following week, and he sent his
love to his sisters, and hoped the mater was quite herself again.

Not once did he mention the name of Beatrice, but Mrs. Bertram read
between the lines. She admired her son for his caution. Her heart leaped
with exultation, her boy would not fail her.

If she had known that the old postman Benjafield had left a letter by
the very same post for Miss Hart at the lodge, and that this letter in a
disguised hand bore within the undoubted signature of her own beloved
captain, her rejoicing would not have been so keen. But as people are
very seldom allowed to see behind the scenes Mrs. Bertram may as well
have her short hour of triumph undisturbed.




CHAPTER XVIII.

"WHEN DUNCAN GRAY CAME HOME TO WOO."


Most people go away for change of air in the month of August, but this
was by no means the fashion in the remote, little old-world town of
Northbury. In November people left home if they could, for it was dull,
very dull at Northbury in November, but August was the prime month of
the year.

It was then the real salt from the broad Atlantic came into the limpid
waters of the little harbor. August was the month for bathing, for
yachting, for trawling. Some denizens of the outside world even came to
Northbury in August; the few lodging-houses were crammed to overflowing;
people put up with any accommodation for the sake of the crisp air, and
the lovely deep blue water of the bay. For in August this same water was
often at night alight with phosphorescent substances, which gave it the
appearance in the moonlight of liquid golden fire. It was then the girls
sang their best, and the young men said soft nothings, and hearts beat a
little more quickly than ordinary, and in short the mischievous,
teasing, fascinating god of love was abroad.

In preparation for these August days Perry the draper did a roaring
trade, for all the Northbury girls had fresh ribbons put on their sailor
hats, and fresh frills in their blue serge dresses, and their tan
leather gloves had to be neat and new, and their walking shoes trim and
whole, for the entire little world would be abroad all day and half the
night, in company with the harvest moon and the glittering golden waves,
and all the other gay, bright things of summer.

This was therefore just the most fitting season for Captain Bertram to
come back to Northbury, on wooing intent. More than one girl in the
place rejoiced at his arrival, and Mrs. Bertram so far relaxed her rigid
hold over Catherine and Mabel as to allow them to partake, in company
with their brother and Beatrice Meadowsweet, of a certain portion of the
general merry-making.

Northbury was a remarkably light-hearted little place, but it never had
entered into quite so gay a season as this memorable August when Captain
Bertram came to woo.

It somehow got into the air that this gay young officer had taken his
leave for the express purpose of getting himself a wife. Nobody quite
knew how the little gossiping whisper arose, but arise it did, and great
was the commotion put into the atmosphere, and severe the flutterings it
caused to arise in more than one gentle girl heart.

Catherine and Mabel Bertram were in the highest possible spirits during
this same month of August. Their mother seemed well once more, well, and
gay, and happy. The hard rule of economy, always a depressing
_régime_, had also for the time disappeared. The meals were almost
plentiful, the girls had new dresses, and as they went out a little it
was essential for them in their turn to entertain.

Mrs. Bertram went to some small expense to complete the tennis courts,
and she even endured the sight of the Bells and Jenkinses as they
struggled with the intricacies of the popular game.

She herself took refuge in Mr. Ingram's society. He applauded her
efforts at being sociable, and told her frankly that he was glad she was
changing her mind with regard to the Northbury folk.

"Any society is better than none," he said. "And they really are such
good creatures. Not of course in the matter of finish and outward manner
to compare with the people you are accustomed to, Mrs. Bertram, but--"

"Ah, I know," interrupted Mrs. Bertram in a gay voice. "Rough diamonds
you would call them. But you are mistaken, my dear friend; there is, I
assure you, not a diamond in this motley herd, unless I except Miss
Beatrice."

"I never class Beatrice with the other Northbury people," replied Mr.
Ingram; "there is something about her which enables her to take a stand
of her own. I think if she had been born in any rank, she would have
kept her individuality. She is uncommon, so for that matter is Miss
Catherine."

The two girls were standing together as Mr. Ingram spoke. They were
resting after a spirited game, and they made a pretty picture as they
stood under the shelter of the old oak tree. Both were in white, and
both wore large drooping hats. These hats cast picturesque shadows on
their young faces.

Mrs. Bertram looked at them with a queer half-jealous pang. Beatrice was
the child of a lowly tradesman, Catherine the daughter of a man of
family and some pretension; and yet Mrs. Bertram had to own that in any
society this tall, upright, frank, young Beatrice could hold her own,
that even Catherine whose dark face was patrician, who bore the
refinement of race in every point, could scarcely outshine this country
girl.

"It is marvellous," said Mrs. Bertram after a pause; "Beatrice is one of
nature's ladies. There are a few such, they come now and then, and no
circumstances can spoil them. To think of that girl's mother!"

"One of the dearest old ladies of my acquaintance," replied Mr. Ingram.
"Beatrice owes a great deal of her nobleness of heart and singleness of
purpose to her mother. Mrs. Bertram, I have never heard that woman say
an unkind word. I have heard calumny of her, but never from her. Then,
of course, Meadowsweet was quite a gentleman."

"My dear friend! A draper a gentleman?"

"I grant the anomaly is not common," said the Rector. "But in
Meadowsweet's case I make a correct statement. He was a perfect
gentleman after the type of some of those who are mentioned in the
Sacred Writings. He was honest, courteous, self-forgetful. His manners
were delightful, because his object ever was to put the person he was
speaking to completely at his ease. He had the natural advantage of a
refined appearance, and his accent was pure, and not marred by any
provincialisms. He could not help speaking in the best English because
he was a scholar, and he spent all his leisure studying the classics.
Therefore, although he kept a draper's shop, he was a gentleman. By the
way, Mrs. Bertram, do you know anything of the young girl who has been
staying at your lodge? You--you are tired, my dear lady?"

"A little. I will sit on this bench. There is room for you too, Rector.
Sit near me, what about the girl at my lodge?"

"She is no longer at your lodge. She has left. Do you happen to know
anything about her?"

"Nothing."

"Ah, that seems a pity. She is the sort of young creature to excite
one's sympathy. I called to see her a week ago, and she talked prettily
to me and looked sorrowful. Her name, she says, is Hart."

"Really? I--I confess I am not interested."

"But you ought to be, my dear friend, you ought to be. The girl seems
alone and defenceless. She is reserved with regard to her history, won't
make confidences, although I begged of her to confide in me, and assured
her that I, in my position, would receive what she chose to tell under
the seal of secrecy. Her eyes filled with tears, poor little soul, but
her lips were dumb."

"Oh, she has nothing to confide."

"Do you think so? I can't agree with you. Although my lot has been cast
in this remote out-of-the-world town, I have had my experiences, Mrs.
Bertram, and I never yet saw a face like Miss Hart's which did not
conceal a history."

"May I ask you, Mr. Ingram, if you ever before saw a face like Miss
Hart's?"

"Well, no, now that you put it to me, I don't think that I ever have. It
is beautiful."

"Ugly, you mean."

"No, no, Mrs. Bertram. With all due deference to your superior taste I
cannot agree with you. The features are classical, the eyes a little
wild and defiant, but capable of much expression. The hair of the
admired Rossetti type."

"Oh, spare me, Rector, spare me. I don't mean this low girl's outward
appearance. It is that which I feel is within which makes her altogether
ugly to me."

"Ah, poor child--women have intuitions, and you may be right. It would
of course not be judicious for your daughters to associate with Miss
Hart. But you, Mrs. Bertram, you, as a mother, might get at this poor
child's past, and counsel her as to her future."

"She has gone away, has she not?" asked Mrs. Bertram.

"I regret to say she has, but she may return. She promised me faithfully
to come to church on Sunday, and I called at the lodge on my way up to
leave her a little basket of fruit and flowers, and to remind her of her
promise. Mrs. Tester said she had left her, but might return again. I
hope so, and that I may be the means of helping her, for the poor
child's face disturbs me."

"I trust your wish may never be realized," murmured Mrs. Bertram, under
her breath. Aloud she said cheerfully, "I must show you my bed of
pansies, Rector. They are really quite superb."




CHAPTER XIX.

THE RECTOR'S GARDEN PARTY.


A few days after the tennis party at the Manor, at which Bertram had
talked a good deal to Beatrice, and in a very marked way snubbed Matty
Bell, the Rector gave his customary annual treat. He gave this treat
every year, and it was looked upon by high and low alike as the great
event of the merry month of August. The treat lasted for two days, the
first day being devoted to the schools and the humble parishioners, the
second to the lads and lasses, the well-to-do matrons and their spouses,
who formed the better portion of his parishioners.

Every soul in the place, however, from the poorest fisherman's child to
the wealthy widow, Mrs. Meadowsweet, wag expected to come to the Rectory
to be feasted and petted, and made much of, at Mr. Ingram's treat.

With the small scholars and the fishermen and their wives, and all the
humbler folk of the place, this story has nothing to do. But it would
not be a true chronicle of Northbury if it did not concern itself with
the Jenkinses and their love affairs, with Mrs. Gorman Stanley and her
furniture, with Mrs. Morris and her bronchitis, with Mrs. Butler and her
adorable sister, Miss Peters, and last, but not least, with that young,
_naïve_, and childish heart which beat in the breast of Matty Bell.

There are the important people in all histories, and such a place in
this small chronicle must the Bertrams hold, and the Meadowsweets. But
Matty, too, had her niche, and it was permitted to her to pull some not
unimportant wires in this puppet show.

It is not too strong a word to say that Matty, Alice and Sophy Bell,
received their invitation to play tennis at the Manor with a due sense
of jubilation. Matty wore the shot silk which had been partly purchased
by the sale of good Mrs. Bell's engagement ring. This silk had been
made, at home, but, with the aid of a dressmaker young Susan Pettigrew,
who had served her time to the Perrys. Susan had made valuable
suggestions, which had been carried into effect, with the result that
the shot silk was provided with two bodies--a high one for morning wear,
and one cut in a modest, demi-style for evening festivities. The evening
body had elbow-sleeves, which were furnished with raffles of
coffee-colored lace, and, when put on, it revealed the contour of a
rather nice plump little throat, and altogether made Matty Bell look
nicer than she had ever looked in anything else before.

The wonderful Miss Pettigrew had also supplied the dress with a train,
which could be hooked on with safety hooks and eyes for evening wear,
and removed easily when the robe was to act as a tennis or morning
costume. Altogether, nothing could have been more complete than this
sinning garment, and no heart could have beat more proudly under it than
did fair Matty's.

When the captain went suddenly away this little girl and her good mother
had both owned to a sense of depression; but his speedy return was soon
bruited abroad, and at the same time that little whisper got into the
air with regard to the gallant captain, that, like Duncan Gray, he was
coming back to woo. It did not require many nods of Mrs. Bell's head to
assure all her acquaintances whom she considered the favored young lady.
Matty once more blushed consciously, and giggled in an audible manner
when the captain's name was mentioned. The invitation to play tennis at
the Manor completed the satisfaction of this mother and daughter.

"There's no doubt of it," said Mrs. Bell; "I thought my fine lady would
have to come down from her high horse. I expect the captain makes his
mother do pretty much what he wishes, and very right, too, very right.
He wants to show his little girl to his proud parent, and, whether she
likes it or not, she'll have to make much of you, my love. Sophy and
Alice, it's more than likely Matty will be asked to dine and spend the
evening, at the Manor, and I think we'll just make up the evening body
of her silk dress and her train in a bit of brown paper, and you can
carry the parcel up between you to the Manor. Then, if it's wanted, it
will come in handy, and my girl won't be behind one of them."

"Lor, ma, what are we to do with such a bulky parcel?" objected Sophy,
who was not looking her best in a washed-out muslin of two years' date.
"What can we do with the parcel when we get to the Manor?"

"Take it up, of course, to the house, child, and give it to the servant,
and tell her it's to be kept till called for. She'll understand fast
enough; servants always guess when there's a sweetheart in the question.
Most likely she'll place the things ready for Matty in one of the
bedrooms. I'll put in your best evening shoes too, Matty, love, and my
old black lace fan, in case you should flush up dreadful when the
captain is paying you attention. And now, Sophy, you'll just be
good-natured, and leave the parcel with the parlor maid, so your sister
will be prepared for whatever happens."

Sophy, having been judiciously bribed by the loan of a large Cairngorm
brooch of her mother's, which took up a conspicuous position at her
throat, finally consented to carry the obnoxious parcel. Alice was
further instructed, in case Mrs. Bertram so far failed in her duty as to
neglect to invite Matty to stay to dine at the Manor to try and bring
Captain Bertram back with them to supper.

"You tell him that I'll have a beautiful lobster, and a crab done to a
turn ready for him," whispered the mother. "You'll manage it, Alice, and
look sympathetic when you speak to him, poor fellow. Let him know that
I'll give him his chances, whether that proud lady, his mother, does or
not. Now then, off you go, all three of you. Kiss me, Matty, my pet.
Well, to be sure, you do look stylish."

The three little figures in their somewhat tight shoes toddled down the
street. In the evening they toddled back again. The brown paper parcel
tossed, and somewhat torn, was tucked fiercely under Sophy's arm, and
Alice was unaccompanied by any brave son of Mars.

Sophy was the first to enter her expectant mother's presence.

"There, ma," she said, flinging the paper parcel on the table. "I hope
we have had enough of those Bertrams and their ways. The fuss I had over
that horrid parcel. I thought I'd never get it back again. In the end I
had to see Mrs. Bertram about it, and didn't she crush me just! She's an
awful woman. I never want to speak to her again all my life, and as to
the captain caring for Matty!"

"Where is Matty?" here interrupted Mrs. Bell. "She was not asked to stay
behind after all, then?"

"_She_ asked to stay behind? You speak for yourself, Matty. For my
part, I think it was very unfair to give Matty that silk. We might all
have had nice washing muslins for the price of it. Where are you, Matty?
Oh, I declare she has gone upstairs in the sulks!"

"You're in a horrid bad temper, Sophy; that I can see," expostulated the
mother. "Well, Alice, perhaps you can tell me what all this fuss is
about? I hope to goodness you gave the captain my message, child."

"I didn't see him to give it, mother," answered Alice. "He never spoke
once to us the whole time. He just shook hands when we arrived, but even
then he didn't speak."

"Captain Bertram never spoke to Matty during the entire evening?" gasped
Mrs. Bell. "Child, you can't be speaking the truth, you must be joking
me."

"I'm not, truly, mother. Captain Bertram didn't even look at Matty. He
was all the time following Beatrice Meadowsweet about like a shadow."

Mrs. Bell gave her head a toss.

"Oh, that's it, is it?" she said. "I didn't think the captain would be
so artful. Mark my word, girls, he behaved like that just as a blind to
put his old mother off the scent."

But as Mrs. Bell spoke her heart sank within her. She remembered again
how Beatrice had looked that evening in the green boat, and she saw once
more Matty's tossed locks and sunburnt hands.

After a time she went upstairs, and without any ceremony entered her
daughter's room.

Matty had tossed off the gaudy silk, and was lying on her bed. Her poor
little face was blistered with tears, and, as Mrs. Bell expressed it, it
"gave me a heart-ache even to look at her." She was not a woman,
however, to own to defeat. She pretended not to see Matty's tears, and
she made her tone purposely very cheerful.

"Come, come, child," she said, "what are you stretched on the bed for,
as if you were delicate? Now, I wouldn't let this get to Captain
Bertram's ears for the world."

"What do you mean, mother?" asked the astonished daughter.

"What I say, my love. I wouldn't let the captain know that you were so
tired as to have to lie down after a game of tennis, for a ten pound
note. Nothing puts a man off a girl so soon as to hear that she's
delicate."

"Oh, he--he doesn't care," half sobbed Matty.

"Oh, doesn't he, though? I never knew anything more like caring than for
him to be too shy to come near you. Things have gone pretty far when a
man has to blind his mother by pretending to be taken up with another
girl. I knew the captain was in love, Matty, but I did not suppose he
was deep enough to play his cards after that fashion. You get up now,
lovey, and come down, and have a nice hot cup of tea. It will revive you
wonderfully, my pet."

Matty allowed her mother to coax her off the bed, and to assist her on
with her every-day brown holland frock. She was a good deal comforted
and inclined to reconsider the position which had seemed so hopeless
half-an-hour ago.

"Only he did neglect me shamefully," she said, with a little toss of her
head. "And I don't see why I should take it from him."

"That's right, my girl. You show Captain Bertram you've got a spirit of
your own. There's nothing brings a man to the point like a girl giving
him a little bit of sauce. Next time he speaks to you, you can be as
stand-off as you please, Matty."

"Yes, mother," said Matty, in a languid tone.

She knew, however, that it was not in her nature to be stand-off to any
one, and beneath all the comfort of her mother's words she could not
help doubting if Captain Bertram would care how she behaved to him.

The next morning the Rector's invitation came for the annual treat, and
the hopes of the Bells once more rose high. On this occasion Mrs. Bell
was to accompany her daughters. Bell would also be present, but, as he
was never of much account, this small fact scarcely rested on any one's
mind. All the town was now in state of ferment. The Rector's party was
the only thing spoken about, and many were the prognostications with
regard to the weather.

The day of festival came at last; the sun arose gloriously, not a cloud
was in the sky, all the merry-makers might go in their best, and all
hearts might be jubilant. It was delightful to see Northbury on this
day, for so gay were the costumes worn by its inhabitants that as they
passed through the narrow old streets they gave the place of their birth
a picturesque and even a foreign appearance.

The Rectory was just outside the town, and, of course, all the footsteps
were bending thither. The Rector had invited his guests to assemble at
three o'clock, and punctually at a quarter to that hour Miss Peters
seated herself in her bay window, armed with a spy-glass to watch the
gathering crowd.

Miss Peters was already arrayed in her festive clothes, but she and Mrs.
Butler thought it ungenteel not to be, at least, an hour late. "The
Bertrams will be sure to be late," remarked the good lady to her sister,
"and we, too, Martha, will show that we know what's what."

"Which we don't," snapped Mrs. Butler. "We are sure and certain to be
put in the wrong before we are half-an-hour there. However, I agree with
you, Maria; we won't be among the hurryers. I hate to be one of those
who snap at a thing. Now, what's the matter? How you do startle me!"

"It's Mrs. Gorman Stanley," gasped Miss Peters; "she's in red velvet,
with a beaded bodice--and--oh, do look at her bonnet, Martha!
Positively, it's hideous. A straw-green, with blue forget-me-nots, and
those little baby daisies dropping over her hair. Well, well, how that
woman does ape youth!"

Mrs. Butler snatched the spy-glass from her sister, and surveyed Mrs.
Gorman Stanley's holiday attire with marked disapproval. She threw down
her glasses presently with a little sniff.

"Disgusting," she said with emphasis. "That woman will never see fifty
again, and she apes seventeen. For my part, I think, when women reach a
certain age they should not deck themselves with artificial flowers.
Flowers are for the young, not for poor worn-out, faded types of
humanity. Now you, Maria----"

"Oh, don't," said Miss Maria, stepping back a few paces in alarm, and
putting up her hand to her bonnet, "don't say that wallflowers aren't
allowable, Martha; I always did think that wallflowers were so
_passé_. That's why I chose them."

"Who's that now?" exclaimed Mrs. Butler. "My word, Maria, get quick
behind the curtain and peep! Give me the spy-glass; I'll look over your
head. Why, if it isn't--no--yes--it is, though--it's that young Captain
Bertram, a _most_ stylish young man! He looks elegant in flannels--quite
a noble face--I should imagine him to be the image of Julius
Caesar--there he comes--and Bee--Bee Meadowsweet with him."

"Just like her name," murmured Miss Peters; "just--just like her name,
bless her!"

The poor, withered heart of the little old maid quite swelled with love
and admiration as the beautiful girl, dressed simply all in white, with
roses on her cheeks, and sparkles in her eyes, walked to the scene of
the coming gayeties in the company of the acknowledged hero of the town.

"Poor Matty Bell, I pity her!" said Mrs. Butler. "Oh, it has been a
sickening sight the way the mother has gone on lately, perfectly
sickening; but she'll have her come down, poor woman, and I, for one,
will say, serve her right."

"We may as well be going, Martha," said Miss Peters.

"Well, I suppose so, since our betters have led the way. Now, Maria,
don't drag behind, and don't ogle me with your eyes more than you can
help. I have made up my mind to have a seat next to Mrs. Bertram at the
feast, and to bring her down a peg if I can. Now, let's come on."

The ladies left the house and joined the group of holiday-seekers, who
were all going in the direction of the Rectory. When they reached the
festive scene, the grounds were already thronged. Mr. Ingram was very
proud of his gardens and smoothly-kept lawns. He hated to see his velvet
swards trampled on and made bare by the tread of many feet. He disliked
the pet flowers in his greenhouses being pawed and smelt, and his trim
ribbon borders being ruthlessly despoiled. But on the day of the annual
treat he forgot all these prejudices. The lawns, the glass-houses, the
flower-beds, might and would suffer, he cared not. He was giving supreme
pleasure to human flowers, and for two days out of the three hundred and
sixty-five they were free to do as they liked with the vegetable kingdom
over which on every other day he reigned as monarch supreme. Marquees
now dotted the lawns, and one or two brass bands played rather shrill
music. There were tennis-courts and croquet lawns, and fields set aside
for archery. Luxurious seats, with awnings over them, were to be found
at every turn, and as the grass was of the greenest here, the trees of
the shadiest, and the view of the blue harbor the loveliest, the
Rector's place, on the day of the feast, appeared to more than one
enthusiastic inhabitant of Northbury just like fairyland.

Matty Bell thought so, as, accompanied by her sisters and mother she
stepped into the enchanted ground. The girls were in white to-day, not
well made, and very bunchy and thick of texture. But still the dresses
were white, and round each modest waist was girdled a sash of virgin
blue.

"It makes me almost weep to look at the dear children," whispered Mrs.
Bell to her husband. "They look so innocent and lamb-like, more
particularly Matty."

Here she sighed profoundly.

"I don't see why you should single out Matty," retorted the spouse.
"She's no more than the others, as far as I can see, and Sophy has the
reddest cheeks."

"That's all you know," said Mrs. Bell. Here she almost shook herself
with disdain. "Well, Peter, I often do wonder what Pas are for--not for
observation, and not for smoothing a girl's path, and helping an ardent
young lover. Oh, no, no!"

"Helping an ardent young lover, Tilly! Whatever are you talking about?
Where is he? I don't see him."

"You make me sick, Peter. Hold your tongue, do, and believe your wife
when she says that's about all you are good for. Matty's on the brink,
and that's the truth."

Poor Bell looked as mystified as he felt. Presently he slunk away to
enjoy a quiet smoke with some congenial spirits in the coal trade, and
Mrs. Bell marshalled her girls to as prominent a position as she could
find.

It was her object to get on the terrace. The terrace was very broad, and
ran not only the length of the front of the house, but a good way beyond
at either side. At each end of the terrace was a marquee, decorated with
colored flags, and containing within the most refined order of
refreshments. On the terrace were many seats, and the whole place was a
blaze of gay dresses, brilliant flowers, and happy, smiling faces.

It was here the _élite_ of the pleasure-seekers evidently meant to
congregate, and as Mrs. Bell intended, on this occasion at least, to
join herself to the select few, her object was to get on the terrace.
She had not at first, however, the courage to mount those five sacred
steps uninvited. The battery of eyes which would be immediately turned
upon her would be greater than even her high spirit could support. Mr.
Ingram had already spoken to her, she did not know Mrs. Bertram,
although she felt that if Catherine or Mabel were near she might call to
one of them, and make herself known as Matty's mother.

Catherine and Mabel were, however, several fields away engaged in a
vigorous game of archery. Mrs. Bell raised her fat face, and surveyed
the potentates of the terrace with anxiety.

"Keep close to me, Matty," she said to her eldest daughter. "Don't go
putting yourself in the background. It isn't becoming, seeing what will
be expected of you by-and-by. Now I wonder where the captain is! Mr.
Ingram is sure to make a fuss about those Bertrams, and that young man
will be expected to be at the beck and call of everybody all day long.
But never you mind, Matty, my pet. He shall have his chances, or my name
is not Tilly Bell."

"I wish ma wouldn't," whispered Sophy to Alice. "I don't believe Captain
Bertram cares a bit for Matty. Now, what are we all going to do! Oh,
dear, I quite shake in my shoes. Ma is awfully venturesome, and I know
we will be snubbed."

"Come on, girls," said Mrs. Bell looking over her shoulder. "What are
you loitering for? I see Mrs. Gorman Stanley at the back there, by one
of the big refreshment booths. I'm going to make for her."

"Oh, ma, she doesn't care a bit for us."

"Never mind, she'll do as an excuse. Now let's all keep close together."

Amongst the select company on the terrace Mrs. Bertram of course
found a foremost place. She was seated next to Lady Verney, whose
daughter, the Lady Georgiana Higginbotham also stood near, languidly
pulling a splendid gloire de Dijon rose to pieces. She was a tall,
sallow-faced girl, with the true aristocratic expression of
"I-won't-tell-you-anything-at-all" stamped on her face. She was to be
married the following week, and had all the airs of a bride-elect.

This young lady raised her pince nez to watch the Bells as they ascended
the steps.

"Who _are_ those extraordinary people?" she whispered to her mother.

"I'm sure I don't know, my dear. How intolerably hot it is. Really our
good Rector ought not to ask us to submit to the fierce rays of the sun
during this intense weather. Georgiana, pray keep in the shade. Yes,
Mrs. Bertram, you must find the absence of all society a drawback here."

"I sha'n't stay here long," responded Mrs. Bertram. "Catherine is still
so young that she does not want society. Ah, there is Loftus. I should
like to introduce him. Loftus, come here."

Captain Bertram, raising his hat to the Bells as he passed, approached
his mother's side. He was introduced in due form to Lady Verney and the
Lady Georgiana, and the two young people, retiring a little into the
background, began to chat.

"Who are those extraordinary folk?" asked Lady Georgiana of her
companion.

She waved her fan in the direction of Mrs. Bell's fat back.

"Do you know them, Captain Bertram?"

His eyes fairly danced with mirth as he swept them over the little
group.

"I must confess something, Lady Georgiana. I do know those young ladies
and their mother. I have supped with them."

"Oh, horrors! And yet, how entertaining. What were they like?"

"Like themselves."

"That is no answer. Do divert me with an account of them all. I am sure
they are deliciously original. I should like to sketch that mother's
broad back beyond anything."

It was at this moment that Beatrice and Catherine appeared together on
the scene. Captain Bertram, who thought himself an adept in a certain
mild, sarcastic description, was about to gratify Lady Georgiana with a
graphic account of the Bells' supper-table, when his gaze met the kind,
clear, happy expression of Beatrice Meadowsweet's eyes. He felt his
heart stir within him. The Bells were her friends, and she was so good,
bless her--the best girl he had ever met. No, he could not, he would
not, turn them into fun, just to while away an idle five minutes.

Mrs. Bertram called Catherine over to introduce her to Lady Verney, and
Bertram, in a moment, was by Beatrice's side.

"This is lucky," he said. "I thought you had left me for the day."

"Why should you think that?" she replied. "It would be impossible for
people not constantly to come against each other in a small place like
this."

"May I come with you now? You seem very busy."

"You can come and help me if you feel inclined. I always have a great
deal to do at these feasts; I have been at them for years, and know all
about them, and the Rector invariably expects me to keep the ball
going."

"What ball?"

"The ball of pleasure. Each hand must grasp it--everyone must be happy.
That is the Hector's aim and mine."

"I think it is your aim not only to-day, but every day."

"Yes, if I can manage it. I can't always."

"You could always make me very happy."

Beatrice turned her eyes and looked at him. Her look made him blush.

"You are mistaken when you say that," she responded, in a grave tone.
"You are not the sort of person to be made happy by a simple country
girl like me. The Northbury people only need small things, and many
times it is within my power to supply their desires. But you are
different. You would not be content with small things."

"Assuredly not from you."

Then he paused; and as she blushed this time, he hastened to add:

"You can help me not in a small, but in a big way, and if you grant me
this help, you will save my mother, and--yes--and Catherine."

"I love Catherine," said Beatrice.

"I know it--you would like to save her."

"Certainly; but I did not know she was in peril."

"Don't whisper it, but she is. You can put things straight for her. May
I talk to you? May I tell you what I mean?"

"You look very solemn, and this is a day of pleasure. Must you talk to
me to-day?"

"I won't talk of anything to worry you today. But I may some time?"

"I suppose you may. At least it is difficult to reply in the negative to
any one who wants my help."

"That is all I need you to say. You will understand after I have spoken.
May I come to see you to-morrow?"

"Yes, you may come to-morrow. I shall be at home in the morning."

"Beatrice," said a voice, "Bee--Trixie--I do think it's unkind to cut an
old friend."

Beatrice turned.

Mrs. Bell, puffed and hot, accompanied by Matty, who was also a little
blown, and by the younger girls, looking very cross, had been chasing
Captain Bertram and Miss Meadowsweet from one lawn to another. Mrs.
Bell, after receiving a somewhat severe snubbing from Mrs. Gorman
Stanley, had just retired into the marquee to refresh herself with
strawberry ices, when Sophy, laying a hand on her mother's shoulder,
informed her in a loud whisper that Captain Bertram and Bee Meadowsweet
had gone down the steps of the terrace to the tennis lawn side by side.

"We'll make after them!" exclaimed the good lady. "Girls, don't finish
your ices; come quick."

Mrs. Bell took her eldest daughter's hand, and rushed out of the tent.
Sophy and Alice stayed behind to have one parting spoonful each of their
delicious ices. Then the whole family went helter-skelter down the five
sacred steps and on to the lawn. They saw the objects of their desire
vanishing through a gap in the hedge into a distant field. They must
pursue, they must go hotly to work. Mrs. Bell panted and puffed, and
Matty stopped once to breathe hard.

"Courage, child," said the mother. "We'll soon be up with them. I'm not
the woman to leave an innocent young man alone with that siren."

"Mother! You call Beatrice a siren?"

"Well, and what is she, Matty, when she takes your lawful sweetheart
away before your very eyes? But here, we're in hailing distance, now,
and I'll shout. Beatrice--Bee--Trixie!"

Beatrice turned. She came up at once to Mrs. Bell, took her hand, and
asked all four why they had run so fast after her.

"For I was coming back at once," she said, in a _naïve_ tone.
"Captain Bertram was kind enough to walk with me to the archery field.
Then I was coming to arrange some tennis sets."

"My girls have had no tennis yet to-day, Beatrice," said Mrs. Bell,
fixing her eyes solemnly on Miss Meadowsweet. "And they are all partial
to it, more especially Matty. You're a devotee to tennis too, aren't
you, Captain Bertram?"

"Well, ah, no, I don't think I am," said the captain.

"You'd maybe rather have a quiet walk, then. For my part I approve of
young men who are prudent, and don't care to exercise themselves too
violently. Violent exercise puts you into too great a heat, and then
you're taken with a chill, and lots of mischief is done that way. Bee,
lend me your arm, love. I'm more recovered now, but I did have to hurry
after you, and that's a fact."

Determined women very often have their way, and Mrs. Bell had the
satisfaction of walking in front with Beatrice, while Captain Bertram
brought up the rear in Matty's company.

Sophy and Alice Bell no longer belonged to the group. They had found
matters so intolerably dull that they started off on their own hook to
find partners for tennis.

Mrs. Bell, as she walked in front with Beatrice heard Matty's little and
inane giggles, and her heart swelled within her.

"Poor young man, he is devoted," she whispered to her companion. "Ah,
dear me, Beatrice, I know you sympathize with me; when one has a dear
child's fate trembling in the balance it's impossible not to be
anxious."

Mrs. Bell's face was so solemn, and her words so portentous, that
Beatrice was really taken in. It was stupid of her to misunderstand the
good woman, but she did.

"Is anything the matter?" she asked, turning to look at Mrs. Bell.
"Whose fate is trembling in the balance?"

If it had been possible for light blue eyes of a very common shade and
shape to wither with a look, poor Beatrice would never have got over
that terrible moment.

Stout Mrs. Bell dropped her companion's arm, moved two or three paces
away, and accompanied her scorching glance with words of muffled
thunder.

"Beatrice Meadowsweet, you are either green with jealousy, or you are a
perfect goose."




CHAPTER XX.

YOU CAN TAKE ANY RANK.


Beatrice was not, in any sense of the word, a conventional girl. Her
nature was independent, and from her earliest days she had been allowed
a great deal of liberty. While her father lived he had trained her to
love his tastes, to respond to his ideas; he had shared his thoughts
with her, and as these thoughts happened to be original, and even
slightly tinged with latent genius, the young girl had from the first
taken a broad view of life. She was naturally intelligent; and to read
and think for herself became a delight to her.

Mr. Meadowsweet died when Beatrice was twelve and then that further
thing happened which so often makes an unselfish woman really noble.
Beatrice had to support the burdens of another. Mrs. Meadowsweet was a
most loving and affectionate character; but she was not as strong
mentally as her daughter. She did not know that she leant on Beatrice,
but she did. The effect of all this was that Miss Meadowsweet grew up
something as the wild flowers do, with perfect liberty, and yet governed
by the gracious and kindly laws which nature sets about her children.

Beatrice did not know what it was to be proud of her reputed wealth.
When she looked at her sweet face in the glass she was not vain of it.
Altogether, she was a very simple-hearted girl, as yet untouched by real
trouble, for, except when her father died, its shadow had not approached
her.

The passionate, childish sorrow for her father was no longer poignant.
She revered his memory, she loved to dwell on his gentleness and
goodness, and in her own manner she tried to plant her young footsteps
in his.

On the morning after the Rector's feast, Beatrice sat at home and waited
for Captain Bertram. She almost always wore white in the hot days, and
she was in white now. She chose natural flowers as her invariable
adornment, and two crimson roses were now daintily fastened into her
girdle.

Beatrice could not help wondering what special thing Captain Bertram had
to communicate. She was not particularly troubled or roused in any way
by his admiration of her. He was certainly pleasant to talk to; she had
never met a refined man of the world before, and Captain Bertram was
handsome to look at, and had a charming way of saying charming nothings.
Beatrice did not object to his talking to her, but her heart had never
yet in the smallest degree responded to any beat of his.

More than one young man in Northbury had fallen in love with Beatrice.
She had been very kind to these would-be lovers, and had managed
skilfully to get rid of them. No man yet had secured even a small place
in her affections.

"Are you going out this morning, Bee?" asked her mother. "It's very
fine, and you are fond of a row on the water in the sunshine. It's
wonderful to me how your skin never tans nor freckles, child. You might
be out in all weathers without its doing you harm."

Mrs. Meadowsweet was seated in her arm-chair. In her hand she held a
piece of knitting. She was making a quilt for Beatrice's bed. This quilt
was composed of little squares of an elaborate pattern, with much
honey-combing, and many other fancy and delicate stitches ornamenting
it. Mrs. Meadowsweet liked to feel her fingers employed over Beatrice's
quilt.

"With each stitch I give her a thought," she said to herself. "Beatrice
will sleep soft and warm under this covering when it is finished," the
old mother used to say, "for every bit of it is put together with love."

She was knitting Beatrice's quilt now, her chair drawn up as usual to
face the sunny garden, and on the footstool at her feet her favorite
tabby cat was curled.

"It is too hot for me to go out this morning," replied Beatrice. "So for
that reason I don't go, and also for another. Captain Bertram has
promised to call."

"Eh?" queried Mrs. Meadowsweet. To call, has he? Maybe you'd like to ask
him to lunch, child?"

"No, mother, I don't think so."

"You can if you like, Trixie. Say the word, and I'll have a spring
chicken done to a turn, and a cream, and a jelly put in hand."

"Oh, no, mother, he won't want to pay such a long call."

"Well, he's a nice young man. I have nothing to say against him, he
carries himself nearly as upright as your poor father did, and he has a
pleasant, affable way with old and young alike. I haven't a word to say
against the young man, not a word. When he comes I'll just step into the
garden, for you two young things would rather have your chatter alone.
Oh, you needn't tell me, Trixie, I know. I was young once, and I never
cared to have my nonsense listened to. By the way, I might ask Captain
Bertram to take a box of Eleazer's Life-pills to his poor mother. I was
recommending them to her, and I'm convinced they are just the medicine
for her complaint. And, Bee, I wish you'd remind me to tell Jane to send
over a jug of buttermilk to the Bells. I did think that poor child Matty
looked so frightfully burnt yesterday, and there's nothing like bathing
the face and neck in buttermilk, to get rid of the ugly redness. My
word, child, is that a ring at the hall door? Then I'll be off, but I'll
be in the garden handy within call, in case you should want me, my pet."

As Captain Bertram entered the drawing-room Mrs. Meadowsweet's trailing
skirts might have been seen disappearing down the steps which led from
the French window to the garden. Beatrice said to herself with an inward
smile:

"From the dear old mother's way, any one would suppose I was going to
receive a lover," and then she raised her eyes, and a very lover-like
gaze met hers.

The expression in Captain Bertram's dark eyes joined to the thought
which had flown into her heart, made the young girl flush up almost
painfully. This sudden blush caused the gallant wooer's heart to beat
with rapture, and he instantly changed his tactics and resolved, instead
of giving Beatrice a half confidence with regard to his troubles, to
take the apparently unapproachable fortress by storm.

"I had a long story to tell you, but I find I can't tell it," he said.

Then he looked at her again, as he knew how momentous were the words
which must follow, he turned pale.

"Sit down," said Beatrice. "Come over to the window and sit down. We
have such a pretty view of the garden from here. Mother and I are very
proud of our garden."

"Are you? Miss Meadowsweet, I want to say something. Look at me, will
you look at me?"

"Of course I will. I expected you to say something when you called this
morning. You had some sort of trouble you wanted to confide in me. What
is the matter?"

"I don't feel now as if I had any trouble to confide in you. I can only
say one thing."

Beatrice began to wish that her mother had not left the drawing-room.
She moved forward as if to step through the open French window.

"And I must tell you this thing," pursued the captain's voice.

Its tone arrested her.

"But I am mad to say it."

"Don't say it then," she began.

"I can't help myself. You must listen. I love you better than all the
world. I won't marry any one but you. I will marry you, I am
determined."

"You are determined," repeated Beatrice, slowly. "_You_--determined--and
about me? I am obliged."

Her lips took a scornful curl. She sat down. She was quiet enough now;
the worst was over.

Beatrice, however, was only a country girl, and she had very little idea
with whom she had to deal. No one could plead better his cause than
Loftus Bertram. Defeat here meant the ruin of his worldly prospects as
well as of his love. He was the kind of man with whom the present must
always be paramount; for the time being he had absolutely forgotten
Josephine Hart, for the time being he thought himself honestly, deeply
in love with Beatrice.

So he talked and talked, until poor Beatrice felt both her head and
heart aching.

"I am not in your rank of life," she said at last, as her final thrust.
"My set is not the same as yours; my people can never belong to
yours--my dear old mother is a lady at heart, but she has not the
outward polish of your mother. You want me to be your wife now, but
by-and-bye you will remember the gulf which socially lies between us."

"How can you talk such nonsense? You are one of nature's ladies. Ask my
mother what she thinks of you. Ask Catherine. Don't you think Catherine
would be happy to put her arms round you and call you sister?"

When Bertram mentioned Catherine a sweet light came for the first time
into Beatrice's eyes.

"I love your sister Catherine," she said.

"You will love me too. You will make me the happiest of men."

"I have not even begun to love you. I have not a shadow of affection for
you."

"If you saw me very unhappy you would pity me."

"Yes, I pity all unhappy people."

"Then pity me, for I am miserable."

"Pity won't do you any good; and you have no right to be miserable."

"Still, pity me; for I am, I can't help it--I am wretched beyond words."

His face had grown really haggard, for he was beginning to think she
would never yield, and this look won her to say:

"Well, yes, if it comforts you to know it. I do pity you."

"Pity is akin to love. You will love me next."

"I don't see the smallest prospect; you mustn't delude yourself."

"I do, I will. I will trust you. I know your heart. You will pity me and
then you will love me. I am not a good fellow."

His words and looks were the soul of sincerity now. He took her hand.

"I have never been a really good man. I have not been a dutiful son, and
I have made my mother unhappy. If you were my wife I think I should
become good, for you, Beatrice, you are very good."

He was telling her the old, old story, and she was half believing him,
half believing that it might be in her power to redeem him. Beatrice
Meadowsweet was just the sort of woman to love such work, to glory in
such martyrdom.

She did not withdraw her hand from his, and her gray eyes, already dark
and misty with emotion, filled with tears.

"I have never been spoken to like this before," she said.

Here she rose and stood before him.

"Your words trouble me. It is not right for a girl to marry without
love, and yet most surely I pity you."

"Carry your pity a little further, and believe that the love will come.
You cannot receive all and give nothing in return--the love will come,
Beatrice, believe me, do believe me."

"I am not of your rank," she said, going back to her old objection,
which in itself was a sign of weakness.

"See what my mother says of your rank and of you. You can take any rank.
Oh, Beatrice, how happy you will make my mother."

She was not moved at all by this.

"And Catherine, I can see her eyes sparkle."

At Catherine's name Beatrice clasped her hands before her, and began to
pace slowly up and down the little enclosure which contained the wide
French windows opening into the garden.

"And you will make me good, Beatrice."

Captain Bertram was astute enough to see that he played his best card
here.

Half an hour later he left her. She had apparently consented to
nothing--but she had agreed to see him again the following day.




CHAPTER XXI.

WITH CATHERINE IN THE ROSE BOWER.


Mrs. Meadowsweet was not the least like Mrs. Bell. She was not
constantly on the watch for lovers for her only daughter. She was
naturally such a contented and easy-going woman that she never troubled
herself to look far ahead. The time being was always more or less
sufficient to her. No two people could be snugger or more absolutely
comfortable together than she and her Bee. It was no use therefore
worrying her head about the possible contingency that the girl might
marry and leave her.

Mrs. Meadowsweet, as she walked about her old-fashioned garden on that
summer's morning was not at all put about by the fact that her pretty
daughter was having a solemn conference in the drawing-room with the
handsomest and most elegant young man of their acquaintance. She was not
curious nor anxious, nor perturbed in any way. She pottered round her
plants, pulling up a weed here, and removing a withered bud there, in
the most comfortable fashion, and only once she made a remark to herself
with regard to the occupants of the drawing-room. This was her sole
allusion to them.

"I hope that young man won't forget to take the box of Eleazer'ss
Life-pills to his mother. I left it handy on the hall table, and I hope
he'll remember to slip it into his pocket."

Presently Mrs. Meadowsweet re-entered the house. There she noticed two
things. The drawing-room was empty, and the box of pills lay untouched
on the hall table.

She sighed a little over this latter circumstance, but reflecting that
she could send Jane with them in the evening she went slowly up to her
bedroom and busied herself putting on her afternoon gown, which was of a
large check pattern, the coloring being different shades in terra-cotta.

Arrayed thus she came down to dinner, and then for the first time she
was really startled by perceiving that Beatrice's place was empty. Jane
immediately explained her young mistress's absence.

"Miss Bee has a headache and is lying down, ma'am. I'm to take her a cup
of tea presently, but she doesn't want any dinner."

"Dear, dear," ejaculated Mrs. Meadowsweet.

"And the peas are lovely and tender to-day, and so for that matter is
the chicken. What a pity! Jane, you tell Miss Bee that if she has a
headache she had better take two of my pills immediately after she has
had her tea. You'll find them in the bottle on my dressing-table, Jane,
and you had better take her up some raspberry jam to swallow them in."

Jane promised obedience, and Mrs. Meadowsweet ate her green peas and
tender, young chicken in great contentment.

In the course of the afternoon Beatrice came downstairs again. She told
her mother that her headache was quite gone, but the old lady was acute
enough to observe a great change in the girl. She did not look ill, but
the brightness had gone out of her face.

"Is anything wrong, dearie?" she asked. "Has any one been worrying you,
my treasure?"

"I have got to think about something," replied Beatrice. "And I am just
a very little upset. I am going into the garden with a book, and you
won't mind if I don't talk to you, mother dear?"

"Of course not, my pet. What is an old mother good for, but to humor her
child? Go you into the garden, Trixie, and no one shall fret or molest
you, I'll see to that."

Beatrice kissed her mother, and book in hand went to the rose-bower, a
secluded spot where no one could see her or take her unawares. Mrs.
Meadowsweet sat upright in her chair, took out her knitting-bag, and
proceeded to add a few stitches to Beatrice's quilt.

Presently there came a quick and somewhat nervous ring to the door-bell.
Mrs. Meadowsweet often said that there were rings and rings. This ring
made her give a little start, and took away the sleepiness which was
stealing over her.

The next moment Catherine Bertram entered the room. Her eyes were
glowing, and her face, usually rather pale, was effused with a fine
color. She looked eager and expectant.

Mrs. Meadowsweet stretched out her two hands to her, and gave her a few
warm words of welcome. The impulsive girl stooped down, and kissed the
old lady on the forehead.

"You're just the person I'm glad to see, my dear," said Mrs.
Meadowsweet. "You'll take your mother back her pills. Poor dear, she
must have thought I had forgotten all about her."

"I have come to see Beatrice," said Catherine. "It is important. Can I
see her?"

"Well, my love, Bee is not quite herself. She is worried about
something; I don't know what for it's my aim in life to make her lot
smooth as velvet. She's in the garden with a book, and I said she
shouldn't be disturbed. But you, my dear----"

"I must see Beatrice," repeated Catherine. "It's important. I've come
here on purpose."

"Well, my love, you and Bee are always great friends. You haven't a
worrying way with you. She's in the rose-arbor. You can find her, child.
You walk straight down that path, and then turn to your left."

Catherine did not wait another instant. She had the quick and graceful
motions of a young fawn, and when she reached Beatrice her eager face
was so full of light and excitement that the other girl sprang to her
feet, her unopened book tumbled to the floor, and in one moment the two
friends had their arms round each other.

They did not kiss. This was not the moment for outward expressions of
affection. They looked at one another, then Catherine said:

"Well, Beatrice?" and, taking her friend's hand, she sat down by her.

"You know what happened this morning, Catherine?" said Beatrice, looking
at her sadly.

"Yes, I know. I have come about that. Loftus came home, and he told
mother. I heard him talking to her, and I heard mother crying; I came
into the room then, for I cannot bear the sound of my mother's sobs when
she is in distress, and she at once looked up when she heard nay step,
and she said:

"'It is all hopeless, Catherine; Beatrice Meadowsweet will not marry
Loftus.'

"'Nay, mother,' interrupted Loftus, 'there's a chance for me, she has
consented to see me again to-morrow.'

"I flew up to mother when Loftus had done speaking, and I knelt by her
and looked into her face and said, 'You make my heart beat so hard, I
never, never thought of this.' Mother went on moaning to herself. She
did not seem to care about me nor to notice that I was with her.

"'It was my last hope,' she said; 'the only chance to avert the trouble,
and it is over.'

"She went on saying that until I really thought she was almost
light-headed. At last Loftus beckoned me out of the room.

"'What is it, Loftus, what is wrong?" I asked.

"'Poor mother,' he replied; 'she loves Beatrice, and she had set her
heart on this. Her nerves are a good deal shaken lately. Poor mother!
she has had a more troubled life than you can guess about, Catherine.'

"'Loftie,' I answered, 'I have long guessed, I have long feared.'

"'If I could win Beatrice,' said Loftus, 'my mother should never have
another ache nor pain.'

"Then he went back into mother's room, and I stayed outside and thought.
After a time I resolved to come to you. No one knows that I am here."

"What have you come for, Catherine?" asked Beatrice.

"I have come to know what you mean to do. When you see Loftus to-morrow
what will you say to him?"

"What would you say, Catherine? If you did not love a man at all, if he
was absolutely nothing to you, would you give yourself to him? Yourself?
That means all your life, all your days, your young days, your
middle-aged years, your old age, always, till death parts you. Would you
do that, Catherine? Speak for yourself; would you?"

"How old are you, Beatrice?" asked Catherine.

"I am nineteen; never mind my age, that has nothing whatever to say to
the question I want you to answer."

"I asked you about your age on purpose--because I can't answer your
question. You are nineteen, I am seventeen. I feel like a child still; I
don't understand anything about loving people as you talk of love; but I
could be kind, and if it lay in my power to keep hearts from breaking I
think I'd be very glad to do it, and then Loftie _is_ nice, Bee."

Beatrice sighed. For the first time there was a gulf between her and
Catherine. As an intelligent and intellectual companion, as an
affectionate friend, Catherine was perfect; but in matters pertaining to
love--that great mystery which comes into most lives--her unawakened
heart was as a blank.

"You ask a great deal," said Beatrice, rising to her feet with
irritation. "For some reason, I don't know what, I am of value to you
and yours. I am not in your rank of life, still you want me. Your mother
is troubled, and in some inexplicable way I, an ignorant and uninformed
country girl, can relieve her. This is all very fine for you, but what
about me? I sacrifice myself forever to give temporary relief.
Catherine, you must tell me the truth. Why do you want me? Is it because
of my money?"

"Have you money?" asked Catherine. Her big, innocent, honest eyes looked
full at her friend, their expression showed bewilderment. When she
looked at her in this way Beatrice suddenly burst into a fit of
laughter. Then she put her arms round Catherine and kissed her two or
three times.

"Kate, you are the sweetest girl I ever met in all my life. You are
good, you are innocent. Kitty, I would do much for you."

"And Loftus is very kind," repeated Catherine; "and he's handsome, too.
He often told me that girls fell in love with him."

Beatrice patted Catherine's cheek.

"Little puss!" she said, "he ought not to breathe such words in your
innocent ears. So it is not for my money your mother and Loftus want me
so badly, Kitty."

"I never heard either of them breathe the subject of your money. Have
you any?"

"Yes, some."

"That would be nice, for somehow lately we seem to be dreadfully poor."

"If I were turned into a grand and patrician Bertram, and made into your
sister, sweet little Kitty, you shouldn't be poor. I'd see to that. I'd
dress you and pet you, and lade you with gifts."

"Beatrice, how bright your eyes are."

"Yes, I am excited when I think of the possible benefit I may be to
you."

"I only want you to be my sister, and to make my mother and Loftus
happy. My mother has a hidden trouble about which I must not speak; and
for some reason which I cannot in the least understand, if you marry
Loftus that trouble will disappear."

"And you want it to disappear?"

"I would give all I possess to make my mother happy."

"Good, dear, little Kitty! You don't incline then to the belief that
your brother wants me for the guineas' worth!"

"Beatrice, I don't think Loftus is really sordid and he loves you. Oh,
how earnestly he told me that he loved you. And my mother, she often,
often talks of you, and I know she cares for you, Bee."

"Come into the house," said Beatrice, suddenly. "Now that you have come
you must spend the evening with me. We can send a messenger to the Manor
to tell them, and after tea you and I will go on the water. We'll have a
happy evening together, Kate, and we won't talk any more about Loftus,
no, not another word. If I do a thing I do it generously, but I will not
discuss the _pros_ and _cons_ even with, you any more."




CHAPTER XXII.

SPARE THE POOR CHILD'S BLUSHES.


It was Miss Peters who first spread the news. She heard it whispered at
the fishmonger's, spoken of aloud at the butcher's, and confirmed at the
baker's. She could doubt this combined testimony no longer, and hurried
home to put on her best bonnet with the wallflowers in it, and go forth
on a visiting tour.

Miss Peters was in the seventh heaven of delight. To have news, and such
news, to convey, would make her a welcome inmate that afternoon of every
house in Northbury. She was intensely anxious to go out and convey her
news without being accompanied by her large sister, Mrs. Butler. In Mrs.
Butler's presence Miss Peters was only a shadow, and she had no wish to
be a shadow on this occasion.

_She_ had heard the gossip, not Martha--why, therefore, should she
tell Martha for the sole satisfaction of having it repeated by Martha in
her own tiresome way to each neighbor she met, while she, poor Miss
Peters, who had really got the information first-hand--for the baker who
served the two families with bread was so absolutely reliable--could
only nod her head and roll her eyes in confirmation.

Miss Peters resolved, therefore, to tell her news to Mrs. Butler last of
all; and her object now was to slip softly out of doors without being
heard by her sister. She nearly accomplished this feat, but not quite.
As she was going downstairs, with her best bonnet on, her lavender
gloves drawn neatly over her hands, and her parasol, which was jointed
in the middle and could fold up, tucked under her arm, she trod on a
treacherous board which creaked loudly.

This was enough. Mrs. Butler popped her head out of the drawing-room
door and confronted the little spinster.

"Where now, Maria?" she asked. "Dear, dear, and I've been wondering what
was keeping you all this time. Where are you off to? Why, I declare you
have on your visiting things?"

"I thought I'd just go round and see one or two friends, as the
afternoon is fine," answered Miss Maria, in a meek voice.

"The afternoon fine!" retorted Mrs. Butler. Have we any but fine
afternoons in the month of August? I don't feel disposed to visit
to-day. The lobster salad I ate last night disagreed with me. I shall
stay at home."

"Well, that's all right, Martha. I can take your compliments to any one,
of course, and just mention that you are a little indisposed."

"_You_ take _my_ compliments? No, thank you. You'll just have the
goodness to take off your bonnet and come and sit in the drawing-room
with me. I have had enough of my own company today, and I want you to
pick up some stitches in my knitting. Come, you needn't ogle me any
more. Go back and take off your bonnet and be quick about it."

Very slowly Miss Peters turned and went up the stairs. She took off her
neat little chip bonnet, adorned with the sprigs of wallflower, folded
up her lavender gloves, and put back her heavily-fringed old-fashioned
parasol in its case. Then she went down to the drawing-room; she sighed
heavily as she did so. Poor thing; she had no money of her own, and was
absolutely dependent on Mrs. Butler, who tyrannized over her as is the
usual fashion in such cases.

The day was a glorious one, and from where Miss Peters sat she could get
a splendid view of the bright and sparkling harbor. Little boats skimmed
about on its surface, and Miss Peters longed to be in one of
them--anywhere away from the tyrannical sister who would not allow her
to go out and disburden herself of her news.

That news, bottled up within her breast, almost drove the little woman
crazy. Suppose the baker told some one else? He had promised not; but
who can depend on bakers? Suppose she was not the first to startle and
electrify her fellow town's people after all? She felt so fretted and
miserable that her sighs at last became audible.

"Well, Maria, you certainly are a lively companion!" exclaimed Mrs.
Butler. "Fidget, fidget sigh, sigh, and not a word out of your lips!
I'll thank you to hand me my knitting, and then you may read me a
chapter from that book of sermons on the table. I often think it's in
fine weather we should remember our souls most."

This remark was so startling that Miss Maria's grievance was forgotten
for a moment in her surprise.

"Why in fine weather?" she ventured to ask.

"Because, being prosperous and comfortable, they are like to sleep
within us. Now, get the sermons and read. Turn to sermon five, page
four, begin second paragraph; there's a telling bit there, and I think
the cap will fit your head."

Miss Maria was rising meekly to comply, when happening again to glance
at the blue bosom of the water, she uttered a shriek, threw down Mrs.
Butler's knitting, caught up the spy-glass, and sprang to the window.

"Good gracious! Maria, have you gone mad?" exclaimed her sister.

"It is--it is--" gasped Miss Peters. "There they are! It's beautiful;
and it's true!"

"What's beautiful, and what's true? Really, Maria, you are enough to
turn a person crazy. What _are_ you talking about, and who
_are_ you looking at? Give me the glass."

"Sister," said Miss Peters, "they're in a boat together. Out there in
the harbor. _Both_ of them! In a boat!"

"If they weren't in a boat they'd be drowned to a certainty," snapped
Mrs. Butler. "And who are they? And why shouldn't they be in a boat
together?"

"Look for yourself, sister--there they are! And beautiful they
look--beautiful!"

Mrs. Butler seized the spy-glass and tried to adjust it.

"Where?" she asked. "What part of the harbor?"

"Over there, just under the old Fort."

"My good gracious, Maria, you always do something to these glasses to
make them go wrong. I can see nothing. Who, in the name of charity, are
in the boat?"

"Martha, it's a secret. I heard it to-day."

"Oh, you heard it to-day! And you kept it from your own only sister
whose bread you eat! _Very_ nice, and very grateful. I'm obliged to
you Maria, I have cause to be."

"It was the baker who told me, sister."

"The baker? Hunt, the baker. And pray what had he to tell?"

"Well, you know, he delivers bread at the Meadowsweets."

"I neither know nor care."

"And at the Manor. He takes bread every day to the Manor, Martha."

"H--m--only his seconds, I should say. Well, this is all very
interesting, but I can't see what it has to say to two people being in a
boat on the harbor."

"Oh, Martha, you see the baker must know, and he told me for a positive
fact. They're engaged."

"What! Has Hunt made it up with Gracie Jones? It's time for him. He has
been hanging after her long enough."

"Oh, sister, I am not alluding to anything plebeian."

"Well, my dear Maria, I'd be glad to know once for all to what you are
alluding, for, to be frank with you, I think your brain is going fast."

"It's Bee," said Miss Maria. "It's our Bee. She's engaged. It's all
settled."

"Beatrice engaged? I don't believe a word of it."

"It's true. Hunt said there wasn't a doubt of it, and he ought to know,
for he takes bread--"

"You needn't go on about the bread. To whom is Beatrice Meadowsweet
affianced?"

"To no less a person, Martha, than Captain Bertram, and there they are
in a boat by themselves on the water."

Mrs. Butler snatched up the spy-glass again, and after considerable
difficulty, and some mutterings, focussed it so as to suit her sight.
She was absolutely silent, as she gazed her fill at the unconscious
occupants of the green boat.

After a long time she put down the glass, and turned to her sister.

"We'll go upstairs and put on our bonnets, Maria, I should like to go
out. I want to call on the Bells."

Mrs. Bell had lately tried to connect herself with the outside world by
adopting a few of its harmless and inexpensive little fashions. She had
a day at home. This universal mode of receiving one's friends was not
generally adopted in Northbury, but Mrs. Bell, who had heard of it
through the medium of a weekly fashion paper which a distant cousin in
London was kind enough to supply her with, thought it would be both
distinguished and economical to adopt the system of only receiving her
friends on Thursdays.

She was laughed at a good deal, and considered rather upstartish for
doing so; but nevertheless, on Thursdays the friends came, being sure of
a good dish of gossip as well as sugared and creamed tea and home-made
cakes in abundance.

On Thursdays Mrs. Bell put on every ring and ornament she possessed. Her
one and only dark red tabinet--this was her wedding-gown let out and
dyed--adorned her stout figure, and then she sat in her drawing-room,
and awaited her company. Her daughters always sat with her, and they,
too, on these occasions, made the utmost of their poor wardrobes.

Mrs. Bell was in particularly good spirits on this special afternoon,
for rumors had as yet cast no shadows before, and the preceding evening
she had been lucky enough to meet Mabel Bertram, and had almost
extracted a promise from that young lady that she would come to her
reception in the company of her gallant brother.

"Thank you, for Matty's sake," Mrs. Bell had responded to Mabel. "Matty
will be delighted to see you both,--delighted."

Mabel had gone home a little bewildered and a little amused, and Mrs.
Bell felt herself altogether in high feather.

When Mrs. Butler and Miss Peters appeared on the scene there had already
arrived a fair sprinkling of guests. Mrs. Gorman Stanley who did most of
her eating at her friends' houses, was enjoying her second cup of tea,
and asking Alice for the third time to pass her the sponge-cakes. Mrs.
Morris, considerably wrapped up on account of her bronchitis, was
shivering by an open window, and Mrs. Jenkins and the two Misses
Jenkins, and Mr. Jones the curate, were also in the room.

The eldest Miss Jenkins had managed, for the first time, to establish
herself in the vicinity of Mr. Jones, when the maid--no one kept two
maids at Northbury--threw open the door.

"Mrs. Butler, ma'am, and Miss Peters, ma'am."

Whereupon the two ladies, portentous with their great news, came in.

As they walked down the street Mrs. Butler had warned her sister not to
leak out a word.

"_I'll_ tell," she said, with simple gravity which impressed.

"But it was _my_ news," said poor Miss Peters.

"I prefer to tell," said Mrs. Butler.

And Miss Peters was demolished.

Accordingly when they entered the room Mrs. Butler made straight for the
sofa beside Mrs. Bell. She took her friend's hand, looked at her
solemnly, and said:

"How are you?" in a lugubrious voice.

Mrs. Bell assured Mrs. Butler that she was in excellent health, and
Matty was called forward to administer the tea and cake.

Mrs. Butler also favored Matty with a portentous glance.

"Has that girl got over the cough which she was so troubled with a year
back?" she queried of the parent.

Mrs. Bell bridled at this. Never had her Matty looked stronger or more
blooming, and after all the cough so solemnly inquired after, just for
all the world, muttered the poor mother, as if it were a graveyard
cough, had been but the remains of the whooping cough.

"Matty blooms," replied Mrs. Bell. "Don't you, Matty, my love? I don't
suppose, Mrs. Butler, you ever saw my girl looking better."

"I'm glad of it," said Mrs. Butler. "No more tea, I thank you, Matty.
Well, then, as you are so pressing, just a tiny drop. You can put it on
what's in my cup, if you like. Oh, yes, certainly more cream. I'm
partial to cream, if it's good. It agrees with me. It doesn't agree with
Maria, so I never give it her. Well, as I was saying, I'm glad you are
in good health, Matty, for a girl who has a real fine constitution can
stand up against shocks."

"Shocks?" said Mrs. Bell. "I don't think we need talk of shocks at this
time of day, unless indeed, they are joyful ones. Matty, my love," here
Mrs. Bell raised her voice to a high and penetrating key, "I wonder when
our dear friends the Bertrams will be here."

Matty blushed and giggled as only Matty could blush and giggle. Poor
Miss Peters felt herself turning crimson. She ogled her eyes round at
her sister, who rose solemnly and put down her cup and saucer.

The whole company had been impressed by Mrs. Bell's words. They ceased
to talk, they seemed to know something was impending, and Mrs. Butler
felt that her hour had come. She cleared her throat and looked around at
her audience.

"H--m! ladies, I have called here with a little piece of news. I daresay
you have not heard it yet, for it's fresh. It was told to me in
confidence, but my source is a most reliable one. What's the matter,
Maria? Oh, good gracious, I see you are taking cream. You know how ill
cream always makes you. Will no one be kind enough to give Maria another
cup of tea? Well, ladies, I've come with news. We're to have a wedding
soon!"

Here Mrs. Bell, who had felt, as she afterwards expressed it, cold
shivers going down her back, while Mrs. Butler was firing off her
preamble, now bridled and even blushed. It was a little premature,
certainly, but reports always did a trifle exceed the truth, and, as
Matty was so certain to be engaged immediately she could scarcely blame
Mrs. Butler for alluding to it prematurely.

She bent forward therefore and touched her friend on the arm.

"Spare the poor child's blushes," she whispered. "She's such a sensitive
little thing."

"Spare whose blushes, my good friend? The girl isn't in the room. Do you
think I'd be so indelicate as to mention the sacred subject of the
wedding before the bride-elect? No, no, Beatrice isn't by, unless she is
hiding behind one of the window curtains."

At the word Beatrice Mrs. Bell felt her spirit sink down to zero. She
had an insane desire to take Mrs. Butler by main force, and drag her out
of the room. Poor Matty's blushes changed to pallor, and her hand shook
as she pessed Miss Peters her creamless tea. Mr. Jones also, who had
been listening to the conversation in a half-hearted way suddenly felt
himself turning very rigid and stiff, and the eyes which he fixed on
Daisy Jenkins took a glassy stare as though he were looking through that
young lady into futurity.

Mrs. Butler liked to tell her news with effect and she felt now that she
had made a profound sensation.

"Good-bye," she said, holding out her hand. "I thought I'd drop in and
tell you, as being old friends, but I must go on at once to congratulate
dear Mrs. Meadowsweet. There's no doubt at all; Bee is engaged, and we
saw them just now in a boat at the other side of the harbor, all alone,
and making love as hard as they could. It's a pretty match, and she's a
fine girl. Good-bye, Mrs. Bell; come, Maria."

"Yes," said Mrs. Bell. "Yes. Not that I believe a word of the story--you
didn't tell us the name of the--the future bridegroom--not that I
believe a word."

"Oh, yes, you do believe. Didn't I mention the bridegroom's name? Well,
somehow I thought that went without saying. He's Captain Bertram, of
course. Good-bye, Matty. Come, Maria."

The two ladies disappeared, and the Bells and their other guests were
left to face each other, and discuss the news.




CHAPTER XXIII.

THAT FICKLE MATTY.


"Well, doctor, and where are you off to now?" The speaker was the
doctor's wife. "I do think it's unreasonable of people," continued this
good lady, "to send for you just when you are sitting down to your
comfortable breakfast, and you so particular as you are about your
coffee."

"Who is it, Mary Anne? Who's the messenger from?" turning to the
maid-servant, who stood in a waiting attitude half-in, half-out of the
door.

"Oh, it's only the Bells. You needn't hurry off to the Bells, Tom."

"As well they as another," retorted Dr. Morris "Tell the messenger I'll
be round directly, Mary Anne. Now, what's the matter, old lady? Why
should you fidget yourself, and have such a spiteful tone when the Bells
are mentioned?"

"Oh, I'm sick of them, and their airs and affectations," growled Mrs.
Morris, who suddenly put on her thickest and most bronchial tones. "What
with their afternoon tea, and their grand at-homes, and the ridiculous
way they've been going on about that little Matty lately, I really lose
all patience with them. What's the consequence of all this kind of
thing? Mrs. Bell chokes up her small drawing-room so full of visitors
who only come to laugh at her, that one can't breathe comfortably there
without the window open, and a fine fresh bronchitis I've got in
consequence. You feel me, doctor. I'm all shivering and burning, I'm
going to be very ill, there isn't a doubt of it."

"Your pulse hasn't quickened," said the doctor, "it's as steady as my
own."

"Oh, well, if you don't choose to believe in the sufferings of your
wife, exhibited before your very eyes, go to your Bells, and comfort
them."

"Now, Jessie, don't talk nonsense, old lady. You know I'm the first to
believe you bad if you are. But what's this about Beatrice Meadowsweet?
Is she really engaged to young Bertram?"

"It's the gossip, Tom. But maybe it isn't the case. I'll call to see
Mrs. Meadowsweet this morning, and find out."

"I would if I were you. Beatrice is a fine girl, and mustn't throw
herself away."

"Throw herself away! Why, it's a splendid match for her. A most
aristocratic young man! One of the upper ten, and no mistake."

"That's all you women think about. Well, I'm off to the Bells now."

The doctor presently reached that rather humble little dwelling where
the Bell family enjoyed domestic felicity.

He was ushered in by the maid, who wore an important and mysterious
face. Mrs. Bell quickly joined him, and she looked more important and
mysterious still.

"Matty isn't well," she said, sinking her voice to a stage whisper.
"Matty has been badly treated; she has had a blight."

"Dear, dear!" said Doctor Morris.

He was a fat, comfortable-looking man, his hands in particular were very
fat, and when he warred to show special sympathy he was fond of rubbing
them.

"Dear, dear!" he repeated. "A blight! That's more a phrase to apply to
the potato than to a blooming young girl."

"All the same, doctor, it's true. Matty has been blighted. She had set
her young affections where they were craved and sought, and, so to
speak, begged for. She gave them, _not willingly_, doctor, but
after all the language that melting eyes, and more melting words, could
employ. _The_ word wasn't spoken, but all else was done. She gave
her heart, doctor, not unasked, and now it's sent back to her, and she's
blighted, that's the only word for it."

"I should think so," said the doctor, who was far too professional to
smile. "A heart returned like that is always a little difficult to
dispose of. Might I ask who--but perhaps you'd rather not tell me?"

"No, Doctor Morris, I'd rather tell you; I've sent for you to tell you,
and it isn't so much that I blame him, poor young man, for it was all
managed between his mother and Beatrice, all, from the very first, and
it's my firm belief that he had neither part nor parcel in it. I did
what I could, as in duty bound, to give him his chances, but those
designers were too many for me."

"You don't mean," said the doctor--he really did not concern himself
much about Northbury gossip, and no rumors of Matty's flirtations had
reached him--"You don't mean Captain Bertram? Why, I have just heard he
is engaged to Beatrice. You can't mean Captain Bertram? Impossible."

"I do mean Captain Bertram, doctor. No more and no less. And I'll thank
you not again to mention the name of that siren, Beatrice, in my
presence. Now if you'll come upstairs, I'll show you the poor blighted
child."

Mrs. Bell had insisted on Matty's staying in bed. After the first awful
shock of Mrs. Butler's news had subsided, she had made up her mind that
the only _rôle_ left to her daughter was that of the dying martyr.
All the town should know that Beatrice had robbed her friend, and that
this young and innocent friend was now at death's door.

Alice and Sophy were both in the room with their sister, and they were
expatiating very loudly on what they considered "ma's cruelty."

"You know perfectly, Matty, that he never cared for you," remarked the
candid Sophy. "It was all ma's folly from first to last."

"First to last," echoed Alice.

"And you're not really ill," pursued Sophy. "You slept very sound all
last night."

"And snored," continued Alice.

"Only ma will make a fuss, one way or other," proceeded Sophy. "Now
you're to be the forsaken one, and what ma would like would be for your
funeral bell to toll the day Bee has her wedding chimes."

"And we all love Bee," said Alice.

"And we'd like to go to her wedding," said Sophy. "Wouldn't you, Matty?
Say, now, if you were going to have a new white muslin for it?"

It was at this juncture that the doctor and Mrs. Bell entered the room.

For a blighted invalid Matty did not look pale, and the doctor, who
quickly discovered that there was no broken heart in the case, ordered
his _régime_ with a certain dry sense of humor, anything but
comforting to the poor little victim.

"Miss Matty requires rest," he said. "Absolute rest. And freedom from
all undue excitement. I should recommend for the next few days, complete
confinement to her bed with a simple diet; _no_ tea nor coffee, nor
any stimulants. Keep her quiet, Mrs. Bell, for while the illness
lasts--I give it no name--under which she is laboring, she will have no
desire, except to keep herself solitary."

"And you think that will effect a cure, doctor?" asked Mrs. Bell, whose
eyes had forced up a little moisture. "The child is frail, oughtn't she
to be nourished?"

"In the way I prescribed, my dear madam. Milk diet, without stimulants.
I'll see you again in a couple of days, Miss Matty."

"And you say she's not to get up, doctor?"

"On no account, until I call again."

The doctor departed, and Matty submitted to the remarkably dull life
laid out for her.

In the course of the afternoon Mrs. Bell went out. To each friend she
met she made the same remarks:

"Matty is very ill. I'm dreadfully anxious about her. Dr. Morris is in
close attendance. She's to be kept strictly to her bed, and the greatest
care has to be exercised to maintain her feeble strength. It's a heavy
trial to have one's child so ill--and from such a cause."

"Dear, dear," the sympathizing neighbor would answer. "What can be the
matter, and Matty always looked so fresh and hearty? Do you think she
has gone and taken anything, Mrs. Bell? Some people prophesy that we are
to have an epidemic of small-pox. It can't be that, surely? Taken so
sudden too, for she was about yesterday."

"Small-pox!" retorted Mrs. Bell, with withering scorn. "As if a child of
mine who had her vaccination beautifully would have small-pox! No, no,
it's heart-blight, neighbor, it's heart-blight, and I doubt if my girl
will ever get over it."

"Eh, ah--you don't say so," the neighbor would instantly retort. Now the
listener was full of intense curiosity, and longing to learn everything.
Matty Bell ill with a heart affair! No wonder her mother looked
troubled. Ah, men were deceivers ever! And who had dared to trifle with
her young affections?

Then Mrs. Bell would sigh deeply, and lower her voice, and point in the
direction of the Manor. It wasn't for her to name names, but a certain
young man had gone far, very far. Why, they could bring an action
against him, only they'd scorn to make public their poor child's
feelings. Well, well, he might lead another bride, a certain designer,
to the altar, but there would be no luck nor happiness for either of
them, that Mrs. Bell would say.

It was in this manner that the good lady spread the report which she
desired through the gossiping little town. Rapidly did the little piece
of gossip swell and magnify. It even travelled into the country, and so
huge did its dimensions grow there, that it not only killed Matty, but
buried her, and placed a beautiful tablet in white marble over her
grave, erected by the repentant Captain Bertram and the remorseful
Beatrice Meadowsweet.

Meantime the dying martyr had a very dull time in her bed. She was not
the kind of girl to love very deeply--her mother had done her utmost to
make the poor child fall in love with Captain Bertram, but when all was
said he had only managed to tickle her vanity. Now she considered that
he had put her to shame and derision, and she began to dislike him very
much. Her sisters fostered this dislike with the tales they brought in
from the outside world.

"You're the laughing-stock of the town," Alice would say. "Everybody is
talking about you, and having a laugh at you. You needn't suppose that
you are pitied, for you are not."

"Oh," groaned Matty. "How I wish, how I do wish, I had never met that
horrid, odious man."

"He's not horrid nor odious at all," retorted the practical Sophy. "He
looks lovely when he walks about with Beatrice. I saw them yesterday in
the Green, and Beatrice came up at once and asked about you. What do you
think ma did, Matty? She turned her back on Bee and sailed away. Poor
Bee quite colored up, and didn't know what to make of it."

"They say Beatrice is to have a lovely wedding," said Alice. "And Mr.
Ingram is going to have the whole church decorated with flowers. And a
bishop is coming down from London to marry them. And Mr. Ingram is going
to give Beatrice away himself, for he says she's like a daughter to him.
And there's to be another great party at the Rectory the day of her
wedding, Matty, and lots of fire-works in the evening."

"Oh, dear," sighed Matty, "I think Captain Bertram is a very base man."

"You'd better give up that idea," said Alice, "for no one else agrees
with you. You know perfectly he never paid you attentions. It was all ma
who would think so. And you know, Matty, you can't deny it--you did try
to squeeze his hand the first day he danced with you."

"I didn't," said Matty, flushing all over with indignation. "I think you
both are cruel. I've had a very heavy trial, and you neither of you
sympathize a bit. And I'm sure," continued Matty, in a plaintive voice,
"not the least part of it is being stuck in bed now."

"I wonder you stay," said Sophy. "You're in perfect health."

"No, I'm not. Dr. Morris is very anxious about me."

"He isn't. No one is anxious about you. There isn't a thing the matter,
except that you and ma like that you should pose as the dying martyr.
Well, good-bye. Sophy and I are going to have some fun this evening."

"Fun, where? Do tell me."

"At the Jenkinses. Their brother Gus has come home; you know how you and
Gus used to flirt long ago, Matty. Well, he's back for a fortnight. He
has a long red beard, and his face is all over freckles, but he's full
of fun, and he laughs like anything. We saw him and he asked for you.
It's a pity you can't come."

"Why can't I come? I don't see why I can't come as well as you."

"Oh, well, we thought you were the dying martyr. Mrs. Jenkins asked us
all in to tea, and we are to have tennis afterwards, and then high
supper, in honor of Gus. We said you couldn't come, but that we would be
there. Alice, it's time for us to dress now. We'll wear our muslins with
the pink spots, and those sweet new pink sashes that we got in exchange
for the old teapot from Mrs. Middlemass last week. Come along, Alice.
We'll show ourselves to you when we are dressed, Matty."

The girls skipped lightly away, and Matty fidgeted and tossed in her
small hot bed.

The house was intensely quiet. Mrs. Bell was away, having taken
advantage of a proffered lift from a neighbor to drive into the country
to purchase some plums. Matty thought how intolerably dull her evening
would be. She reflected on the pleasures of the Jenkinses' tea-party;
she thought it would be nice, more than nice, to shake hands again with
Mr. Gus. Why shouldn't she go? What was to prevent her? Only her
mother's whim. Only the doctor's orders. But both doctor and mother were
now far away. She would go, she would defy them both.

Slipping out of bed she flew across the room and drew the bolt of the
door. Then she began to dress in quick and nervous haste. She put on her
daintiest shoes, and open-work stockings. She arranged her limp hair
with care, and finally she donned the gorgeous shot-silk.

The few days in bed had taken away some of her burnt appearance, and
slightly moderated her high color. She looked really almost nice as she
skipped to the door, and showed herself to her astonished sisters.

"I'm coming, too," she said.

"Then you are cured," said Alice. "I'm glad of it, I'm sure. What did I
say, Sophy, when I was coming in."

"You said if anyone could mend up Matty it would be Gus," retorted
Sophy.

That fickle Matty blushed. It was a way she had.




CHAPTER XXIV.

EVENTS MOVE APACE.


Mrs. Bell was very successful in her purchase of plums. In her way she
was a notable housewife, and she returned home about eight o'clock that
evening with a large basket of greengages, which were all to be boiled
down for preserving the following day.

As soon as she entered the house the maid came to meet her.

"You take these carefully down and put them in the larder, Hannah," said
her mistress. "Be careful you don't knock any of them, or the bloom will
go off. Why what's the matter, girl? Is Miss Matty worse?"

"Lor, no, ma'am. Miss Matty is up, and out a-pleasuring, ma'am. But if
you please, there's a visitor in the drawing-room who would like to have
a word with you the minute you come in."

"A visitor?"

Mrs Bell felt her heart beat. The Northbury people did not stand on
ceremony with each other, nor wait in each other's drawing-rooms, for
the return of an absent hostess. A wild idea came across Mrs. Bell's
brain. Could Captain Bertram have quarrelled with Beatrice, and come
back to Matty, his first and only true love.

"A visitor? Male or female?" she inquired of the girl.

"A lady, ma'am. Dressed most elegant."

"Dear, dear, dear! Then I suppose I must see her, and I so dead beat!
She didn't give her name, did she, Hannah?"

"No, ma'am. But she have been a-setting in the drawing-room for over an
hour."

"And Miss Matty, you say, is out!"

"Oh, yes, ma'am; a-pleasuring in her shot silk, and the open-worked
stockings you ironed up a fortnight back."

"Well, I feel bothered altogether, but I must go and see this visitor."

Accordingly Mrs. Bell entered her drawing-room, where she was instantly
confronted by a tall girl who greeted her with warmth, flashed her
brilliant eyes into her face, subjugated her in a moment, and then made
a bold request.

"My name is Josephine Hart. About a month ago I took rooms at the
Testers. I find Mrs. Bertram has forbidden them to receive me again. I
don't know where to go, as I am not acquainted with Northbury, but I can
pay for good rooms. Can you recommend any?"

"My dear child, now let me think. The place is packed just at
present--simply packed. Dear, dear! I have heard of you, Miss Hart. And
so Mrs. Bertram doesn't like you?"

"No, she hates me."

"Well, I'm sure. You don't look like a young lady to be hated."

"No one else hates me, Mrs. Bell, but she does, because she has a
reason. I have come back to Northbury on purpose to make her
uncomfortable, and I must stay."

"So you shall, my dear. I applaud a girl with spirit. And so you hate
Mrs. Bertram? And you have a spite against her with reason. Well, I may
as well own that I don't love her, having good cause not to do so. She
has been the means of breaking my young daughter's heart. My child is
even now lying on her bed of--" but here Mrs. Bell remembered what
Hannah had said about the shot silk, and the open-worked stockings.
"I wish I could help you, my dear young lady," she said.

"I was hoping you would help me. Might I not come and live with you
here? I would pay you well."

Mrs. Bell started and blushed. Caste was a very marked feature in
Northbury society, and between the people who let lodgings for money,
and those who lived genteelly on their means was a great and awful gulf.
No people were poorer in their way than the Bells, and no one would have
more dearly liked to add to her little store of this world's pelf than
would poor Mrs. Bell. She could scarcely afford to take a fashionable
girl in for nothing, and yet--dared she accept payment? Bell, if he
knew, would never forgive her, and, as to the town, it would simply cut
her dead.

The tall girl who was watching Mrs. Bell's face seemed, however, to be
able to read her through. She spoke in a moment in a very gentle and
pleading voice:

"I understand your position; you are a lady, and you don't like to
accept money."

"I couldn't do it, my dear. I couldn't really; Bell, he'd take on awful.
It isn't the custom in Northbury, Miss--Miss Hart."

"And I couldn't come to you without paying. Now, suppose you and I
managed it between us and nobody knew."

"Oh, Miss Hart, I'd be terrified. These things always leak out, they do
really."

"Not if they are properly managed. You might leave that part to me. And
you need not name any sum. I shall see that all your expenses are
covered. Have you a private cupboard in your bedroom? Unlock it every
Monday. That's all you need do. You can give out to all your friends
that you have received me as a visitor, because you were kind to me, and
I wanted to come back to Northbury so badly."

After considerable more parley on both sides, the matter was arranged,
and who more cheerful than Mrs. Bell as she tripped upstairs to prepare
Matty's room for her guest. She was quite obliged to Matty now for
having left her bed, for the thought of that little secret hoard, which
Monday by Monday she might collect, and no one be the wiser, had filled
her heart with rejoicing. So she helped Hannah to spread Josephine's bed
with her finest linen sheets, and altogether she made the little chamber
cosy and pleasant for its new inmate. All signs of poor Matty's illness
were removed, and that young lady's possessions were hastily carried
into her sisters' joint bedroom. Here they would be anything but wanted
or appreciated but what cared Mrs. Bell for that?

Mrs. Meadowsweet, meanwhile, was having a somewhat exciting time.
Beatrice was engaged. That event had taken place which the widow had
only thought about as a distant and possible contingency. Captain
Bertram had himself come to his future mother-in-law, and said a few
words with such grace and real feeling that the old lady's warm heart
was touched. She laid her hands within those of the handsome lad, and
blessed him, and kissed him.

She was not a woman who could see far beneath the surface, and she
thought Loftus Bertram worthy even of Beatrice. Beatrice herself said
very little on the subject.

"Yes, I will marry him," she said once to her mother. "I have made up my
mind, and I will do it. They want the wedding to be soon. Let it be
soon. Where's the use of lingering over these things."

"You speak somehow, Trixie, I mean Bee, my girl, as if you
didn't--didn't quite like it," said the mother, then a trace of anxiety
coming into her smooth, contented voice: "You shan't have him, I mean he
shan't have you, unless you want him with your whole heart, Bee, my
darling."

"Mother," said Beatrice, kneeling down by her, and putting her arms
round her neck, "it is not given to all girls to want a thing with their
whole heart. I have always been happy, always filled, always content.
Therefore I go away without any special sense of rejoicing. But oh, not
unhappily--oh, far from that."

"You're sure, Trixie--you are speaking the whole truth to your own
mother? Your words are sober to belong to a young girl who is soon to be
a bride. Somehow I wasn't like that when your father came for me."

"No two girls are alike, mother. I speak the sober truth, the plain,
honest truth, when I tell you that I am happy. Still, my happiness is
not unmixed when I think of leaving you."

"Hoots-toots, child, I'll do well enough. Jane will look after me, and
that nice little friend of yours, Catherine, will come and cheer me up
now and then. I shall have lots to do, too, this autumn, for I'm going
to have all the chintzes recalendered, and the carpets taken up and
darned in the weak places, and there are some sheets to be cut down the
middle and sewn up again. I won't have breathing-time, let alone
half-hours for fretting. So the thought of the old mother needn't
trouble you, my dearie dear. And the captain has promised to bring you
back as soon as ever he can get fresh leave, so I can look forward to
that, if I have a minute of time to look forward at all."

Beatrice smiled and kissed her mother.

"I don't think any one ever had a dearer mother than you are," she said,
"or a more unselfish one."

"Oh, now, my pet," replied the crafty old lady, "you know you'd change
me for Mrs. Bertram any day; she's so stylish, Bee, and so--so genteel,
darling. You know I never did aim at being genteel. I always
acknowledged that I was a step below your father and you."

"Hush! You were a step below no one. You stand on a pinnacle which no
other mother can reach, as far as I am concerned. Compare you with Mrs.
Bertram indeed!"

Here Beatrice tried to look scornful. The expression was so foreign to
her face that her mother absolutely laughed and chuckled. Of course, she
had meant Bee to say the kind of thing she had said; it was balm to the
old lady to hear such words from her beautiful child.

Up at the Manor now everything went smoothly. Mrs. Bertram was in
perfect health, and perfect spirits. The bustle of a coming wedding
excited and pleased the girls. There was that fuss about the place which
generally precedes an event of rejoicing. Such fuss was delicious to
Catherine and Mabel. Captain Bertram not only looked perfectly happy,
but all his best qualities appeared now on the surface. New springs of
feeling, depths hitherto untouched, had been awakened by Beatrice. She
had a power over this young man; she could arouse all the latent
nobility which he possessed. He thought he was very much in love with
her; he certainly did care for her, but more as his guardian-angel than
with the passionate love he might offer to a wife. He made all sorts of
good resolves when he was with Beatrice, and these resolves grew into
his face, and made it look pleasant, and touched it with a light never
before seen there, and strengthened it with a touch which banished for
a time the evil lines of irresolution and weakness.

Captain Bertram had made up his mind--he had been rarely blessed--he was
unworthy, but a treasure of good price had been vouchsafed to him. He
would live worthy of her. He would cast away the useless life of the
past; he would cease to be extravagant--his debts should be wiped off
and never incurred again. He would be honorable, true--a gentleman in
every sense of the word--the girl who was lowly born, but whose heart
was so patrician, and whose spirit was so loyal, should guide him in all
things.

Captain Bertram had only one uncomfortable corner in his heart just
then. He had one little secret chamber which he kept locked, and into
which, even in spirit, he never cared to enter. Men, when they are
turning over new leaves, often keep this little reserve-room of the past
uncleaned, unpurified. All else shall be swept and garnished, but this
room, carefully locked, can reveal no secrets. From its door the ghost
of past evil-doing can surely not escape to confront and destroy. So
Captain Bertram thought. He must forget Josephine; the wrong he had done
her, the vows he had made to her, could never be washed out or forgiven,
but in all else he would be perfect in the future.

Before he returned to Northbury for the express purpose of wooing and
winning Beatrice Meadowsweet, he had written to Josephine. In his letter
he had promised to marry her; he had promised to confide all about her
to his mother. He said he should be at home for a month, and during that
month he would watch his opportunity and break the news of his
engagement to Josephine to his parent. He had asked Josephine to give
him a month to do this in, and he had begged of her to leave Northbury
for the time, assuring her that her presence at his mother's gates would
be highly detrimental to their mutual interests.

Josephine had departed, and Bertram, after the fashion of men of his
class, had almost forgotten her existence in his pursuit of a new quest.

Now he was engaged, and his wedding-bells would soon ring. If the
thought of Josephine Hart did flash now and then before his mental
vision, he could only hope devoutly that she would learn nothing of his
betrothal to Beatrice until after their marriage. "She may appear then,
and I may have to tell Bee everything," he soliloquized. "Well, well,
Bee could not be hard on a fellow, and we will both do what we can for
poor Josephine. No doubt I should not have made her a good husband--no
doubt, no doubt! Poor child--poor, beautiful child." But as he said the
words under his breath, Captain Bertram felt his heart beat hard and
fast. "My God--I love her madly--I must not think of her at all," he
murmured. "I must not; I dare not!" He was uncomfortable, and even
depressed, after these musings; and he was determined to keep the door
of that chamber within him where Josephine dwelt more firmly locked than
ever in the future.

When all the people concerned are of one mind on a certain point it is
surprising how easily they can bring their wishes to bear fruit. It was
all important, both to Captain Bertram and his mother, that his marriage
should follow his engagement with the least possible delay.

Having decided to marry him, Beatrice would allow her lover to lead her
to the altar the first day he cared to do so. Mrs. Meadowsweet was, of
course, like wax in the hands of her daughter.

Accordingly, Beatrice would only be an engaged maiden for three short
weeks, and on the 10th of September, before Captain Bertram's leave
expired, Northbury was to make merry over the gayest wedding it had ever
been its lot to participate in.

Mr. Ingram, who was one of Beatrice's guardians, and from whose house
the wedding was to take place, had insisted on all his parishioners
being invited. Both rich and poor were to partake of the good things of
life at the Rectory on that auspicious day, and Mrs. Bertram, whether
she liked it or not, must sit down to her son's wedding-breakfast in the
presence of Mrs. Gorman Stanley, Mrs. Morris, Mrs. Butler, Miss Peters,
and the other despised Northbury folk.

"Your son is marrying into one of the Northbury families," the rector
had said, when the proud lady had frowned a little over this. "Beatrice
must and shall have her friends round her when she gives herself to
Bertram. Your son is making an excellent match from a money point of
view and from all other points of view, and if there is a bitter with
the sweet, he must learn to swallow it with a good grace."

When the rector had mentioned "from a money point of view" Mrs. Bertram
had forced herself to clear her brows, and smile amiably. After all,
beside this great and important question of money what were these small
worries but pinpricks.

The pin-prick, however, was capable of going somewhat deeper, when
Catherine informed her mother that Beatrice particularly wished to have
her friends, the Bells, and Daisy Jenkins as bride's-maids at her
wedding.

"No, no, impossible," burst from Mrs. Bertram's lips.

But in the end she had to yield this point also, for what will not a
woman do who is hard beset and pressed into a corner to set herself free
from so humiliating and torturing a position.

Thus everything was getting ready for the great event. The bride's
trousseau was the wonder of all beholders. The subject of Beatrice's
wedding was the only one on the _tapis_, and no one saw a little
cloud in the sky, nor guessed at even the possibility of trouble ahead.




CHAPTER XXV.

WEDDING PRESENTS.


Notwithstanding her crushing disappointment Matty Bell did not sink into
an early grave. That report which had got into the country with regard
to her funeral and tombstone began to be very flatly contradicted. It
was now whispered on the breeze that Matty was not only in a fair state
of recovery but also that a substantial means of consolation had been
opportunely found her.

Not only was Gus Jenkins very much to Matty's taste, but she proved,
which, perhaps, was more to the point, to suit him exactly. This hero,
who was doing a thriving trade in the oil business in London, delighted
in laughing, merry, giggling girls, and surely where could he find
another to equal Matty in that respect. Whenever he looked at her she
laughed, whenever he spoke to her she blushed and giggled. He began to
consider himself a wonder of wit and fascination. Really it was no
trouble at all to entertain a nice, little, soft, round thing like Matty
Bell. He pronounced the shot silk a splendid robe, and asked Matty
pointedly what place of amusement she would like best to see in London,
and in whose presence she would most happily enjoy it.

Matty could scarcely speak when this remarkable question was addressed
to her, unless giggles, blushes, gasps, and "Oh, Gus, how killing you
are!" could be taken as a sensible reply.

Under these circumstances Mrs. Bell felt that the less she said about
Captain Bertram and that old affair of his with Matty the better. She
always mentioned it now as "that old affair," and whispered in strictest
confidence to her friends that Gus, poor dear fellow, was so absurdly
jealous of Captain Bertram that she dared not breathe the captain's name
in his presence.

"It's awful to see the thunder-clap that comes on Gusty's brow," the
good lady would say. "And what I'm so terrified of is that if he and the
captain meet they'll do each other a serious mischief. My poor child,
she is the innocent cause, Well, well, she has been much sought after."

When Beatrice asked the Bells to become her bride's-maids, Mrs. Bell
thought the time had arrived to let bygones be bygones, and to accept
the proffered honor.

"It was the captain's wish, I make no doubt," she said to her husband;
"he knew he hadn't a chance of winning the girl on whom his heart was
set, but he thought, at least, he might have the pleasure of seeing her
at his wedding, and, so to speak, looking his last on her. It's my
belief, too, that he'll relieve his feelings by giving Matty a very
beautiful present. She must hide it from Gusty, though; Gusty is so
terrible in the jealous excess of his feelings."

As Beatrice had insisted on giving her bride's-maids their dresses,
no difficulty could be experienced on that head, and the Bells,
notwithstanding that stormy period which had gone before, enjoyed
themselves immensely during the brief season of Beatrice's engagement.

Mrs. Bell certainly was happy during this time. If Matty was not engaged
to Bertram she soon would be to a better man. Gusty Jenkins, as she
invariably called him, was, of course, the better man now in her eyes.
The three girls were being supplied with new and lovely dresses, in
which Mrs. Bell assured her husband they'd look like angels wafted down
fresh from the skies--for the occasion. When she said this, Bell did not
agree with her, but that was not of the slightest consequence.

Mrs. Bell also during these happy weeks was making a little secret hoard
of money, which further considerably added to the good lady's felicity.

That young visitor of the Bell's, Miss Hart, proved herself a most
unobtrusive and retiring person. She was strangely reserved, no doubt,
and would reveal none of the secret which she had dimly alluded to on
the night of her arrival to Mrs. Bell, but she was chatty and pleasant
enough to the girls when quite alone with them. She put them up to many
small wrinkles with regard to their toilette, and insisted on dressing
Matty's hair in a way which made it look both thick and becoming. When
the Bells were quite alone she was present at their meals where she
quite subjugated the hearts of Bell and his son, Albert. But when
visitors appeared at the hospitable board Miss Hart would not present
herself. She had a curious reserve about her, which everyone noticed at
the time, and commented on largely by-and-bye. If the all-absorbing
topic of the day, Beatrice's wedding, was discussed, she invariably grew
grave, her face would become a shade paler than its wont, and her
bright, restless eyes would be lowered.

Except on one occasion, she never asked questions about the approaching
wedding. On the contrary, she markedly avoided the subject. Once,
however, she inquired the date of the wedding from Matty. On hearing it
she turned very pale, and left the room. Matty remembered this fact
by-and-bye.

Once, too, Sophy saw her standing in her bedroom with her two hands
pressed tightly to her side, as though something had given her an
intense pain there. She was close to the window, and must have been
looking out, and Sophy observed that Captain Bertram and Beatrice were
walking down the street together.

Notwithstanding all Mrs. Bell's coaxings, Miss Hart would never go out
during the day-time, but when darkness fell, and it came early now, in
the beginning of September, she would wrap her gray cloak about her, and
go away for long, long walks all alone.

Mrs. Bell thought this proceeding anything but proper, but Josephine
Hart minded very little what any one thought about her.

As the days wore on, her white face seemed to grow whiter, and her big
bright eyes often looked pathetic as well as bright. She ate very
little, too, and scarcely spoke at all; but it never occurred to her or
any one else to suppose that she was ill.

The weather during all this period continued very fine. Never had so
glorious a summer been remembered at Northbury, and the good folk said
it was a lucky omen for the young bride, who was a favorite with rich
and poor alike. Every one in Northbury made Beatrice a present, and she
began to collect quite a curious collection of gifts. None of these
presents were splendid, few of them possessed intrinsic value, but the
young girl treasured them, one and all, very much; for they were to her
symbols of the love which had shone about her path from her birth.

Mrs. Bertram could not understand the joy Beatrice felt over the crude
gifts of the fishermen's wives, nor her ecstasy when a poor girl whom
she had once befriended, brought her a dozen yards of narrow and very
dirty crotchet edging. Beatrice almost kissed that edging, and her eyes
filled with tears as she folded it up and put it away.

No such soft radiance came to them when her future mother-in-law
presented her with a beautiful diamond cross, which was an old family
heirloom, and must belong by right to Bertram's wife.

"This is of great value," Mrs. Bertram said; "and it will suit you, my
dear, you are the sort of girl who can wear diamonds, and look well in
them."

"But I like flowers best," said Beatrice, under her breath.

She kissed Mrs. Bertram, and thanked her for her gift, which she locked
away very carefully, as she knew it was of much value. But her heart was
not stirred by it as it had been by the crotchet edging which Jenny Ray
had made for her.

Mrs. Gorman Stanley gave Beatrice a large piece of Berlin wool-work; it
was not handsome, nor had it cost the good lady much, for she had picked
it up years ago at an auction. Mrs. Gorman Stanley was not a generous
person, and as the Berlin wool-work had always troubled her on account
of its magnificence, its uselessness, and the almost certainty that the
moths would get in and devour it, she thought it a good opportunity of
making an effective present, and getting rid of a household care.

Once that wool-work had been put together with love and pride. The
impossible lilies and roses, the huge peonies, and gigantic hollyhocks
which composed its pattern, had been formed, stitch by stitch, by
unknown fingers, probably now crumbled to dust.

The wool-work might have told a story could it speak, but it had never
imparted its secrets, pathetic or otherwise, to Mrs. Gorman Stanley, and
Beatrice received the gorgeous gift with little emotion, and some
shrinking away from its bad taste.

Mrs. Butler, after a great deal of consultation with her sister Maria,
decided to give the bride-elect a huge white, carved ivory brooch. This
brooch was her own favorite ornament; it was of gigantic dimensions, and
consisted of an elaborate circle of flowers, supporting the word
"Martha" in the centre.

"You'll wear it for me, love," said Mrs. Butler, "you'll never put it
on, but you'll give Martha Butler a thought."

Beatrice assured her friend that this must certainly be the case. She
was really grateful to Mrs. Butler, for she knew the old lady adored
that brooch, and it had cost her much to deprive herself of it.

Miss Peters smuggled her little gift into Beatrice's hand as they were
parting. It was a yard of Honiton lace, very old, and much darned. Bee
had often seen this lace round Miss Peters' little wintry throat. She
kissed it when she looked at it now, and placed it very near the
crotchet edging in her regard.

But it would take a much longer space than this story can afford to
recount all the presents that came to Beatrice Meadowsweet. From the
Bertram connection the gifts were of money value, from the Northbury
people they were rich with something better than money. Not one of Bee's
friends forgot her at this time.

September came on apace, and at last there wanted but a week of the
wedding day.

On a certain evening when the wind blew rather fresh from the sea,
Captain Bertram asked Beatrice to walk with him. She complied. They took
a long walk over the cliffs, and it was quite late and dark when they
returned home.

They had to pass the Manor on their way back to the Gray House, where
Bertram was to stay for supper.

As they walked along, talking gravely, for Beatrice did not often laugh
when alone with her lover, a slender and tall figure passed them quickly
in the darkness. Bertram, who was walking very close to Bee, stumbled
against her, and uttered a smothered oath.

"What is the matter?" she asked in astonishment. "Have you hurt
yourself?"

"No, I thought I recognized a face, but I must be mistaken."

"That slim girl who passed us so quickly just now? I, too, fancy I have
seen her before. Certainly she is a stranger here."

"Don't talk about her, Beatrice. It was a casual likeness. People look
so different--distorted by the darkness. To-night it is very dark. There
is no moon."

"Still, I can see," said Beatrice, pausing and looking back. "I can see,
and I fancy the stranger is standing still and looking at us. Back
there, by the hedge. Perhaps she is in trouble. Shall I run and speak to
her?"

"No, not for the world. Come home. Forget her."

His tone was almost rough. They walked on rapidly. The high wind of a
coming storm beat in their faces. Beatrice felt tired and dispirited,
and Bertram's agitation and complete change of manner puzzled her.

Presently they reached the house.

"Here we are at last; you will be glad of your supper," she said.

"No, thanks, I am not coming in."

"Not coming in? You promised. Mother expects you."

"Excuse me to-night, Beatrice. I have a headache. I shall go straight
home. Good-night. I'll come down early in the morning."

He took her hand, dropped it hastily, and almost before the door was
opened, had turned away. Beatrice did not go in at once. She heard his
quick, retreating steps. Presently they quickened into a run.




CHAPTER XXVI.

WE WILL RETURN TO OUR SECLUSION.


"I am mad," said Bertram to himself. "Mad, as ever was the proverbial
March hare. That girl who passed us in the darkness was Josephine Hart.
Yes, that girl was Nina, and I must, I will, see her again."

His heart was beating tumultuously; he felt the great passion of his
love tingling through all his veins. Money was nothing to him in this
hour, debts were forgotten, disgrace and dishonor were nowhere. Nina and
love were all in all. He _would_ see her, he would kiss her, he
would hold her in his arms, he would, he must. The very elements helped
him as he ran back to the place where he knew she had paused to watch
him. Why had she come back! She knew her power only too well. Why had
she come to exercise it? It was mad of her, wicked of her, it meant his
ruin, and yet he was glad, yet he rejoiced.

The moments seemed endless until he could reach her. Beatrice was as
absolutely forgotten by him at this moment as if she had never existed.

At last he gained the spot where Josephine had brushed past him in the
darkness. He knew it, he knew the sudden curve of the road, the bend in
the path where it began to dip downwards. He stood still, and strained
his eyes to look through the darkness. No one was there. Beatrice had
seen the slender figure leaning against the hedge, but all now was
emptiness and solitude. Not a soul was in sight. On this lonely road not
a being but himself breathed.

He stood motionless, he listened hard. Once even he called aloud:

"I am here, Nina! Here, Nina! waiting for you here!"

But no one responded. He was alone; the vision, the delicious,
heart-stirring vision, had vanished.

Captain Bertram wandered about, restless and miserable, for an hour or
two. Then he went home and retired straight to his room.

That night he did not attempt to keep the secret chamber of his heart in
which Josephine dwelt, locked and barred. No, he opened the doors wide,
and bade her come out, and talked to her. Passionate and wild and loving
words he used, and Beatrice was nothing to him. He did not go to bed
that night. In the morning his face showed symptoms of the vigil he had
passed through. His mother noticed the haggard lines round his eyes, and
she gave vent to a sigh--scarcely audible, it is true, and quickly
smothered.

Mrs. Bertram was happy, but still she lived on thorns. She felt that the
fairy palace she had built over that sepulchre of the past might crumble
at any moment. The lines of care on Bertram's brow gave her a sensation
of fear. Was anything the matter? Was the courage of the bride-elect
failing? At the eleventh hour could anything possibly injure the
arrangements so nearly completed?

Catherine and Mabel were in good spirits. Their bride's-maids' dresses
had arrived from town the previous night. They were of gauzy white over
silk slips; the girls had never possessed such luxurious costumes
before.

"You'd like to see us in them, wouldn't you, Loftie?" said Mabel.
"Catherine looks splendid in hers, and those big hats with Marguerites
are so becoming. Shall we put our dresses on, Loftie, for you to see
before you run away to Beatrice? Shall we?"

Loftus raised his dark eyes, and looked full at his young sister. There
were heavy shadows round his eyes; their depths looked gloomy and
troubled.

"What did you say?" he asked, in a morose voice.

"What did I say? Well, really, Loftie, you are too bad. I do think you
are the most selfish person I know. At one time I thought Bee was
improving you, but you are worse than ever this morning. You never,
never, take a bit of interest in things that don't immediately concern
yourself. I thought our bride's-maids' dresses would have been
sufficiently important to rouse a passing interest even in--now, what's
the matter, Catherine? I _will_ speak out."

"Forgive me, Mab, I have a headache and feel stupid," interrupted
Loftus, rising to his feet. "I'm going out for a stroll; the air will do
me good."

He went up to the end of the table where his mother sat, kissed her
almost tenderly, and left the room.

Catherine began to reprove Mabel.

"It is you who are selfish," she said. "You know Loftie must have a
great deal on his mind just now."

"Oh, well, I don't care. Every little pleasure is somehow or other
dashed to the ground. _I was_ pleased when I thought Bee was to be
my sister, and she was so sweet about the dresses, choosing just what
we'd look best in. Loftus was nice, too, until this morning. Now I don't
feel as if I cared about anything."

Mabel never reflected on the possibility of her own words causing
annoyance. She ate her breakfast without observing that both her mother
and Catherine looked depressed. Presently, like the thoughtless child
she was, she looked up with laughing eyes:

"Won't the Bells look funny in those grand robes. Do you know, Kate, I
heard such a ridiculous thing yesterday. It was Mrs. Gorman Stanley who
told me. She said Matty Bell was over head and ears in love with Loftie,
and that Mrs. Bell had quite made up her mind that Loftie was to marry
Mattie. She told such a funny story of the way Mrs. Butler broke the
news of Beatrice's engagement to the Bells. Now, what's up? Have I said
anything wrong again?"

"You have, Mabel," said her mother. "You have been guilty of repeating
common and vulgar gossip. You ought never to have listened to it. I had
hoped that a daughter of mine, a Bertram, too, would have inspired too
much respect to have any such rubbish spoken of in her presence."

"Oh, really, mother, I don't think people much care whether we are
Bertrams or not."

"Hush, my dear, that is sufficient. I always feared the effect of the
low society of this place on you both, and in especial on you, Mabel. My
fears have been justified by the results. As soon as Loftus's wedding is
over we will return to our seclusion, my dears."




CHAPTER XXVII.

THE LIGHTS WERE DIM.


Early on that very morning Miss Hart tapped at Mrs. Bell's door. That
good lady was not fully dressed, but she appeared in a voluminous
morning robe to answer her young visitor's summons.

"I am going away, Mrs. Bell," said Miss Hart.

"Oh, my dear!" Mrs. Bell's full-moon face turned absolutely pale. "Going
away, my love!" she said. She thought of her private hoard, not nearly
large enough, and her voice became absolutely pathetic. "Going away,
Miss Hart? I'm truly grieved to hear it. And haven't I made you
comfortable enough, my poor dear?"

"Oh, you misunderstand me, Mrs. Bell. I am going away, but only for a
little--just for a day or two. I don't know exactly when I shall be
back, but probably in a day or two. I am going by the early train, and I
tapped at your door to say good-bye."

Then Mrs. Bell in her delight and joy kissed Miss Hart, who soon
afterwards left the house.

She walked to the station, the hour was early, and there was no special
person about. She took a first-class ticket to a small town about thirty
miles away, and immediately afterwards her train came up.

During the greater part of her journey Miss Hart had the compartment to
herself. By-and-bye fellow-passengers got in, who almost started back at
the sight of the pale face of the girl, who sat with her veil thrown
back, looking straight out of the open window.

There was a strange expression on her face; her brows were slightly
drawn together, and the curves of her lips had a, weary and pathetic
droop. She had taken off her gloves, and now and then she clasped her
slender white hands together with a nervous, passionate tension. Then
the look in her eyes became almost ugly, and her fellow passengers were
uncomfortable as they watched her.

At the little country town of West Brockley, Miss Hart alighted. She had
brought all her luggage in a small handbag, and now she walked to her
destination. It was in the outskirts of the little town, and amongst a
row of poor houses. She stopped at one of these, and entered by the open
door. A woman met her in the passage.

"Is Mr. Hart within?"

"I don't know, madam, I'll inquire."

"No, don't do that. I'll go to him myself. He's at the top of the house,
of course, as usual?"

"Why, as usual, madam? Mr. Hart has never been my lodger before."

"I know his ways. He invariably seeks the top."

"From no prejudice, madam. He seems a very quiet gentleman."

"Exactly. Treasure him, he is a valuable lodger. Now let me pass,
please. I am going to seek him."

"Perhaps I had better tell him first, young lady."

"I am his grandchild. It is all right. Let me pass."

She brushed the woman aside, and flew lightly up the stairs. She knocked
at the door of the top attic, but followed her knock into the room
before any one had made response from within.

Old Hart was, as usual, messing over some cooking. He stopped it when he
saw Josephine, and an iron spoon which he held in his hand clattered
noisily to the floor.

"Now, Nina, what is the matter?"

"I am going to spend the day with you, Granddad, and probably the night
as well. You can give me a bed in a corner of this delightful
sitting-room. Is that breakfast? I wish you would serve it up; I am
starving."

"It's a very good breakfast, little Nina. Fried rabbit, done after a new
method. Bacon and eggs to follow, with a sauce of port wine. Olives and
sour claret for dessert. I know your taste, witch."

"I love olives," said Nina. "Sit at the table, Grand-dad, and let us
begin. By the way, when did you shave last?"

"Ha--ha, who have I to shave for now, my pretty Nina? Nobody cares for
the old man, nobody looks at him with eyes of admiration. Why should he
waste his money and his time over the barbarous rite of shaving? Nature
has her way with the old man now, sweet witch."

"Nature doesn't improve you, Grand-dad. You require the refining touches
of art. Your beard is unkempt, your hair too long. You shall visit the
barber after we have concluded our meal. It is distressing to mankind in
general to behold a spectacle like you. You owe a duty to the world at
large. You must visit the barber."

"Chut--chut! What a witch it is! Why didn't it stay at home, and not
worry the old man?"

"Serve up the breakfast, Grand-dad, and believe in the salutary nature
of your granddaughter's visitations."

The two sat down to their meal, and both ate for a time in unbroken
silence. After his third glass of sour claret, the old man spoke:

"How are you, Nina? You don't look up to much?"

"Would you be up to much if a fever consumed you day and night? Feel my
hand, Grand-dad."

The old man gripped the slender fingers, then flung them away.

"Good God! they burn!" he said. "Don't touch me, witch. You may have
contracted something catching."

"No, nothing that the old man can catch. Now, let us be pleasant, and
enjoy the day together."

"We can't. I am going to move to-day."

"You must stay here to-day; you can move tomorrow."

"Witch, how you order me. I won't be ordered. I shall move to-day."

"You have no idea of moving, either to-day or to-morrow. Don't talk
nonsense. You have had your breakfast. I will wash the things up. Go and
visit the barber."

The old man muttered and mumbled. Finally he tied a large crimson scarf
in a loose knot round his throat, shoved a soft felt hat on his head,
and donning a greasy and very old brown velvet cloak, he prepared to go
out.

"It's a rare nuisance," he said; "I meant to try some Chinese cooking
for dinner; something with a subtle aroma, delicate, and hard to obtain.
You boil the leeks for so many hours, and catch the essence in a
distiller. Bah! you care nothing for eating, witch."

"I like some of your dishes very well, Granddad, but I prefer
cleanliness to luxury. Now, go out and get shaved."

"It will cost me sixpence."

"Sixpence well spent. Don't talk any more; go!"

He blew her a kiss, half of derision, half of pride, and shambled
downstairs. A crowd of little boys followed him up the street; some
pulled his cloak, some mocked him openly. He neither felt the pulls nor
heard the words. He was absorbed in the thought of that delicious
Chinese dinner which he could not now partake of to-day.

As soon as he was gone, Nina, too, ran downstairs. She went to a
chemist's, and boldly asked for a small quantity of a certain drug.

"Have you a prescription?" the man inquired.

"No, but I understand the right proportions to take. Why do you
hesitate? I am not asking for poison."

The man stared hard at the bright, queer face of his customer.

"The drug is not poison," he slowly repeated, "but taken in too large
quantities it can inflict an injury. I will give it to you, but you must
enter your name and address in this book."

Josephine laughed lightly, entered old Hart's address in the book, paid
for her medicine, and departed. As soon as she got home she took out of
a cupboard a decanter which contained a small portion of a very bright
and clear wine. She mixed a little of the powder with the wine. It
dissolved instantly, and did not disturb the rare amber of the liquid.
The rest of the powder Nina threw into the fire, burning both paper and
string.

When Hart came back, shaven and neat, his hair shortened, his long
snow-white beard trimmed, he looked what he was--a strikingly handsome
man. His grand-daughter possessed his regular features, but, although
her eyes were as bright as his, they were not dark. She had black
eyelashes and black brows, but the eyes themselves were peculiarly
light.

Nina was in an excellent humor now. She helped her grandfather with his
cooking, and by-and-by, as the day wore on, she tempted him to come for
a stroll with her. She spoke very little of her present life, nor did he
question her. He had a certain fondness for his grandchild, but it never
rose to the extent of a genuine interest in her concerns. Of late she
had been to him a valuable chattel--a trump-card, by which he could
extract the good things of life out of another. With Nina he was
powerful, without her he was a helpless and penniless old man. But he
did not love Nina because of this. He was proud of her for what she
brought him, proud of her because if he was lowly born she was not. But
he loved her, after the slight fashion with which alone he could bestow
love, because, notwithstanding that good birth, she also belonged to
him--she was bone of his bone, flesh of his flesh. The ties of blood
were strong with him, and because of these ties he loved her after his
fashion.

The two came home presently and partook of supper together. Nina bought
some figs and peaches, and they had quite a dainty meal. Nina herself
prepared the board, and she put the decanter with the amber wine close
to the old man. He ate and drank. He said the wine was good, and he
helped himself twice to the sparkling contents of the decanter. "I feel
in spirits to-night, Nina," he said, looking at his grandchild.

"Have a little more wine, Grand-dad," she said, in retort.

In spite of all her efforts, her voice had an anxious ring in it as she
spoke. He looked at her keenly. He was as suspicious as man could be. He
half-stretched out his hand to seize the decanter, then with a sly smile
he replaced the stopper in the neck of the bottle.

"No, no, witch," he said. "This wine is rare and precious. It raises the
spirit and warms the heart. I have not much more wine from so rare a
vintage, and I'll keep what's in the bottle for another night, when you,
pretty Nina, are far away, and the spirits of the old man fail him."

"Do," she said. "Keep the precious wine, you don't need it to-night."

Then she handed him his pipe, and after a time he became drowsy and went
to bed.

Hart's bedroom was a small attic inside the larger one. He shut the
door, looked round for the key, for he generally locked himself in,
could not find it, and then, being very drowsy, undressed and went to
bed.

Nina was to sleep on the sofa in the sitting-room. She lay down, took a
novel out of her pocket, and tried to read. Her heart was beating hard,
and that burning fever of unrest and longing which was consuming her
very life, kept coursing madly through her veins.

"The fever is my wine," she muttered. "At first it supplies false
strength, false cheer, false hope. Afterwards--afterwards--" a queer
look came into her strange face--"I too, shall rest and sleep."

Profound stillness reigned in the next room. Nina softly rose, and going
to the sideboard took out the decanter of wine, opened a window, and
emptied it into the area below. She washed the decanter afterwards and
then put it back into the sideboard.

There was not a sound in the inner room. Candle in hand, she opened the
door and went in. She put the candle on the mantelpiece, and then going
to the bed, bent over it and looked at the sleeper.

"Poor Grand-dad!" said the girl. She stooped and kissed the old man's
forehead. "You have been good to me after your lights--it was not your
fault that those lights were dim. Had you been an educated man,
Grand-dad, you'd have educated me; and had you been a good man, you'd
have taught me goodness; and a kind man, you'd have guarded your poor
Nina. Was it your fault that you were ignorant--and wanting in
goodness--and lacking in kindness? You did your best--, after your
lights."

Then she stooped and kissed him again. He was heavy from the drug she
had put into the wine, and did not stir. She slipped her hand softly
under his pillow.

"Poor old man, I am taking away your trump-card," she said. She drew a
thick letter, yellow with age, from under the pillow, put it into her
pocket, and taking up the candle left the room.




CHAPTER XXVIII.

RIVALS.


A couple of days after this Beatrice Meadowsweet received a note from
Mrs. Bell, asking her to call to see her. The note came early in the
morning, and immediately after breakfast Beatrice went to the Bells'
house.

Mrs. Bell took her into the drawing-room and shut the door behind them
both.

"Beatrice," she said, "I owed you a grudge, but that is past. You
stepped in, where you had no right to step, and for a time, I won't deny
it, my heart was very sore. I haven't sent for you to-day, though, to
rip up past troubles. I'm inclined to think that all's for the best. It
has pleased the Almighty to provide you with a wild mate--and my girl
with a steady one. Last night as the clock struck nine, Gusty Jenkins
popped the question for Matty, and all being agreeable, the young man
torn with love, and rock-like as regards character, Gusty and Matty are
now an affianced pair. Therefore, Beatrice, I say let by-gones be
by-gones, and may you have what luck can await you in the future with
that wild young man."

"I don't see why you should take away Captain Bertram's character," said
Beatrice, with some spirit. "You liked him very much once."

"I'm not saying anything against him, my dear. I mean not anything more
than the truth can bear out. There was a time when I thought well of
Captain Bertram. I'm the last to deny there was such a time, but
handsome is that handsome does, and when a young man had not the courage
to obey his heart's promptings, and when rumors will travel on the
breezes of extravagant, not to say naughty ways, I say, Beatrice, a
woman can't become blind as a bat when these things stare her in the
face."

No one in Northbury ever remembered seeing Beatrice in a passion. She
was acknowledged to be sweet-tempered, and slow to be provoked. On this
occasion, however, she was very nearly making the proverbial exception
to her general rule. Beatrice was very nearly angry. A flush of color
crimsoned her cheeks and brow, and an indignant light flashed from her
eyes. In time, however, she was able to murmur to herself: "This is only
Mrs. Bell's talk, and how could I be so silly as to mind Mrs. Bell?" So
after a pause she said with effort, "I must congratulate Matty on her
engagement; I am glad Matty is happy."

"Ah, my dear, and well she may be! Glad should I be to know that other
girls had half so bright a future before them. Rich, handsome, and
young, that's what Gusty is! Devoted! he's like one of the old knights
for devotion. I have had my qualms about the jealousy of his nature, but
otherwise Gusty is, _song pear and song reproach_."

At this moment the door was opened, some childish giggles and mirth were
heard in the passage, and Matty rushed in, followed by the redoubtable
Gusty. "Oh, Gus, you'll kill me!" she exclaimed; "you are too funny.
Why, ma, is that you? And--and--Bee? How do you do, Bee?"

Matty came over and kissed her friend awkwardly.

"I am very glad to hear of your happiness, Matty," said Beatrice; "and I
congratulate you, too, Augustus," she added, turning to the bashful
swain.

"Oh, you want us to leave this room to yourselves, you two naughty
things!" said the mother, shaking her head in fat ecstasy over her two
turtle-doves. "Come, Bee; by-the-way, there's a young girl upstairs, a
Miss Hart, a friend of mine, who is very anxious to see you."

Mrs. Bell and Beatrice left the drawing-room, and Augustus Jenkins
turned to his fiancée "By Jove," he said, "that girl _is_ a bouncer!"

"What girl?" said Matty, in a quick jealous voice. She had flung herself
in a languid attitude on the sofa, now she sat bolt upright.

"Killing, I call her," proceeded Gus; "simply killing. Such an eye, such
a curl of the lip! By Jove--she'd bowl any fellow over."

Matty flushed deeply, and turned her head away to look out of the
window.

"What's up, now, little duck?" said the lover. "Oh, she's jealous, is
she? By George, that's a good un! You were in luck, missy, to come in my
way first, or I don't know what mightn't have happened; and she's got
lots of the tin, too, I've been told! So she's Captain Bertram's fancy.
Well, he's a good judge and no mistake."

"I don't know that she's his fancy at all, Gusty. Ma always said that
I--I--"

"Oh, by Jove! Matty, don't you try to come it over me like that. What a
thunder-cloud? So she's frightfully jealous, is she, poor little duck? I
say, though, you'd better keep me out of that girl's way; engaged or
not, she'd mash any fellow. Now, what's up? Is that you, Alice? What a
noisy one you are, to be sure!"

Alice had rushed into the room followed by Sophy, who was followed again
by Daisy Jenkins.

"The bride's-maid dresses have come!" screamed Alice. "Let's all go and
try them on, Matty!"

When Mrs. Bell took Beatrice out of the room, she said a few more words
about Miss Hart. Finally she took Beatrice upstairs, and ushered her
into her young visitor's bedroom.

Amongst the other luxuries which Josephine's money had secured for her
in the Bells' house was an old-fashioned sofa, which was drawn across
the windows. On this sofa Josephine often lay for hours. She was lying
on it now, in a white morning dress. Mrs. Bell introduced the girls to
each other, and then left them.

"I have seen you before," said Beatrice, the moment they were alone;
"once before I have seen your face. You were looking out of a window.
Stay," she added, suddenly, "I think I have seen you twice before. Are
you not the girl who brushed past Captain Bertram and me the other night
in the dark? Yes, I am sure you are the girl."

"You are right," said Josephine; "I am the girl." She spoke in an eager
voice, two burning spots rose to her pale cheeks; her eyes always bright
now almost glittered. "I am the girl," she repeated. She half rose from
her sofa, but sat down on it again, and panted heavily, as though her
breath failed her.

"You are ill," said Beatrice, with compunction; "you look very ill. Have
you been long here? Mrs. Bell says that you are a friend of hers, a
visitor."

"Yes, I am a friend and visitor. Mrs. Bell is very good to me."

"But you are ill. You ought to see a doctor."

"I ought not--I will not."

"Can I help you? It was kind of you to send for me. Can I do anything
for you?"

"Wait until I get back my breath. I will speak in a minute. Sit quiet.
Let me be still. It is agitation enough to have you in the room."

Her eyes glittered again. She pressed her white transparent hands to her
throbbing heart.

Beatrice sat motionless. She had a queer feeling at her own heart, a
kind of premonition that a blow was about to be struck at her. Several
minutes passed. Then the girl on the sofa spoke.

"The struggle of seeing you is past. I see--I endure. Your name is
Beatrice Meadowsweet--?"

"Yes, I am Beatrice Meadowsweet."

"You are engaged to Captain Bertram?"

"Yes."

"You are to be married on the 10th of this month."

"Yes."

"This is the 5th. You are to be married in five days!"

"I am, Miss Hart. Do you want to congratulate me?"

"I--yes--I congratulate you. You--are attached--to Loftus?"

"To Captain Bertram? Do you know him?"

"No matter. You--you love him?"

"Why should I speak of my feelings? To marry a man is a proof of love,
is it not? Do you know my future husband?"

"I--once I knew him."

"He has never spoken to me about you. Did you know him well?"

"No matter. I knew him--no matter how much. He loves you, does he not?"

"I believe he faithfully loves me."

"Yes, I saw you together. There is no doubt. I heard the tone in his
voice. You can't mistake that tone, can you?"

"I don't know. I have not much experience."

"You ought to have, for you are so beautiful. Yes, he loves you. It is
all over."

"What is all over?"

"Nothing. Did I say anything wild of that sort? Don't believe the
nonsense I speak. I am ill, and my brain sometimes wanders. There is a
great fire consuming me, and I am tired of being burned alive. Sometimes
in my pain I talk wildly. Nothing is over, for nothing really began. You
will be good to Captain Bertram, won't you? How you look at me! You have
very true eyes, very true. Now I will tell you the truth. Once I knew
him, and he was kind to me--a _little_ kind--you know the sort of
thing. I thought it meant more. He has forgotten me, of course, and
you'll be good to him, for he--he's not perfect--although he
suited--yes, he suited me very well. How my heart beats! Don't talk to
me for a minute."

She lay back panting on the sofa. Beatrice got up and walked to the
window. There was a long view of the High Street from this window. The
street was straight and narrow, with few curves.

At that moment Beatrice saw Captain Bertram. He was a long way off, but
he was walking down the street in the direction of the Bells' house. In
about three minutes he would pass the house.

As Beatrice stood by the window she thought. A memory came over her. A
memory of a man's steps--they were leaving her--they were hurrying--they
were quickening to a run. In a flash she made up her mind.

She came back to the sofa where Nina sat.

"Can I do anything for you? Tell me quickly, for I earnestly desire to
help you."

"You are good," said Nina. "You have a true voice, as well as a true
face. Yes, I sent for you. I do want you to be kind to me. I want you to
take a present from me to Captain Bertram."

"A present? What?"

"This little packet. It is sealed and addressed. Inside there is a
story. That story would make Captain Bertram unhappy. I know the story;
he does not know it. On your wedding-day, after you are married, give
him this packet. When you put it in his hands, say these words, 'Nina
sent you this, Loftus, and you are to burn it.' You must promise to see
him burn the packet. What is the matter? Aren't you going to take it?"

"Yes, I will take it. Give it to me; I will put it in my pocket. Now,
wait a moment. I want to run downstairs. I will come back again."

She softly closed the door of Nina's room, rushed downstairs, and out
into the street.

Captain Bertram was passing the Bells' door when Beatrice ran up to him.

"Loftus, I want you," she said.

He turned in astonishment. He had been walking down the street, lost in
a miserable dream. Beatrice, in her sharp, clear tone awoke him. He
started, a wave of color passed over his dark face.

"Is anything wrong?" he asked, almost in alarm. "Bee, you are excited!"

"I am, fearfully. Come in, come upstairs!"

"Into the Bells' house! I don't want to visit the Bells. Beatrice, you
look strange, and oh, how lovely!"

"Don't talk of my looks. Come in, come upstairs. No, you are not to see
the Bells, nor are any of them about. Come--come at once."

She ran quickly up the stairs. He followed her, wondering, perplexed and
irritated.

"Beatrice, what is the matter?" he said, once.

"Not much--or, rather, yes, everything. Inside that room, Captain
Bertram, is one you know. Go and see her--or rather, come and see her,
with me. You know her, and once, you were, after your fashion,--a
_little_ kind."

Beatrice threw open the door.

"Nina," she said, "Captain Bertram is here,"--then she paused,--her next
words came with a visible effort--"And his heart shall choose the girl
he loves."

Beatrice walked straight across the room to the window. She heard a cry
from Nina, and something between a groan and an exclamation of joy from
Bertram.

She did not look round.




CHAPTER XXIX.

THE FEELINGS OF A CRUSHED MOTH.


"I don't think it's right for Maria to be in the room," said Mrs.
Butler. "I'll listen to all you've got to say in a moment, Mrs. Gorman
Stanley, but--Maria, will you have the goodness to leave us."

"I'd rather stay," pleaded poor Miss Maria. "I always was deeply
interested in my darling Bee, and it's dreadful to think of her being
discussed and gossiped over, and me not present. You know, Martha, you
have a sharp tongue."

"This from you, Maria? You, who eat my bread. Well! Mrs. Gorman Stanley,
you are witness to this ingratitude."

"Oh, my dear good creatures, don't quarrel," said Mrs. Gorman Stanley.

She was a very phlegmatic woman, and hated scenes.

"If I were you, Mrs. Butler, I'd let poor Miss Peters stay," she added.
"I'm sure she's quite old enough."

"Mrs. Gorman Stanley, my sister is never old enough to listen to improper
subjects. Faithless, she is, ungrateful, perverse, but her innocence at
least I will respect. Maria, leave the room."

Poor Miss Maria slipped away. As she did so, she looked exactly like a
crushed brown moth. In the passage she stopped, glanced furtively around
her, and then, shocking to relate, put her ear to the key-hole. She felt
both sore and angry; they were saying horrid things of Beatrice, and
Miss Peters loved Beatrice.

Soon she went away, and burying her face in her little handkerchief,
sobbed bitterly.

Inside the drawing-room, Mrs. Butler and Mrs. Gorman Stanley were
holding awful conclave.

"You don't say, my dear, that she took the young man up to Miss Hart's
_private_ room? And who _is_ Miss Hart? And what's all this
fuss about? No, I'm glad Maria isn't here! I always tried to do my duty
by Maria, and a scandal of this kind she must not listen to. What does
it all mean, Mrs. Gorman Stanley? Is Beatrice Meadowsweet to be married
on Tuesday, or is she not?"

"My dear friend, I can't tell you. There are all sorts of rumors about.
I was at Perry's buying a yard of muslin, when Mrs. Morris came in. She
had her mouth pursed up, and her voice perfectly guttural from
bronchitis, so I knew she was keeping something in, and I made a point
of going up to her. I said, 'you have got some news, Mrs. Morris, and
you may as well out with it.' Then she told me."

"What? Mrs. Gorman Stanley, I trust you don't feel the draught from that
window. I'll shut it if you like. But what--what did she say?"

"Well, she said some queer things. Nobody can quite make out whether Bee
is to be married or not on Tuesday. Some say that Captain Bertram is
married already, and that his wife is living in seclusion at the
Bells'."

"At the Bells'? I'll go over at once and poke that mystery out. Maria!
_Maria_! She's sure to to be eaves-dropping somewhere near. Maria,
come here quickly, I want you."

"What is it, Martha?"

The little crushed moth put in a face, which disclosed very red eyes, at
the door.

"What is it, Martha? Do you want me?"

"Ah, I thought you couldn't be far off. You'll oblige me, Maria, by
running upstairs, and fetching down my bonnet and mantle. My _old_
gloves will do, and I'll have my fur boa, for the days are turning
wonderfully chilly. Yes, Mrs. Gorman Stanley," continued Mrs. Butler,
when Miss Peters had disappeared, "I'll soon get at the bottom of
_that_ bit of gossip. Are the Bells likely people to keep a close
secret to themselves; you tell me that, Mrs. Gorman Stanley? Aren't they
all blab, blab, blab? Ah, here comes Maria--and dressed to go out, too,
upon my word? Well, miss, I suppose I must humor you! You'll have the
decency, however, to remember to turn away your head if we matrons wish
to whisper a bit among ourselves. Good-bye, Mrs. Gorman Stanley. I'll
look in if I have any news for you this evening."

"Do," said Mrs. Gorman Stanley. "I'm all a-gog to hear. It's no joke to
order a handsome dress for a chit of a girl's wedding, and then not wear
it after all. I meant to get new curtains for my back parlor, heavy
snuff-colored moreen, going a great bargain, but I had to buy the dress
instead. Well, you'll let me know the news. Good-bye."

As they were walking down the street to the Bells' house Mrs. Butler
turned sharply to her little companion:

"Maria," she said, "you are a perfect fool."

"Well, really, Martha, I--I----"

"For goodness' sake, don't begin to snivel. I hadn't finished my speech.
I'm a fool, too. We are both in the same box."

"Oh, no, Martha, you always were----"

"Folly. You needn't roll your eyes at me. Don't flatter. I said we were
both fools. I repeat it. We have been hoaxed."

"Hoaxed?" said Miss Maria, with a high staccato note of inquiry.

"Yes. Hoaxed. Hoaxed out of our wedding presents by a girl who is not
going to have a wedding at all. I miss my brooch. My throat feels naked
without it. Last week I had a hoarseness. I attribute it to the loss of
the brooch."

"I don't miss my lace," said Miss Maria. "I am glad she has it. I am
very glad she has it, wedding or no wedding, bless her sweet heart."

"Maria, your sentiments are sickly. Don't give me any more of them. Here
we are at the door now. You'll remember, Maria, my hint, and act as a
modest woman, if occasion requires."

Here Mrs. Butler souded a loud rat-tat on the Bells' hall door. The
little maid opened it rather in a fright. She poked her head out. This
was a style usually adopted by the Northbury servants.

"Is your mistress in, Hannah?"

"I don't know, Mrs. Butler, ma'am. I'll inquire, ma'am. Will you walk
in, please, ma'am."

"I will, Hannah, and so will Miss Peters. Show us into the drawing-room,
and tell your mistress we are here. If she should happen to be out we
will wait her return. You will be particular to remember that, Hannah.
We'll wait her return."

"Oh, if you please, Mrs. Butler, will you--excuse me, ma'am, but
_will_ you come into the parlor, please, ma'am?"

"Into the parlor? Why into the parlor, pray?"

"It's Miss Matty, ma'am."

"Oh! has Miss Matty become mistress of this house? And does she forbid
her mother's visitors admission to the drawing-room! Hoots, toots--I'll
soon put a stop to that sort of thing. Come on, Maria."

"But really, Martha--do stop a moment, Martha--I'm sure Hannah ought to
know best."

"Oh, indeed, yes, Miss Peters--thank you, Miss Peters--missis did give
orders most positive. These were her exact words: 'Hannah,' she said,
'the parlor is for callers. You remember that, Hannah, and the
drawing-room is for--'"

"Yes," said Mrs. Butler, sweeping round, and confronting poor little
frightened Hannah. "Who is the drawing-room for?"

"For Miss Matty, please, Mrs. Butler, ma'am. For Miss Matty and Mr.
Gusty Jenkins. They're a--they're a-lovering in the drawing-room,
ma'am."

"Then they are engaged! That rumor also reached me. Come on, Maria.
We'll go and congratulate them."

No poor little ignorant maid-of-all-work could keep Mrs. Butler back
now. She swept down the passage, followed by the shrinking, but curious
Miss Peters. She threw open the drawing-room door herself, and intruded
upon the abashed young people with a stately flourish.

"How are you, Matty?" she said. "Oh, pray don't let us disturb you. Is
that you, Augustus? I'm pleased to see you, young man. I used to dandle
you when you were an infant--good gracious, what red hair you had,
and--it hasn't changed, not at all! Now, Matty, my dear, what are you
blushing about? You have caught your young man at last, and much luck
may you both have. If--' if at first you don't succeed, try, try, try
again.' You _have_ tried again, Matty, and I congratulate you. You
may kiss me, Matty, if you like. Maria, you may kiss Matty Bell. She's
engaged to Gusty. Well, Gusty, you _are_ a sly one. Never once have
you been near my house since your return. Better employed, you will say.
Ha, ha, _I_ know young men. Marry in haste and repent at leisure.
But come over now and sit near me by this window. I shouldn't object to
a dish of gossip with you, not at all. Do you remember that day when you
had your first tooth out? How you screamed? I held your hands, and your
mother your head. You were an arrant coward, Gusty, and I'm frank enough
to remind you of the fact."

Just then, to Augustus Jenkins' infinite relief, Mrs. Bell entered the
room; he was spared any further reminiscences of his youth, and he and
Matty were thankful to escape into the garden.

After the necessary congratulations had been gone through, and Mrs. Bell
had bridled, and looked important, and Mrs. Butler had slapped her
friend on the shoulder, and given her elbow a sly poke, and in short
gone through the pleasantries which she thought becoming to the
occasion, the ladies turned to the more serious business in hand.

Mrs. Butler, who prided herself on being candid, who was the terror of
her friends on account of this said candor, asked a plain question in
her usual style.

"Maria, go to the window and look out. Now, Mrs. Bell, you answer me yes
or no to this. Has Captain Bertram a wife concealed in this house, or
has he not? In short, is my throat naked for no rhyme or reason!"

Mrs. Bell, who could not quite see what Mrs. Butler's throat had to say
to a clandestine wife of Captain Bertram's, stared at her friend with
her usual round and stolid eyes.

"I think your brain must be wandering, Martha Butler," she said. "I
don't know anything about your throat, except that it is very indelicate
to wear it exposed, and as to Captain Bertram having a wife here, do you
want to insult me after all these years, Martha?"

"I want to do nothing of the kind, Tilly Bell. I only want to get at the
naked truth."

"It was your naked throat a minute ago."

"Well, they hang together, my throat and the truth. Has that young man
got a wife in this house, or has he not?"

"He has not, Mrs. Butler, and you forfeit my friendship from this
minute."

"Oh, I forfeit it, do I? (Come, Maria, we'll be going.) Very well, Mrs.
Bell, I have forfeited your friendship, very well. And there's no young
woman who oughtn't to be here, concealed on these premises. (Maria, stay
looking out at the window for a minute.) There's no strange young woman
here, oh, of course not. Poor Bell, honest man, only _fancies_ he
has a visitor in the house."

Here Mrs. Bell turned ghastly pale. Mrs. Butler saw that she had
unexpectedly driven a nail home, and with fiendish glee pursued her
advantage.

"A visitor! oh, yes, _all the lodgings were full,_ packed! and it
was so convenient to take in a visitor a--_friend._ Hunt the baker
has been speaking about it. I didn't listen--I make it a point
_never_ to listen to gossip--but Maria--Maria, you can come here
now. Have the goodness, Maria, to tell Mrs. Bell exactly what Hunt said,
when you went in to buy the brown loaf for me last Friday."

"Oh, sister--I--I really don't remember."

"Don't remember! Piddle dumpling! You remembered well enough when you
came back all agog with the news. I reproved you for listening to idle
gossip, and you read a sermon of Blair's on evil speaking aloud to me
that night. You shall read sermon ten to-night. It's on lying. Well,
Mrs. Bell, _I_ can repeat what my poor sister has forgotten. It was
only to the effect that you and Bell must have had a windfall left you,
and _he_ never knew a visitor treated so well as you treated yours.
The dainty cakes you had to get her, and the fuss over her, and every
blessed thing paid down for with silver of the realm. Well, well,
sometimes it is _convenient_ to have a visitor. But now I must
leave. Maria, we'll be going. You have got to get to your sermon on
lying as soon as possible. Good-bye, Mrs. Bell. Perhaps you'll be able
to tell some one else why the whole town is talking about Miss
Hart--whoever Miss Hart is--and about Beatrice, and the wedding being
put off--and Captain Bertram going off into high hysterics in--(Maria,
you can go back to the window)--in a certain young lady's private room.
Now I'm off. Come, Maria."




CHAPTER XXX.

GUARDIANS ARE NOT ALWAYS TO BE ENVIED.


It would have been difficult to find a more easy-going, kind,
happy-tempered man than Mr. Ingram. He had never married--this was not
because he had not loved. Stories were whispered about him, and these
stories had truth for their foundation--that when he was young he had
been engaged to a girl of high birth, great beauty of person, and rare
nobility of mind. Evelyn St. Just had died in her youth, and Mr. Ingram
for her sake had never brought a wife home to the pleasant old Rectory.
His sorrow had softened, but in no degree soured the good man. There had
been nothing in it to sour any one--no shade of bitterness, no thread of
unfaithfulness. The Rector firmly believed in a future state of bliss
and reunion, and he regarded his happiness as only deferred. As far as
his flock knew, the sorrow which had come to him in his youth only gave
him a peculiar sympathy for peculiar troubles. To all in sorrow the
Rector was the best of friends, but if the case was one where hearts
were touched, if that love which binds a man to a woman was in any way
the cause of the distress, then the Rector was indeed aroused to give of
his best to comfort and assist.

On the evening after her strange interview with Josephine Hart, Beatrice
put on her hat, and coming down to her mother where she sat as usual in
the pleasant drawing-room, told her that she was going to see Mr.
Ingram.

"It is rather late to-night, surely, child?"

"No, mother, it is not too late. I want particularly to see Mr. Ingram
to-night."

"Are you well, Bee? Your voice sounds tired."

"I am quite well, dear mother. Kiss me. I won't stay longer away than I
can help."

She left the house. It was getting dusk now, and the distance between
the Gray House and the Rectory was not small. But no Northbury girl
feared to be out alone, and Beatrice walked quickly, and before long
reached her destination.

The Rector was in--Beatrice would find him in his study. The old
housekeeper did not dream of conducting Miss Meadowsweet to this
apartment. She smiled at her affectionately, told her she knew the way
herself, and left her.

When Beatrice entered the study the Rector got up and took his favorite
by both her hands.

"I am glad to see you, my child," he said. "I was just feeling the
slightest _soupçon_ of loneliness, so you have come in opportunely.
Sit down, Bee. I suppose Bertram will call for you presently."

Beatrice did not make any response to this remark, but she drew a little
cane chair forward and sat down.

"Except your mother, no one will miss you more than I shall when you
leave us, Beatrice," said the Rector. "You are quite right to go, my
dear. Quite right. I see a useful and honorable career before you. But I
may be allowed just once to say that I shall be lonely without my
favorite."

"Dear Rector," said Beatrice. She came a little nearer, and almost
timidly laid her hand on his knee. Then she looked in his face. "I am
not going to leave you," she said.

"God bless my soul! What do you mean, child? Is anything wrong? You
don't look quite yourself. Has that young scoundrel--if I thought--" the
Rector got up. His face was red, he clenched his hand in no clerical
style.

Beatrice also rose to her feet.

"He is not a scoundrel," she said. "Although if our engagement had gone
on, and I had been married to Captain Bertram, he would have been one."

"Then you are not engaged? You have broken it off."

"I am not engaged. I have released Captain Bertram from his engagement
to me."

"Beatrice! I did not expect this from you. His mother is attached to
you--so are his sisters, while he himself, poor lad--! Bee, it was
better you should find out your heart in time, but I am surprised--I am
grieved. You should have known it before--before things went as far as
this, my dear girl."

"Please, Mr. Ingram, listen to me. Sit down again, for I have a long
story to tell. I have not changed my mind, nor am I guilty of any
special fickleness. But circumstances have arisen which make it
impossible for me to keep my engagement. Captain Bertram sees this as
plainly as I do. He is very thankful to be released."

"Then he is a scoundrel, I thought as much."

"No, he isn't that. But he has been weak, poor fellow, and harassed, and
tempted. And his mother has used all her influence. I know now what she
wanted me for. Just for my money. But I've been saved in time."

"God bless me, this is very strange and dreadful. You puzzle me
awfully."

"I will tell you the story, Rector, then you won't be puzzled. Do you
remember once speaking to me about a girl you saw at the Manor lodge.
She was living there for a little. Her name was Hart."

"Yes, yes, a very handsome, queer girl. I spoke to Mrs. Bertram about
her. She seemed to me to have taken an unjust prejudice against the poor
lonely child."

"Mr. Ingram, Miss Hart is engaged to Loftus Bertram, and he will marry
her next Tuesday."

"Beatrice, have you gone quite mad?

"No, I am as sane as any other girl who has got a shock, but who is
resolved to do right. Captain Bertram shall marry Nina, because in heart
they are married already, because they love each other, as I never could
love him, nor he me, because they were betrothed to each other before he
and I ever met, because Nina was dying for love of him, and only
marrying him can save her. Oh, it was pitiable to see Nina, Mr. Ingram,
and I am thankful--I shall be thankful to my dying day--that I saw her
in time to save her."

"Beatrice, this is very strange and inexplicable. Where did you see Miss
Hart? I thought she had left Northbury."

"She came back, because she could not stay away. She is at the Bells'. I
saw her there to day, and I brought Loftus to her, and--Rector, they
love each other. Oh, yes, yes--when I see how much they love each other.
I am thankful I am not to be married with only the shadow of such a
reality."

"Then you never gave your heart to this young man?"

"Never! I thought I could help him. But my heart has not even stirred."

"You did not seem unhappy."

"I was not unhappy. It always gives me pleasure to help people. And
Catherine seemed so bright, and Mrs. Bertram so delighted, and Loftus
himself--there was much to win my regard in Loftus. I did not know it
was only my money they wanted."

"Poor child! And yet you are wrong. No one who looks at you, Beatrice,
can only want you for your money."

"Dear Rector, in this case my money was the charm. Well, my money shall
still have power. You are my guardian as well as my trustee. I want you
to help me. You can, you must. I will take no denial. Loftus and I have
had a long, long talk this afternoon. I have found at last the very
bottom of Bertram's heart. He came to me to save him, and I am
determined to be his deliverer. One quarter of my fortune I give to
Loftus Bertram, and he shall marry Nina, and his debts shall be paid,
and his mother relieved from the dreadful strain of anxiety she is now
undergoing, and Loftus and Nina shall be happy and good. Oh, yes, I know
they will be good as well as happy. You will help me, Rector, you will,
you must."

"Beatrice, you are the most quixotic, extraordinary, unworldly,
unpractical creature that ever breathed. What sort of guardian should I
be if I listened to so mad a scheme? What right has Loftus Bertram to
one farthing of your money, without you?"

"He can't have it with me, Rector. I would not marry him now at any
price."

"Then he must do without the money."

"No, he must have the money. Steps must be taken to secure it to him at
once, and he must keep his wedding-day with Nina instead of me. Nina
shall have my trousseau; we are exactly of one height--You have got to
change the name in the marriage license. If that is impossible there
shall be a special license. I am rich, I can pay for it. Oh, the joy
that sometimes money brings!"

"My dear ward, you are a little off your head to-night. How could you
possibly expect your guardian to be such a faithless old man."

"Faithless? Mr. Ingram, have you quite forgotten my father?"

"No, Beatrice, I remember him to-night."

"Let his face rise before you. Picture his face--his unworldly face."

"I see it, Beatrice. Yes, Meadowsweet was not cankered by the sordid
cares of life."

"Truly he was not? Go on thinking about him. He made money. How did he
spend it?"

"My dear child, your father was a very good man. His charities were
extraordinary and extensive. He gave away, hoping for nothing in return;
he was too liberal, I often told him so."

"You were his clergyman and you told him so."

A flash of indignation came out of Beatrice Meadowsweet's eyes.

"I don't think, Mr. Ingram, that a Greater than you has ever said that
to my father."

"Well, child, perhaps not. You reprove me, perhaps justly. Few of us
have your father's unworldly spirit."

"Don't you think his only daughter may inherit a little of it? Mr.
Ingram, what is money for?"

"Beatrice, you could argue any one into thinking with you. But I must
exercise my own common-sense."

"No, you must not. You must exercise your unworldly sense, and help me
in this matter."

"What! And help you to throw away a quarter of your fortune?"

"I shall have fifteen thousand pounds left, more than enough for the
requirements of any girl."

"I doubt if the wording of your father's will could give me the power
for a moment."

"I am sure it could. I am confident that in drawing his will he trusted
you absolutely and me absolutely. He often spoke to me about money, and
told me what a solemn trust riches were. He charged me like the man in
the parable not to bury my talent in a napkin, but to put it out to
usury. He said that he made you my guardian, because you were the most
unworldly-minded man he knew, and he told me many times that although he
could not give me absolute control of my money before I was twenty-one,
yet that no reasonable wish of mine would be refused by you."

"And you call this a reasonable wish?"

"I do. And so would my father if he were alive. Bring his face once
again before you, Rector, and you will agree with me."

The Rector sat down in his arm-chair, and shaded his eyes with one of
his long white hands. He sat for a long time motionless, and without
speaking. Beatrice stood by the mantelpiece; there was a small fire in
the grate; now and then a flame leaped up, and cast its reflection on
her face.

Suddenly the Rector started upright.

"What day is this?" he asked.

"Thursday--Thursday night."

"And you are to be married on Tuesday?"

"No, I may never marry. Nina Hart and Loftus Bertram are to be married
on Tuesday."

"God bless me! Beatrice, you have put me into a nice fix. Guardians are
not always to be envied. What's the hour, child?"

Beatrice glanced at the clock.

"It is half-past nine," she said.

"You say that this--this Miss Hart is staying at the Bells'?"

"Yes."

"I must go to her. I must see her to-night."

"Remember she is weak and ill. You will be gentle with her."

"Beatrice, am I as a rule rough with people? Come, I will see you home,
and then call on Miss Hart."




CHAPTER XXXI.

CIVIL WAR AT NORTHBURY.


It is often very difficult to trace Rumor to his foundation. His
beginning is sometimes as small as a particle of sand; the first dawning
of his existence as impalpable as the air.

From these small beginnings, however, rumor arises, strong as a giant,
cruel as death. Perhaps no foe has more injured mankind than idle rumor.

He was abroad now in the little town of Northbury, and no one quite knew
the exact place of his birth. A good many people traced his existence to
Hunt, the baker, who sold many loaves of bread, and many sweet and tasty
cakes by reason of his love of gossip--some people laid it to Miss
Peters' door, some to Mrs. Gorman Stanley's, some again to Mrs.
Morris's; but soon, in the excitement which the Giant Rumor caused,
people had no time to talk of the place of his birth--he was there, he
was among them, and he was the only subject now discussed.

A great many afternoon teas, and small social gatherings were given
during the next few days in his honor. As to the Bells' house it became
quite notorious. People paused as they passed the windows, and even the
paving stones round the time-worn steps were fraught with interest.

At the club the men talked of nothing but the story which was abroad.
They took the opportunity to make bets and wagers. Their tongues were
not so cruel as those of the women, but still their tongues did wag, and
there was more than one wife in the town who felt the effect of Beatrice
Meadowsweet's engagement for many a long day, because the father of the
family had jeopardized a considerable sum in a wager on the probable
issue of events.

When Rumor in his full magnitude gets abroad he never spares the young,
the beautiful, the innocent. Beatrice was loved by every one at
Northbury, but the inhabitants of this good, old-fashioned little town
would have been immaculate had they not said evil things of her now.

Sides were taken on the occasion, and the people of the town divided
themselves pretty equally, and in an incredibly short time started a
fierce sort of civil war. The "Beatricites," and the "Hartites," they
were called, and the war of tongues between them became so fierce that
long before Saturday night one party would not speak to another.

Mrs. Bell was at the head of the Hartites, and Mrs. Butler was the
general of the Beatrice army.

Mrs. Bell spoke in the following terms of the girl who had hitherto been
everybody's favorite:

"Ah, she's a deep one, is Beatrice Meadowsweet. You never know what
those quiet ones are till they are tried. I spoke to her, I warned her,
but she wouldn't listen. 'Beatrice,' I said, that young man cares no
more for you than he does for the blackberries on the hedges. Beatrice,
that young man's affections are given elsewhere.' Heed me, would she?
No, not she. But follow him she would, follow him from place to place,
out on the water in her boat, and at the Hector's garden party until it
was disgraceful to see. It's my firm belief she popped the question
herself, and we all know what followed. Poor Captain Bertram gave in for
a time, thinking of her fortune, which is none so great, if rumors are
correct, but love her, no, not he. Why, over and over and over he has
said as much to my child, Matty. Matty was stiff to him, I'll say that;
he was an audacious flirt, and he tried hard to bring Matty into a
scrape too, but would she encourage him? No, though she was persecuted
by his attentions, and now what's the result? Matty is honorably engaged
to a man who is a Bayard for knightliness, and that poor Beatrice is
jilted. Was she in hysterics in my house? Well, it isn't for me to say.
Did she go down on her knees to Captain Bertram, and wring his hand, and
kiss it and beg of him not to forsake her, with the tears streaming like
rain down her cheeks, and implore of him to give up his true love, who
was in a dead faint before their two eyes, and to be true to her who had
given her heart to him, neighbor, did these things happen in this very
house? You ask me that question, neighbor, and I say, answer it I won't,
for I'm a woman, and I have known that unfortunate, misguided girl and
her poor mother for years. Yes, neighbor, I cast a veil over what I
might say."

This was the sort of gossip spread by Mrs. Bell, who further praised up
Miss Hart, saying much about her beauty and her charms, and giving such
a ravishing account of Bertram's love for her, and her adoration for
him, that the neighbors who were on this side of the civil war crowned
Josephine Hart as their chosen queen on the spot.

Mrs. Butler, who led the van of the "Beatricites," was less voluble than
Mrs. Bell, but her words were weighted with a very deadly shaft of
poison. After Mrs. Butler had extolled Beatrice as a perfect model of
all womanly graces and virtue, she proceeded, with keen relish, to take
Josephine Hart to pieces. When she began to dissect Miss Hart she
invariably sent her innocent sister, Maria, out of the room. It is
unnecessary to repeat what passed behind the doors which were so cruelly
closed on eager and curious Miss Peters, but it is not too much to say
that poor Josephine had not a rag of character left to her when the good
woman's tongue ceased to wag.

Thus the town of Northbury was in a distressing state of uproar during
the three or four days which preceded Captain Bertram's wedding. And
perhaps the cruellest thing about this fierce civil war was that none of
the combatants, not even the leaders, knew what was really about to take
place, nor who was to be married to whom on Tuesday, nor whether there
was to be any wedding at all. The bridal dresses came home, and some of
the ladies wept when they looked at them. Beatrice still received
wedding presents, and the bridal robe of ivory-white silk trimmed with
quantities of Honiton lace was absolutely sent down from London, all
complete and ready for Beatrice to wear. Half the ladies in Northbury
rushed up to the station when the news was brought to them that the box
had arrived, and the porter, Payne by name, who carried the box to Mrs.
Meadowsweet's, was followed by quite a little mob.

Thus time went on apace, and Rumor did his work, each lady saying when
she met another:

"Well, what's the news? What's the latest? What did you hear last?"

Each Hartite bowed coldly to each Beatricite, or else cut each other
dead, and, in short, the usual symptoms which accompany civil war made
themselves felt.

It is a fact frequently noted that when Rumor, with his double-edged
tongue is abroad, the persons most concerned often know nothing of the
storm which is raging around them. In the present instance, two people
who were keenly interested in coming events were in this position. One
of them was Mrs. Meadowsweet, the other, Mrs. Bertram. The time would
come when Beatrice would confide in her mother, but that moment had not
yet arrived. The old lady wondered why she had so many visitors, and why
people looked at her in a curious, pitying sort of fashion. Why also
they invariably spoke of Beatrice as "poor dear," and inquired with
tender solicitude for her health.

"Brides usedn't to be 'poor deared' in my day," the old lady remarked
rather testily to her handmaiden, Jane. "Any one would suppose Beatrice
was going to have an illness instead of a wedding from the way folks
talk of her."

"Eh, well, ma'am," Jane replied.

Jane's "eh, well, ma'am" was as full of suppressed meaning as a balloon
is full of air. She heaved a prodigious sigh as she spoke, for of course
she had heard the gossip, and had indeed come to blows with a Hartite
that very morning.

"Eh, dear!" said Jane. "Rumor's a queer thing."

She did not vouchsafe any more, and Mrs. Meadowsweet was too innocent
and indolent and comfortable in her mind to question her.

The other person who knew nothing was Mrs. Bertram. Of all the people in
the world Mrs. Bertram was perhaps the most interested in that wedding
which was to take place on Tuesday. The wedding could scarcely mean more
to the bride and bridegroom than it did to her--yet no news of any
_contretemps_, of any little hitch in the all-important proceedings,
had reached her ears. For the last week she had taken steps to keep
Catherine and Mabel apart from all Northbury gossip. The servants at the
Manor who, of course knew everything did not dare to breathe a syllable
of their conjectures. The bravest Hartite and Beatricite would not have
dared to intrude their budgets of wild conjecture on Mrs. Bertram's
ears. Consequently she lived through these exciting days in comparative
calm. Soon the great tension would be over. Soon her gravest alarms
would be lulled to rest, Now and then she wondered that Beatrice was not
oftener at the Manor. Now and then she exclaimed with some vexation at
Mr. Ingram's extraordinary absence from home at such a time.

The Rector had gone to London, and a stranger took his pulpit on that
all-important Sunday before the wedding.

Mrs. Bertram wondered a little over these two points, but they did not
greatly disturb her;--Loftus was at home and Loftus looked strangely,
wildly happy.

Mrs. Bertram had been alarmed, and rendered vaguely uneasy by her son's
gloom a few days ago, but there was no shadow resting on the young man's
face now. He laughed, he talked, his eyes wore an exultant expression in
their fire and daring. He caressed his sisters, he hung over his
mother's chair, and kissed her.

"Ah, Loftie," she said once, "you are really and honestly in love. I
have had my doubts that you did not really appreciate our dear and noble
Beatrice. But your manner the last few days, your spirits, my son, your
all-evident happiness, have abundantly sent these doubts to rest. You
are in love with your future wife, and no wonder!"

"No wonder," echoed Loftus.

He had the grace to blush.

"Yes, I am in love," he said. "No one was ever more madly in love than I
am." Then after a pause he added: "And I think Beatrice, without
exception, the noblest and best woman on earth."

"That is right, my boy. Ah, Loftus, I am glad I could do one thing for
you. I have got you a wife whose price is above rubies."

Bertram laughed.

"You have made a feeble joke, mother," he said in some confusion. "I
should like to know to which you allude--Bee's money or her personal
charms."

"Both--both--you naughty boy Beatrice is all that could be desired in
herself, but in what position should you and I be in the future without
her money?"

"That is true," he said. And there was compunction in his voice.

On Monday morning two letters arrived at Northbury from the Rector. One
was to his housekeeper, the other to Beatrice.

To his housekeeper, Mrs. Matthews, he said:

"Go on with all the wedding preparations, and expect me home this
evening at six o'clock."

His letter to Beatrice was much longer.

"The time to reproach you, my dear ward, is past," began the Rector.
"And you must promise never in the future to reproach me. You are an
impulsive girl, and I may have done wrong to yield to your entreaties.
Your father's face, has, however, over and over flashed before my mental
vision, and the look in his eyes has comforted me. In one sense you are
a fool, Beatrice; in another, you are thrice blessed. Forgive this
little preamble. I have arranged matters as you wish. I shall be home
this evening. Come to me in my study at nine o'clock to-night, my dear
ward, and act in the meantime exactly as your true, brave heart
suggests."

Beatrice read this letter in her own room. She was quite mortal enough
to shed some tears over it, but when she sat opposite to her mother at
breakfast, her face was quite as jubilant as any young bride's might be,
who was so soon to leave home.

Mrs. Meadowsweet looked at her girl with great pride.

"You feature your father wonderfully, Bee," she said. "It isn't only the
Grecian nose, and the well-cut lips, and the full, straight kind of
glance in your eyes, but it's more. It's my belief that your soul
features Meadowsweet; he was ever and always the best of men. Crotchety
from uprightness he was, but upright was no word for him."

"Well, mother, I should like to resemble my father in that particular."

"Yes, my love, yes. Meadowsweet was always heights above me, and so are
you also, for that matter."

"That is not true, mother, you must not say it. It pains me."

Beatrice looked distressed. She went over to her old parent and kissed
her. Then she hastily left the room.

After breakfast Captain Bertram called at the Gray House.

He and Beatrice had a long interview, then she went to the Bells', and
sat with Miss Hart for about half-an-hour.

After dinner that day Bertram spoke to his mother: "Beatrice wants to
come up and see you. Can you receive her about six o'clock?"

"At any time, my dear son. But is she not dreadfully busy? Would it not
convenience her more if I went to her, Loftie?"

"No, mother, she would prefer to come here. She has"--here his face
turned pale--"she has a good deal to say to you--important things to
speak about." His voice trembled. "You will see her alone. You will not
hurry her. Beatrice is the best--the best girl in the world."

Bertram looked very pale when he said this.

"How strange you look, Loftus!" said his mother. "And your words are
very queer. Is anything the matter? Are you concealing any thing from
me?"

"Beatrice will tell you," he said. And he hurried out of the room.

A few minutes before six o'clock Beatrice arrived. Mrs. Bertram had
given directions that she was to be sent at once to her private room.
Clara had these instructions, and was about to carry them out literally
when Catherine and Mabel ran into the hall.

They greeted Beatrice with raptures, and Mabel said in an eager voice:

"We have not yet seen you in your bridal dress, Bee. You know it was an
old promise that we should see you in it the day before the wedding.
Don't stay long with mother, Bee. Catherine and I can walk back with
you, and you can try on your dress while we are by."

"My dress is all right," said Beatrice. "I have tried it; it fits. I
don't want to put it on to-night. I am tired."

Her face was pale, her expression anxious.

Mabel hung back and looked disappointed.

"But you promised," she began.

"Hush, Mabel," said Catherine. She hid quick intuitions, and she saw at
a glance that something was the matter.

"Bee would not break her promise if she could help it," she said to her
sister. "Don't you see that she looks very tired. Bee, shall I take you
to mother?"

"Yes, Catherine," replied Beatrice.

The two girls walked away together. As they mounted the stairs,
Catherine stole another glance at her friend. Then almost timidly she
put her hand through Beatrice's arm.

"To-morrow, Bee," she said, with a loving hug, "you will be _my_
real, real sister."

Beatrice stopped, turned round, and looked at Catherine.

"Kitty, I can't deceive you. I--love you, but I am not going to be
what--what you suppose."

"Then there is something wrong!" exclaimed Catherine. "I feared it from
my mother's face when I saw her an hour ago. Now I am sure. Bee, are you
going to fail us at the last moment? Oh, Beatrice, you have made him so
nice, and we have all been so happy, and mother has said more than once
to me, 'Beatrice Meadowsweet has saved us,' and now, just at the very
last, just at the very end, are you going to be a coward--a deserter?"

"No," said Beatrice. "I won't desert you. I won't fail you. It is given
to me to save your brother Loftus, to really save him. Don't be
frightened, Kitty. I have a hard task to go through. I have to say some
things to your mother which will try her. Yes, I know they will try her
much, but I am doing right, and you must help me, and be brave. Yes, you
must be brave because you know I am doing right."

"I will trust you, Beatrice," said Catherine. Her dark eyes shone, over
the pallor of her face there came a glow. She opened the door of her
mother's room.

"Here is Beatrice, mother. And may I--may I--stay too?"

"No, Kate, you are unreasonable. What a long time you have kept
Beatrice. She has been in the house for ten minutes. I heard you two
gossiping in the corridor. Girls are unreasonable, and they don't
understand that the impatience of the old is the worst impatience of
all. Go, Kate."

Catherine's eyes sought her friend's. They seemed to say mutely:

"Be good to her, Beatrice, she is my mother."

Then she closed the door behind the two.

People who have secrets, who find themselves hemmed into corners, who
live perpetually over graves of the dead past, are seldom quite free
from fear. Mrs. Bertram had gone through tortures during the last couple
of hours. When she was alone with Beatrice she seized her hands, and
drew her down to sit on the sofa by her side. Her eyes asked a thousand
questions, while her lips made use of some conventional commonplace.

Beatrice was after all an unsophisticated country girl. She had never
been trained in _finesse_; painful things had not come to her in
the past of her life, either to conceal or avoid. Now a terrible task
was laid upon her, and she went straight to the point.

Mrs. Bertram said: "You look tired, my dear future daughter."

Beatrice made no reply to this. She did not answer Mrs. Bertram's lips,
but responding to the hunger in her eyes, said:

"I have got something to tell you."

Then Mrs. Bertram dropped her mask.

"I feared something was wrong. I guessed it from Loftie's manner. Go on,
speak. Tell me the worst."

"I'm afraid I must give you pain."

"What does a chit like you know of pain? Go on, break your evil tidings.
Nay, I will break them for you. There is to be no wedding tomorrow."

"You are wrong. There is."

"Thank God. Then I don't care for anything else. You are a true girl,
Beatrice, you have truth in your eyes. Thank God, you are faithful. My
son will have won a faithful wife."

"I trust he will--I think he will. But--"

"You need not be over modest, child. I know you. I see into your soul.
We women of the world, we deep schemers, we who have dallied with the
blackness of lies, can see farther than another into the deep, pure well
of truth. I don't flatter you, Beatrice, but I know you are true."

"I am true, true to your son, and to you. But Mrs. Bertram, don't
interrupt me. In being true, I must give you pain."

Again Mrs. Bertram's dark brows drew together until they almost met. Her
heart beat fast.

"I am not very strong," she said, in a sort of suffocating voice. "You
are concealing something; tell it to me at once."

"I will. Can you manage not to speak for a moment or two?"

"Go on, child. Can I manage? What have I not managed in the course of my
dark life? Go on. Whatever you tell me will be a pin-prick, and I have
had swords in my heart."

"I am sorry," began Beatrice.

"Don't--do you suppose I care for a girl's sorrow! The sorrow of an
uncomprehending child? Speak."

"I have found out," said Beatrice, in a slow voice, "just through an
accident, although I believe God was at the bottom of it, something
which has saved me from committing a great wrong, which has saved your
son from becoming an absolute scoundrel, which has saved us both from a
life of misery."

"What have you found out, Beatrice?"

Mrs. Bertram's face was perfectly white; her words came out in a low
whisper.

"Beatrice, what have you discovered?"

"That Captain Bertram loves another, that another girl loves him, has
almost been brought to death's door because she loves him so well."

"Pooh, child, is that all? How you frightened me."

"Why do you speak in that contemptuous tone. The 'all' means a great
deal to Captain Bertram, and to me, and to the other girl."

"Beatrice, you are a baby. What young man of my son's age has not had
his likings, his flirtations, his heart affairs? If that is all--"

"It is all, it is enough. Your son has not got over his heart affair."

"Has he not? I'll speak to him. I'll soon settle that"

"Nor have I got over it."

"Beatrice, my dear girl, you really are something of a little goose.
Jealous, are you? Beatrice, you ask an impossibility when you expect a
young man never to have looked with eyes of affection on any one but
yourself."

"I will not marry the man who looks with eyes of affection at another."

"How you bewilder me, and yet, how childish you are. Must I argue this
question with you? Must I show you from my own larger experience how
attached Loftus is to you? Dear fellow, his very face shows it."

"I don't want you to teach me anything from your experience, Mrs.
Bertram. Captain Bertram does not love me. I do not love him; he loves
another. She has given him all her heart, all that she can give. He
shall marry her;--he shall marry her to-morrow."

Mrs. Bertram rose very slowly.

"Beatrice," she said. "Your meaning is at last plain to me. _Noblesse
oblige_. Ah, yes, that old saying comes true all the world over. You
have not the advantage of good birth. I thought--for a long time I
thought that you were the exception that proved the rule. You were the
lady made by nature's own hand. Your father could be a tradesman--a
_draper_--and yet have a lady for his daughter. I thought this,
Beatrice; I was deceived. There are no exceptions to that nobility which
only birth can bestow. You belong to the common herd, the
_canaille_. You cannot help yourself. A promise to one like you is
nothing. You are tired of Loftus. This is an excuse to get out of a
bargain of which you have repented."

"It is not."

Beatrice looked at Mrs. Bertram with eyes that blazed with anger. She
walked across the room, and rang the bell. Her ring was imperious. She
stood near the bell-pull until Clara, in some trepidation, obeyed the
summons.

"Is Captain Bertram downstairs?" asked Beatrice.

"I'll inquire, Miss Meadowsweet."

"I think he is. I think you'll find him in the study. Ask him to have
the goodness to come to Mrs. Bertram's room."

Clara withdrew. Beatrice began slowly to pace up and down the floor.

"I belong to the _canaille_," she murmured. "And my father--_my_ father
is taunted because he earned his bread in trade. Mrs. Bertram, I am glad
I don't belong to your set."

Beatrice had never been so angry in all her life before. The anger of
those who scarcely ever give way to the emotion has something almost
fearful about it. Mrs. Bertram was a passionate woman, but she cowered
before the words and manner of this young girl. She had taunted
Beatrice. The country girl now was taunting her, and she shrank away in
terror.

The door was opened, and Loftus Bertram came in. Beatrice went up to him
at once.

"I have prepared the way for you, Loftus," she said. "It is your turn
now to speak. Tell your mother the truth."

"Yes, my son."

Mrs. Bertram looked up in his face. Her look was piteous; it disarmed
Beatrice; her great anger fled. She went up to the poor woman, and stood
close to her.

"Speak, Loftus," she said. "Be quick, be brave, be true. Your mother
cannot bear much. Don't keep her in suspense."

"Go out of the room, Beatrice," said Loftus. "I can tell her best
alone."

"No, I shall stay. It is right for me to stay. Now speak. Tell your
mother who you really love."

"Go on, Loftus," said Mrs. Bertram, suddenly. "You love Beatrice
Meadowsweet. She angered me, but she is a true and good girl at heart.
You love her; she is almost your bride--say that you love her."

"She is the best girl I ever met, mother."

"There, Beatrice, does not that content you?" said Mrs. Bertram.

"Hush," said Beatrice. "Listen. He has more to say. Go on,
Loftus--speak, Captain Bertram. Is Josephine not worth any effort of
courage?"

"Josephine!" Mrs. Bertram clasped her hands.

Bertram stepped forward.

"Mother, I don't love Beatrice as I ought to love my wife. I do love
Josephine Hart, and she is to be my wife to-morrow morning."

"Josephine Hart!" repeated Mrs. Bertram. She looked round at Beatrice,
and a smile played all over her face--a fearful smile.

"My son says he loves Josephine Hart--Josephine--_and he will marry her_!"

She gave a laugh, which was worse than any cry, and fell insensible on
the floor.




CHAPTER XXXII.

THE NIGHT BEFORE THE WEDDING.


Mrs. Meadowsweet wondered why Beatrice did not come home. It was the
night before the wedding. Surely on that night the bride ought to come
early to sleep under her mother's roof.

Mrs. Meadowsweet had a good deal to say to her girl. She had made up her
mind to give her a nice little domestic lecture. She thought it her duty
to reveal to her innocent Beatrice some of the pitfalls into which young
married girls are so apt to fall.

"Jane," she said to her handmaid, "Miss Beatrice is late."

"Eh, so she is," responded Jane. Jane was a woman of very few words. Her
remarks generally took the form of an echo. Mrs. Meadowsweet thought her
a very comfortable kind of body to confide in. Jane was taking away the
supper things.

"We were married ourselves, Jane, and we know what it means," continued
Mrs. Meadowsweet.

Jane was a widow--her husband had been a drunkard, and she had gone
through a terrible time with him.

She shook her head now with awful solemnity.

"We do that," she said. "It's an awful responsibility, is marriage--it's
not meant for the young."

"I don't agree with you there, Jane. How could elderly people bring up
their families?"

"It's not meant for the young," repeated Jane. "It's a careful thing,
and a troubling thing and a worreting thing is marriage, and it's not
meant for the young. Shall I leave the peaches on the table, ma'am, and
shall I make fresh cocoa for Miss Beatrice when she comes in?"

"Make the cocoa with all milk, Jane, it's more supporting. I always made
it a rule to sustain Beatrice a good deal. She wears herself out--she's
a great girl for wearing herself out, and it's my duty in life to repair
her. I used to repair her poor father, and now I repair her. It seems to
me that a woman's province in life is to repair--first the husband, and
then the children. Jane, I was thinking of giving Beatrice a little
lecture to-night on the duties that lie before her."

"Good sakes, ma'am, I'd leave her alone. She'll find out her worrits
fast enough."

"I don't agree with you, Jane. It seems to me as if the whole of a
married woman's bliss consists in this--be tidy in your dress, don't
answer back, and give your husband a good dinner. That's what I did--I
repaired Meadowsweet, and I never riled him, and we hadn't a word, no,
not a word."

"All aren't like your blessed husband, Mrs Meadowsweet. Well, ma'am,
I'll go now and get the milk on for the cocoa."

She left the room, and Mrs. Meadowsweet sat on by the fire.

Presently there came a ring to the front door bell. Mrs. Meadowsweet
started up. Bee had some--no, it wasn't Bee--it was Mrs. Morris.

Her bronchitis was almost gone to-night; her voice was high, sharp and
quick.

"Well, my poor friend, and how are you?" she said.

"I wish you wouldn't call me your poor friend, Jessie," answered Mrs.
Meadowsweet, with almost irritation. "I don't know what has come to the
good folks here of late--'Poor dearing,' and 'poor friending' till I'm
sick of the sound of it. When I was married, people didn't look like
boiled vinegar over it; neighbors were chirpy and cheery about a wedding
in those days."

Mrs. Morris made no reply at all to this tirade. She sat down solemnly,
and looked around her.

"Is Beatrice in?" she asked.

"No, she's not; she went to the Manor some hours ago--I'm expecting my
girl back every minute. I've several things to say to her when she does
come in, so you won't take it amiss, Jessie, if I ask you not to stay."

"No, my dear neighbor, I won't take anything amiss, from you at present,
only, if I were you, I wouldn't worry Beatrice with advice to-night. Yon
have time enough for that. Time and to spare for that, poor dear."

"There you are with your 'poor dear,' again, Jessie. Now whose ring is
that at the bell? Oh, it's Bee, of course; come back at last, my girl
has. Well, Jessie Morris, I wish you good-night."

"Stay a minute, neighbor--that isn't Bee's voice." The door was opened,
and Miss Peters came in.

"How are you, Mrs. Meadowsweet," she said, running up to the good lady
and giving her a kiss, which resembled the peck of an eager bird, on her
cheek. "I ran on first, and Martha is following. I came to know how you
are, and how you're bearing up--and is Beatrice in?"

"I do declare," said Mrs. Meadowsweet. She rose from her easy-chair.
"You mean to be good-natured, neighbors, but really you're enough to
deave one. How am I bearing up? Am I the woman to bring ill-luck to my
child by crying at her wedding? No, she's not in--she's at the Bertrams.
But there's her ring now at the hall-door. Good-night, neighbors both.
You mean it kindly, but don't stay just now. I have a word or two to say
to the girl in private to-night."

"I think that's Martha's voice," said Miss Peters. "Don't say that I
told you anything, Mrs. Meadowsweet."

The door was opened, and Mrs. Butler came in.

This good woman, who led the army of the Beatricites, had now attained
to all the airs of a victorious general. Her bonnet-strings were thrown
back, her face was flushed, and her throat, conspicuous by the absence
of her large white brooch, was bared to view.

"Well, my friend," she said. "Well, the time is near."

She took Mrs. Meadowsweet's fat hand, squeezed it hard, and looked with
awful solemnity into her eyes.

"Good gracious," said the poor woman. "I never felt more exasperated in
all my life. Any one would suppose that my girl was drowned in the
harbor from the faces you one and all bring me."

"Mrs. Meadowsweet," said Mrs. Butler, "there is such a thing as having
the body safe and well, and the character drowned."

Mrs. Meadowsweet's cheeks flushed deeply.

"I'll thank you to explain yourself, Martha Butler," she said. "Whose
character is drowned?"

"No one's," said Mrs. Butler. "Or at least, no one who belongs to us."

Here she waved one of her arms in theatrical style.

"I have fought for that girl," she said, "as my sister Maria can bear
testimony, and my friend Mrs. Morris can vouch---I have fought for her,
and I may truly say I have brought her through a sea of slander--yes,
through a sea of slander--victorious. Now, who's that? Who's coming to
interrupt us?"

"It's only me, Mrs. Butler," said Beatrice. She came quietly into the
room. Her face was white, but its expression was serene, and almost
happy.

"It's you, Bee, at last," said her mother.

She went straight up to the girl, and taking one of her hands raised it
to her lips.

"You have come, Bee," she said in a purring cone of delight and content.
"My girl has come at last, neighbors, and now I'll wish you, every one,
a very good-night. I'm obliged for all sympathy, and if I don't
understand these new-fashioned ways about weddings with their poor
dears, and their poor friends, and drowning of somebody's character, and
saving of somebody else's character, it's because I'm old-fashioned, and
belong to an ancient school. Good-night, friends. Is that you, Jane?"

Jane appeared, bearing in a cup of cocoa for Beatrice.

"Jane, show these ladies out."

They all went. They hated to go, but they went, for the mantle of
innocence and ignorance in which Mrs. Meadowsweet was so securely
wrapped gave her a certain dignity which they could not resist. Jane
shut the door on them, and they stood still outside the house, and
wrangled, and talked, and worked themselves into a perfect rage of
excitement and curiosity and longing. "Well, well, all surmises would
soon be at rest. Who would win, Beatrice or Josephine? Who would be
to-morrow's bride."

"Mother," said Beatrice, when the ladies had left--she looked into her
old mother's face. There was an expression in her eyes which made Mrs.
Meadowsweet cry out:

"Bee, you have got a hunger at your heart. Oh, child, you want your
mammy--I never saw that look in your eyes since long, long ago, when you
were a little tot, and wanted your mammy more than anything else in all
the wide world."

"I want her now," said Beatrice.

She put her arms about her mother, and wept on her shoulder.




CHAPTER XXXIII.

THE MORNING OF THE WEDDING.


Beatrice had seen Mr. Ingram. She had gone to him, but not to stay.

"You must go to Mrs. Bertram's," she said; "she has a trouble on her
mind. Get her to tell it to you. She will be better afterwards. She
fears much. I guess a little of what she fears. She does not know that
by to-morrow night all her anxieties will be over."

"And the wedding is really to take place in the morning, Beatrice?"

"Really and truly. I will be present as bride's-maid, not as bride."

Beatrice went home, and Mr. Ingram hastened to the Manor.

There was much confusion there. Mrs. Bertram was very ill; she would not
see her daughters, she would allow no doctor to be summoned. Mabel was
crying in the drawing-room. Catherine was pacing up and down the
corridor outside her mother's room.

The Rector came. Bertram saw him for a few moments alone; then he went
into Mrs. Bertram's room. He stayed with her for some hours; it was long
past midnight when he left her. Catherine and Mabel had gone to bed, but
Bertram met the Rector outside his mother's door.

"Come home with me," said Mr. Ingram; "I have a message to give you. I
have something to say."

"How is my mother, sir?"

"She is better,--better than she has been for years--she will sleep
now--she has carried a heavy burden, but confession has relieved it. She
has sent you a message; come to my house, and I will give it to you."

The Rector and Bertram went quickly back to the cozy Rectory study. Mr.
Ingram began his story at once.

"Have you any early recollections?" he asked. "Cast your memory back.
What are the first things you can recall?"

Bertram raised his eyebrows in astonishment.

"I was born in India," he said; "I was sent home when I was little more
than a baby."

"You don't remember your Indian life, nor your--your--father?"

"Of course I remember my father, sir. I was over twenty when he died."

"Ah, yes, your reputed father. You cannot possibly recall, you have no
shadowy remembrance of another who bore the name?"

"Good God, Mr. Ingram! what do you mean?"

"Have you any memory? Answer me."

"No, sir, not the faintest. Is this a dream?"

"My poor lad, I don't wonder that you are staggered. Your mother could
not bring herself to tell you. She has borne much for your sake,
Bertram; you must be tender to her, gentle. She committed sin, she has
gone through terrible hours for you. She was wrong, of course; but her
motive--you must respect her motive, Loftus Bertram."

"I am in a dream," said Bertram. "General Bertram not my father! Whose
son am I then? What is my name? Who am I? Good God, sir, speak! Get me
out of this horrible nightmare."

"Bertram, I have a good deal to tell you. You have a very strange story
to hear. You must listen as quietly as you can. You must take in the
facts as well as you can. The story concerns you deeply--you and
another."

"Do you mean my mother?"

"No, I mean Josephine Hart."

"Josephine? This story concerns Josephine. Rector, my brain is
whirling."

"Sit down, keep still, listen."

Bertram restrained his impatience with an effort. He sank into a chair;
in a moment he rose to his feet.

"I can't keep still," he said. "This story concerns Nina. Does my mother
know Nina?"

"I will tell you the whole story, Bertram; I will tell it briefly, and
you must listen with patience. You must remember, as you hear, that the
woman who played this sorry part is your mother, that she did the wrong
out of mistaken love for you, that she has suffered bitterly for her
sin."

"Go on, sir; I am listening."

"Remember that the story is about your mother."

"I don't forget."

The Rector poured out a glass of water from a jug which stood on the
table, drank it off, and began to speak.

"Your mother, Bertram, was twice married. Her first husband--my poor
boy, I am sorry for you--was a scoundrel, a thief, a blackleg. He died
in prison. You are his son. Your father died in a Bombay prison; you
were in England at the time."

"Stop, sir," said Bertram. "What was my--my--what was the name of the
man to whom I owe my being?"

"Your mother has not told me. She says she will never reveal his name.
She says that your stepfather gave you legally the name of Bertram.
That, at least, need never be disturbed."

"Then Catherine and Mabel are not my sisters."

"They are your half-sisters; that is a small matter."

"True. Everything in the world is a small matter in comparison with the
awful fact that I am the son of a felon."

"I am deeply pained for you, Bertram. Your mother knew how this would
strike home. Hence her sin."

"I forgot. I have to hear of that. Go on, Mr. Ingram."

"At the time of your father's death she was, she tells me, a very
beautiful young woman. She was alone and peculiarly defenceless; Major
Bertram, he was a Major at the time, made her acquaintance in Calcutta.
You will be startled, Bertram, at the way in which these two made
friends. She was asked to take care of Major Bertram's baby daughter."

"Then he, too, was married before."

"Yes, he had a young wife, who died when the baby was born. Little Nina
was six months old when Major Bertram, who had to accompany his regiment
up the country, asked your mother to look after her."

"Nina, did you say Nina, Mr. Ingram?"

"Yes. I need not conceal from you who that Nina was."

Bertram covered his face with his hands.

"I can't bear this," he said. "This story unmans me."

"You must listen. I am making the narrative as brief as possible. Your
mother tells me that when the baby was given to her to care for she
meant to be very good to it. She was miserable at the time, for her
sorrows with and about your father had almost maddened her. She was good
to the child, and very glad of the money which the Major paid her for
giving the little creature a home. She kept the baby for some months,
nearly a year; and whenever he could Major Bertram called to see her.
Soon the meaning of his visits dawned upon her. He had fallen in love
with her. He was, in all respects, a desirable husband; he was of good
family; his antecedents were honorable, his own life stainless. She
thought of you, she was always thinking about you, you were at a poor
little school in England. She thought what your lot might be, if you
were really the son of this honorable man. She tells me that at this
time her love for you was like a terrible passion within her. Beyond all
things in the world she dreaded your learning your father's history--she
shuddered as she fancied your baby lips asking her artless questions
which she could never answer. Your father's name was, alas, notorious.
Bearing that name, you must one day learn the history of your father's
ruin, disgrace, dishonor."

"Mr. Ingram," said Bertram, "you are crushing me. How much more must you
say about my--my father?"

"Nothing more. I had to say this much to explain your mother's motive.
One day Major Bertram called to see her. He was going away. Before he
left he asked her to marry him. She refused. He persisted. She told him
her history. He said he knew it already. Then she put off her decision.
He might speak to her again on his return to Calcutta. It was during
Major Bertram's absence that the temptation which led to your mother's
sin came to her.

"Little Josephine was now between a year and two years old. On her
mother's side she was of low birth. Major Bertram had married beneath
him. He had fallen desperately in love with the beautiful daughter of a
strolling minstrel. He had married her, found out his mistake when too
late, but still, being a chivalrous and honorable man, had done his duty
by his ignorant young wife; had never allowed her to guess at his
feelings; and after her death had been filled with compunction for not
loving her more, and had done everything he could to secure the welfare
of their child.

"One person, however, he forbade the premises; with one individual he
would have nothing to do. That person was his wife's father. From the
moment he laid his young wife in her grave, he ignored the very
existence of Hart. Your mother tells me, Bertram, that Hart was in all
particuars a disreputable person. He was nothing but a needy adventurer,
and he only approached Major Bertram to sponge on him.

"During the Major's absence your mother thought long and seriously of
his proposals for her; the more she thought of them, the more desirable
did they seem. She thought of herself in the sheltered position of a
good man's wife. Above all, she thought of you. This marriage might save
you. Suppose Major Bertram, for love of her, consented to adopt you as
his son, to give you his name, and to present you to the world as his
own lawful child. She thought this might be done; and the only
difficulty in the way was the little bright-eyed, fair-haired Nina.

"Your mother did not wish to return to England calling Hart's
granddaughter her child. She said she had an insuperable objection and
repugnance to the idea, and an aversion for the poor little creature
began to grow up in her mind."

Bertram, who had sat during the greater part of this recital with his
hand shading his eyes, now started up with an impatient and distressed
exclamation. The Rector looked at him, sighed heavily, and said in a
voice of sympathy:

"My poor boy, this is a very hard story for you to listen to."

"Go on, Mr. Ingram," said Bertram. "Get it over quickly; that is all I
have to ask you."

"While these thoughts were troubling your mother," continued the Rector,
"she was one day surprised by a visit from Hart. He said he had come to
see his grandchild; and he took little Nina in his arms and kissed her.
Your mother says she scarcely knows how it was, but she and Hart began
to talk about the child, and both simultaneously revealed to the other
his and her real feelings.

"Hart hated Major Bertram, and would like to do him an injury. Your
mother had no love for Nina. I nead not lengthily describe this
interview. Suffice it to say that they made a plot between them. It was
a bad plot. I am sorry to have to use this word to a son about any act
of his mother's, but the truth must be told at all hazards. The plot was
bad, bad at the time, bad subsequently.

"Your mother arranged to give Nina to her grandfather. She would pay him
for delivering her from the child. After receiving his bribe Hart was to
leave that part of India at once, When the Major returned your mother
would tell him that the child was lost. That she feared her grandfather
Hart had stolen her. She would help Major Bertram to make inquiries.
These inquiries, she would arrange beforehand, should turn out useless,
for Hart was one of those clever individuals, who, when necessary, could
hide all trace of his existence.

"Your mother sold some jewellery to raise the necessary money for Hart.
He came the next day and carried off the child. Major Bertram returned.
He believed your mother's story, he was wild with grief at the loss of
his child, and did everything in his power to recover her. In vain. Your
mother and Hart were too clever for him.

"After a time he renewed his proposals to your mother. She made her
conditions. You were to be acknowledged as his son.

"Soon after their marriage they returned to England, and Major Bertram
retired from foreign service. His friends received them. The old story
was never raked up. No suspicion attached to your mother. All the world
believed you to be Major Bertram's son. No plot could have turned out
better, and your mother rejoiced in her success.

"Her daughters were born, and she began to consider herself the happiest
of living beings. The serpent, however, which she fondly thought killed,
was once more to awake and torment her. She got a letter from Hart, who
was then in Egypt. Nina was not dead, she was alive, and strong, and
handsome. He would bring her back to her father and all the past would
be known, if Mrs. Bertram did not buy his silence at a price.

"For some years after this letter she had to keep the old man quiet with
money. Then suddenly, with no apparent reason, he ceased to trouble her.
She believed that his silence was caused by Nina's death. She assured
herself that the child must be dead, and once more her outward
prosperity brought her happiness.

"Your father died, and his will was read. There was a codicil to his
will which only his wife and the solicitors knew about. It was briefly
to the effect that if by any chance the child of his first marriage was
recovered, and her identity proved, she was to inherit one-half of his
personal estate. He left her this large share of his property as
compensation for the unavoidable neglect he had shown her all her life,
and also in sorrow for having ever confided her to the care of another.

"That codicil tortured your mother's proud spirit. She felt that her
husband had never really forgiven her for allowing his child to be
stolen while under her care. Still she believed that the child now was
dead.

"Her hour of terrible awakening came. Hart had returned to England. A
couple of months ago he wrote to her here. Knowing that Nina's father
was dead he had gone to Somerset House, paid a shilling and read a copy
of the will. From that moment your mother knew no peace. Hart had all
the necessary letters to prove Nina's identity. He had a copy of her
baptismal certificate, and of the registration of her birth. Mrs.
Bertram had now to bribe the old man heavily. She did so. She gave him
and Nina a third of her income. Wretched, miserable, defiant, she yet
hoped against hope. To-night, for the first time, she tasted despair."

The Rector ceased to speak. Bertram began to pace the floor.

"I can't forgive my mother," he said, at last. "I shall marry Josephine
to-morrow morning and take her away, but I never want to see my mother
again."

"Then she will die. She is weak now, weak and crushed. If you refuse
your forgiveness you will have her death to answer for. I don't
exonerate your mother's sin, but I do plead for your mercy. She sinned
to shield and save you. You must not turn from her. Are you immaculate
yourself?"

"I am not, Mr. Ingram. I am in no sense of the word good. I have been
extravagant, reckless, I have been untruthful. I have caused my mother
many a pang, and she has invariably been an angel of goodness and
kindness to me. But her cruelty to Nina cuts me like a sword, and I
cannot forgive her."

The Rector went over to the window, drew up the blinds, and looked out.

"Come here," he said to the young man. "Do you see that faint light in
the east?"

"Yes, sir, the day is breaking."

"The day of your wedding, and of your new life. To-day you realize what
true love means. You take the hand of the girl who is all the world to
you, and you promise to love and reverence and defend her. To-day you
put away the past life. You rise out of the ashes of the past, and put
on manliness, and honor, and those virtues which good men prize, like an
armor, Beatrice tells me you have promised her all this."

"Beatrice--God bless Beatrice:" Bertram's eyes were misty. "I will be a
good husband, and a true man," he said with fervor. "I have been a
wretch in the past, and with God's help I'll show Nina, and Beatrice
too, what stuff they have made of me. I'll be a true man for their
sakes. But my mother--Mr. Ingram, you have given me a cruel shock on my
wedding morning."

"Bertram, all that you have said to me now will end in failure, will
wither up like the early dew if you cherish hard feelings towards your
mother. Did she ever cherish them to you? What about that bill she had
to meet? That bill would have ruined her."

"Beatrice met the bill."

"Had there been no Beatrice?"

Bertram turned his head away.

"I have been a scoundrel," he said at last.

The Rector laid his hand on his arm.

"You have been something uncommonly like it, my dear fellow. And the
spirit of revenge does not sit well on you. Come, your mother is
waiting. Change her despair to peace. Say some of the good things you
have said to me to her, and the blessing of God will descend on you,
Bertram, and on the young girl whom you will call your wife to-day. Give
me your hand. Come."

Bertram went.




CHAPTER XXXIV.

THE BRIDE!


Miss Peters was lying in sound slumber, and Mrs. Butler, with a wet
sponge in her hand, was standing over the little spinster's bed.

"Maria," she said, in her sharp voice. And at the same moment the sponge
descended with unerring aim on the sleeper's upturned face.

"Good heavens--fire--water! What is it?--I'm drowning--" gasped Miss
Peters.

She raised her eyes, choked, for her mouth had been open, and some of
the contents of the sponge had got in, and then surveyed her sister in
trepidation.

"Oh, Martha, it's you. How you frightened me!"

"I only applied the sponge," replied Mrs. Butler. "It's an old-fashioned
remedy for inordinate drowsiness, and effectual."

"But surely, surely--I feel as if I had only just dropped to sleep."

"Maria, it's five o'clock."

"Five! What do you mean, Martha? Am I to be accused of inordinate
sleepiness at five in the morning?"

"On this morning you are. This is the wedding morning--get up, dress
yourself. Put on your bridal finery, and join me in the parlor."

Mrs. Butler left the room. Miss Peters rubbed her sleepy eyes again.

"The wedding morning! and my bridal finery!" she murmured. "One would
think poor Sam had never been drowned. I don't think Martha has any
heart. She knows how I suffered about Sam. He certainly never proposed
for me, but he was attentive--yes, he was attentive, and I--I suffered.
It's thirty years now since he was drowned. Martha oughtn't to forget.
People have no memories in these days."

The little lady began to put on her garments.

"It does seem extraordinarily early to have to get up, even though Bee
is to be married at eleven o'clock to-day," she murmured. "Certainly,
Martha is a most masterful person. Well, I don't mind so much, as it is
for Bee's sake."

Miss Peters proceeded with her toilet, took tenderly out of its folds of
camphor and white linen, a little antiquated brown silk dress, put it
on, crossed over her shoulders a neat fichu of white lace, mounted her
bonnet, composed of a piece of silk, which she had artfully removed from
the skirt of her dress. This bonnet was trimmed with three enormous
lemon-colored chrysanthemums, and was further embellished with a pink
ruching, which surrounded the good lady's face.

Miss Peters almost trembled as she placed this exquisite head-dress over
her scanty locks. The moment the bonnet was on, she became conscious of
an immense amount of moral support. In that bonnet she could even defy
Mrs. Butler.

"Nothing gives a lady such a nice feeling as being properly dressed,"
she murmured. "I am glad I went to the expense of a bit of pink silk to
make this ruching. It is wonderfully soft, and becoming, too. I hope
Martha won't object to the chrysanthemums. I chose the largest Perry had
in his shop on purpose, in order not to be accused of aping youth. Now,
my parasol, my gloves, my handkerchief. Oh, and my fan. I'm sure to
flush a little when I see that dear child being given away. Now I'm
quite ready. It certainly is an extraordinarily early hour to be dressed
for a wedding, which is not to take place till eleven o'clock."

"Maria!" screamed Mrs. Butler's voice. "If you're not quick, you'll not
have time to swallow your coffee."

"Dear, dear!" exclaimed Miss Peters, "is Martha's head going? I have not
been half-an-hour dressing; can she have mistaken the hour?"

The little spinster ran downstairs.

"Here I am, Martha. Really I--"

"Not a word, Maria. Sit down at once, and drink off your coffee. You can
munch a bit of bread in your hand as we go along."

"But, Martha, it is not six o'clock yet."

"What of that? We have not a moment to lose. There'll be crowds at the
church. I am given to understand it will be packed, and as I intend to
have a front seat, I'm going now."

Miss Peters began to count on her fingers.

"But Martha, it surely is not necessary."

"Now, Maria, that's enough. You'd argue any one black in the face. I
don't often have my way, but I'll have it on this occasion. I am going
to call for Mrs. Gorman Stanley; and Mrs. Morris asked me to knock her
up, and we'll all of us just be at the church in good time."

"In good time," gasped Miss Maria. "But the doors won't be opened."

"Oh, won't they! You just wait and see. I haven't fought that girl's
battles for nothing. We'll be able to get into the church, Maria, don't
you fear. I have made friends as well as foes of late, and there are
these who can get me into the church, so that I may stand up for
Beatrice to the last. Now, have you swallowed your coffee?"

"I have. It has scalded my throat frightfully. I hate drinking hot
liquid in such a hurry."

"Maria, you are dreadfully fractious this morning. And, good gracious
me! What have you got in your bonnet! Here let me hold up the candle and
look."

"Don't--don't drop the grease on my brown silk, Martha."

"Brown fiddlestick! Hold your head steady. Well--I never! The vanity of
some folk! The apings of some people. Oh, I haven't a word to say if you
like to make a show of yourself. I respect my years. I live up to them.
Some people, I won't name who--don't."

"Had I better take off the bonnet, Martha? I thought these very
_large_ chrysanthemums--I chose them on purpose--"

"Hideous--you're a perfect fright! Look at me. Is there anything to
laugh at in my velvet bonnet? Does it poke itself on the back of my
head? And does it deck itself in pink and yellow?"

"It looks funereal, Martha, it's all black."

"Funereal! It looks suitable. Come on, or we'll be late."

The two ladies left the house. They walked quickly in the early morning
light. Presently, they were joined by Mrs. Gorman Stanley. She was
completely clothed in bridal garments of yellow. Her robe was yellow
satin, her bonnet was to match, with blue forget-me-nots cozily nestling
in its folds. Mrs. Morris joined the group in terra-cotta cashmere, with
a cream lace bonnet. Round her face and mouth she had enveloped a black
woollen shawl, but this was to be discarded presently.

As the ladies walked to the church they were joined by several more
Beatricites, and when at last they found themselves under the shadow of
the old tower, and in the shelter of the ancient porch, they were quite
a goodly company.

"We'll just fill the front seats comfortably," said Mrs. Butler. "When
Mrs. Bell and her Hartites arrive they'll have to go behind."

"But how are we to get in?" again questioned Miss Maria.

"Oh, I'll manage that. I have it all arranged. I spoke to Hunt
yesterday."

Hunt was not only the baker, he was the church verger. He had quite
sympathized with Mrs. Butler's wishes, while selling her a two-penny
loaf yesterday. But why did he not put in an appearance now?

"Martha," again whispered Miss Maria, "Who are those people creeping
round there by the south wall?"

"No one," snapped Mrs. Butler. "You're fanciful this morning, Maria.
It's those horrid lemon-colored chrysanthemums; they have turned your
head."

"I don't know about that," retorted Miss Peters. "I am sure I saw Mrs.
Bell's snuff-colored bonnet."

Mrs. Butler sniffed. She would not retort again; but she was conscious
of a little sense of uneasiness. It was difficult, even for a person as
blind as she considered her sister Maria, to mistake that snuff-colored,
drawn silk bonnet, ornamented with a huge bow in front of pale blue
ribbon. That bonnet was celebrated. It had been worn by Mrs. Bell in
season and out of season for many long years; it had been altered in
shape; it had been turned. Sometimes the bow which filled up the gap in
front was yellow, sometimes red, sometimes mauve. But every one in the
town knew that for the wedding the bow on Mrs. Bell's bonnet was to be
a delicate and bridal blue. This was to be her sole wedding adornment.
To the length of purchasing that bow she had gone, and no further.
Therefore now Mrs. Butler felt uncomfortable. If the Hartites secured
the front seats in church she would have to own to defeat and
humiliation. Was Hunt--could Hunt be faithless? He was known to be
something of a toady, something of a Sergeant Eitherside, a Vicar of
Bray sort of individual. To all appearance Hunt was a sworn Beatricite,
but if by any chance he had heard something in favor of the Hartites,
he was just the man to go over to them.

"There are about ten or twenty people with Mrs. Bell," said Miss Maria.
"I'm sure that's Mrs. Bell. Yes, that _is_ her bonnet."

She raised herself on tip-toe, clutching hold of Mrs. Morris's arm as
she did so.

"It's freezing cold standing by this door," said Mrs. Morris, shivering.
"I'll have an awful attack after this. Poor Beatrice, she'll cause my
death."

"Keep the shawl well over your mouth," said Mrs. Gorman Stanley.
"Really, Mrs. Butler, it is extraordinary that no one comes to open the
door."

"Hunt is faithless," proclaimed Mrs. Butler. "Maria, listen to me. Never
as long as I live will I buy bread from Hunt again. I'll eat Coffin's
bread in future."

"Oh, Maria, it's so musty."

"Fiddle dumpling. Hunt is certainly faithless. Maria, do you think you
could squeeze yourself through an open window?"

"I don't, Martha," replied Miss Peters; "and, what's more, I won't. I
have got my best brown silk on. Where am I to get another silk? Ah,"
with a sigh of infinite relief, "here is Hunt."

The baker, who was red in the face, and had a somewhat nervous manner,
now appeared. He came by a sidewalk which led directly from the vestry.

"I beg your pardon, ladies," he apologized; "I overslept myself, and
that's a fact. Now the floors are open--find your places, ladies."

Hunt vanished, and Mrs. Butler led her party into the sacred edifice.
The light was still faint in the old church, and at first the good lady
could not see very plainly. When she did, however, she beheld a sight
which petrified her. As she and her party hurried up one aisle, she
perceived Mrs. Bell and her party rushing up the other. There was not a
moment to lose. It is disgraceful to have to relate it, but there was
almost a scuffle in the church. In short, the two generals met opposite
the front pews. There was a scramble for seats. The Beatricites and the
Hartites got mixed up in the most confusing manner, and finally Mrs.
Butler and Mrs. Bell found themselves side by side and crushed very
close together in a small space.

Some awful hours followed. Mrs. Butler deliberately placed her back to
Mrs. Bell. Mrs. Bell talked at Mrs. Butler in a loud whisper to a
neighbor at the other side. Poor Miss Peters fanned herself violently.
Mrs. Morris's breathing became so oppressed that it was audible; and in
short, all these good ladies who had got up hours before their rightful
time were as uncomfortable and cross as they well could be. But the
longest time passes at last. From six to seven went by, from seven to
eight, from eight again to nine. The waiting was awful. By degrees,
without quite knowing it, Mrs. Bell was forced to lean against Mrs.
Butler for support. By half-past nine she ventured to say to her
neighbor:

"This waiting is intolerable."

"Vile," snapped Mrs. Butler, in response.

By ten o'clock the opposing generals were sharing the same footstool. By
a quarter-past ten they were both nodding.

It was about that hour that Hunt in his position as verger once more
appeared. The church doors were opened to the community at large, the
bells began to ring out a merry and bridal peal, and the inhabitants of
the town, the rich and poor alike, filed into the church.

Mrs. Butler was right. Long before eleven o'clock the building was
packed. Mrs. Bell was also right. She communicated this fact to Mrs.
Butler, who nodded in response. Both ladies chuckled over their
individual sagacity.

All the side aisles of the church began to fill. It was really an
imposing spectacle. The weary inmates of the front pews felt they were
reaping their rewards.

At a quarter to eleven some of the bridal guests appeared on the scene.
Those who had been especially invited by the Bertram family were
magnificently attired, and occupied one or two seats reserved for them.

Then the bride's-maids came. They stood in groups near the door, waiting
to follow the bride to her place at the altar.

Mrs. Bell turned her flushed face; looked down the church, and nodded to
her girls. She thought she had never seen anything so heavenly as the
vision of her Matty in her bride's-maid's costume. Her heart swelled so
with exultation, that she could not help confiding some of her feelings
to Mrs. Butler.

"Pooh, you're a goose!" nodded back this good woman. But a slow smile
stole over her face as she said the words.

The moments flew on. The organist took his place at the organ, the choir
boys filed into their places.

At the end of the church the bride's-maids looked nervously around. Had
any one listened very attentively they might have heard Matty Bell's
titter.

A thrill went through the waiting crowds. The bridegroom had appeared;
he was accompanied by a strange youth, a young officer from his
regiment. He walked slowly up the church, and took his place before the
altar.

Bertram looked so handsome at this moment, so pale, so dignified, that
every woman in the church fell in love with him. Miss Peters sighed
audibly, and even shed a tear for the memory of that Sam, who had never
proposed for her, but had been attentive, and had died thirty years ago.

Matty Bell felt quite a little tumult in her heart. No, no, whatever her
mother might say her Bayard was not like Beatrice's Bayard. She did not
even want to look at her Gusty this moment.

Bertram stood before the altar and waited.

_The bride!_

There was a little buzz through the church. All the occupants of the
pews rose; all heads were turned towards the door. In the excitement of
the moment the Beatricites clasped the Hartites by the hands, Mrs.
Bell's fat fingers rested on Mrs. Butler's shoulder.

The bride! She had come. Beatrice would marry Loftus Bertram. The
Beatricites would conquer. Slander would die.

No, no. What was the matter? What was wrong? Was anything wrong?

A girl dressed in shimmering bridal clothes was walking up the church.
A very slender and very pale girl. She was leaning on Mr. Ingram's arm;
she was beautiful. There was an expression on her face which melted
hearts, and made eyes brim over with tears. A bride was coming up the
church--not Beatrice Meadowsweet--not the girl who was beloved by all
the town.

Close behind the bride followed the principal bride's-maid. She was in a
plain dress of white. Round her head she wore a wreath of white lilies,
and in her hand she carried a bouquet of white flowers.

The other bride's-maids wore green silk sashes, and green with the
marguerites which trimmed their broad hats.

"May God have mercy on us!" exclaimed Mrs. Butler.

She made this remark aloud; it was distinctly heard, and Beatrice, as
she passed the good lady, turned and gave her a swift bright smile.

The bride joined the bridegroom before the altar, and the bishop, who
was to perform the ceremony, began the marriage service:

"I, Loftus, take thee, Josephine--"

When these words were uttered Mrs. Bell turned and faced Mrs. Butler.

"Whose cause has won?" she murmured, "who was right?"

"Never you say a word against that blessed girl, Beatrice Meadowsweet,"
replied Mrs. Butler. "Watch her face--it's the face of an angel."

"So it is," said Mrs. Bell. And the ladies clasped hands and buried
their feud.




CHAPTER XXXV.

BEATRICITES--EVERY ONE.


Mrs. Bell and Mrs. Butler had a cup of tea together after the wedding.
They partook of their tea in Mrs. Butler's house, and they gossiped over
the events of the day for long hours.

Part of the strange story of Beatrice's engagement the rector had told
his guests at the wedding-breakfast--a sufficient portion of this
curious romance was related to show some of the real nobility of this
young girl's character. People were to conjecture about the rest. They
were never to know. They never did know.

The Hartites and the Beatricites ceased to exist at the breakfast, or
rather the whole community became Beatricites on the spot.

Bertram took his bride away, and the town was very glad to think they
might keep Beatrice Meadowsweet with them after all. Neither Mrs.
Bertram nor Mrs. Meadowsweet were present at the wedding, but they met
that evening, for Mrs. Meadowsweet drove up to the Manor; she was
accompanied by Beatrice and they both asked to see Mrs. Bertram.

They were admitted into the great lady's bedroom.

"I am sorry you are so poorly, Mrs. Bertram," said Mrs. Meadowsweet.
"I thought, as Bee was coming up, I'd call with her. There's nothing for
worry on the nerves like Eleazer Macjones's Life Pills, and here's a
fresh box of them. I thought I'd bring them up, and tell you that for my
part I'm highly pleased."

"Pleased," said Mrs. Bertram.

She raised her white face and looked at her visitor.

"Yes, of course I am. I keep my girl. The young man wasn't suited to
her, nor she to him. I guessed there'd be no luck about that engagement,
when I was so deaved with 'poor dears,' and 'poor friends.' That's not
the right way to speak before any wedding. They were neither of them
more than half-hearted towards one another, and it's well they found it
out in time. Now when I married Meadowsweet--"

"Mother," interrupted Beatrice, "I think Mrs. Bertram is tired."

"Well, my pet, and you want the old lady to stop her chatter. You try
the Life Pills, Mrs. Bertram, I'll wait in the next room for Bee. She
has a word to say to you."

When they were alone together Beatrice went and knelt by Mrs. Bertram's
sofa.

"So you never loved my son. Beatrice?" said Mrs. Bertram, raising her
heavy eyes, and looking at her.

"I did not, I consented to marry him because I was silly and thought I
could do him good. I was saved just in time from making a grave mistake.
Josephine loves him."

"You think she will do him good?"

"The greatest, the best. They were meant for one another. They ought to
lead happy lives together."

"Beatrice, I have heard--I don't know how to thank you--I have heard
what you have done with some--some of your money. I don't know how to
thank you, child. You have saved Loftus and me."

Beatrice bent forward and kissed Mrs. Bertram on her cheek.

"I am glad," she said in a simple, quiet voice. "My father would be glad
too. I am abundantly content."

"Beatrice, you would have been just the wife for Loftus."

"No, he was not the husband meant for me. Some day my true lover may
come. If not, I have always been a happy girl, Mrs. Bertram, I am happy
still. I feel full of delight to-night. Now I must go. Only, first of
all, do something--something for the girl who has been made your
daughter to-day."

"Something for--for Josephine?"

"For Nina, whose great love will raise and save your son. Take this
packet; put it into the fire."

"What is it, Beatrice? I am weak. Are there any more shocks?"

"No. Josephine does not wish the story of her birth to be ever revealed.
She is a Bertram now without any need of proving her title. Her object
is to guard her husband's secret, and she does this, when she asks his
mother to burn this packet which contains the full proofs of her
identity as a Bertram."

Mrs. Bertram shivered. She touched the packet. Then she gave it back to
Beatrice.

"Put it into the fire yourself," she said. "Beatrice, you have saved us
all."

This little scene happened on the evening of Bertram's wedding-day. Just
at that same hour Mrs. Bell and Mrs. Butler were hob-nobbing over their
tea.

"For my part," said Mrs. Butler, "I no longer regret the absence of my
brooch. I will own I fretted for it when there seemed likely to be no
wedding to speak of. For why should the Northbury folks put themselves
out about the marriage of two strangers. But now I am glad Beatrice has
it, for though she is not a bride she is a beautiful character, and no
mistake, and such should be encouraged."

"That's my way of thinking, too," said Mrs. Bell. "I'll thank you for
another lump of sugar, Mrs. Butler. Yes, I have no fault to find with
Beatrice Meadowsweet. If she failed, she failed in a graceful fashion,
and, when all is said and done, her intentions were of the best."


THE END.












End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Honorable Miss, by L. T. Meade

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE HONORABLE MISS ***

***** This file should be named 15778-8.txt or 15778-8.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/1/5/7/7/15778/

Produced by David Garcia and the Online Distributed Proofreader Team.

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://gutenberg.net/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.net

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://pglaf.org

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://pglaf.org

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including including checks, online payments and credit card
donations.  To donate, please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.net

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.

*** END: FULL LICENSE ***
